RX405 Willow Inpatient Administration II
As always, remember your responsibilities for safe use of the software. Last Significant Update:05/11/24
Request project specification for this version by:October 18, 2024
Submit project for this version by:November 22, 2024
Request exam for this version by:October 11, 2024
Materials and assessments for the next version available:October 20, 2024
1. IMS Solids
Introduction
In RX305 Willow Administration I, you learned how to configure a simple Medication (ERX) record for multi-dose packages. You also learned how to configure a central pharmacy, set up dispense logic, build your formulary, assign preference lists, and generate charges.

In this class, you’ll learn how to apply those concepts to additional medications. First, you’ll explore an IMS solid. IMS solids are:

Commercially available tablets, capsules, or suppositories that...
Contain a single active ingredient and are available in multiple strengths.
The term “IMS” comes from “Intelligent Medication Selection,” the feature that allows Epic to pick the right ERX(s) to dispense based on the dose and what’s available. IMS streamlines the ordering process for these medications. Users don’t need to select the strength of the pill; they just select the drug and the form and enter a dose. IMS picks the strength(s) for them.

Example	
Metoprolol tartrate PO tablets are an example of IMS solids; they come in 25, 50, and 100 mg tablets. Each strength of tablet is a different ERX record.

Suppose your hospital carries both the 25 and 50 mg tablets. When a user selects either tablet in the Orders activity and enters a dose of “25 mg,” IMS changes the product to the 25 mg tablets. If the user enters a dose of “50 mg,” IMS changes the product to the 50 mg tablets. If the user enters a dose of 75 mg, IMS chooses to dispense a solid-form mixture containing a 25 mg tablet and 50 mg tablet.

By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Configure naming for IMS solids
Configure the Order Composer for IMS solids
Configure dosing units and rounding for IMS solids
Add an IMS solid to the appropriate Medication List (EFY) and Preference List (LPF) records
Enable IMS in a medication record
Explain how IMS works
Configure dispensing for IMS solids
Configure administration for IMS solid
Configure a medication to have different default values, buttons, and options based on the patient
 

In-Class Exercises
Exercise 1: Reviewing Medication Build
Configuring a simple ERX record for an IMS solid is similar to configuring one for a dosed bulk package. In this exercise, you’ll explore a non-configured ERX record for metoprolol tartrate 50 mg tablets, see how it should be configured, and use that to review ERX and Willow configuration.

Part 1: Medication Naming
Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train) and open your Caleb patient’s chart (using the Orders button). 
You want to be able to search for metoprolol tartrate by its brand name, "Lopressor."  In the Place orders or order sets field, type “trn### Lopressor” (replacing ### with the TRN### from your classroom information sheet).
Is it on your Facility List? NO!
Is it on the Database tab? NO!
In which field of your metoprolol tartrate ERX record should you add “Lopressor” to make this happen? (Choose only ONE answer.)
A. Record Name
B. Synonyms
C. Order Display Name
D. Short Name
E. Brand Name
F. Suffix

Answer: B. Synonyms

Change your search to "trn### met 50" and press Enter.
You find it on the Database tab as "TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS".
You want it to appear on the Database tab like this:  "trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet".  Which field of this ERX should you configure to make this appear correctly when searching for it in the Orders activity? (Choose ONE only.)
A. Record Name
B. Synonyms
C. Order Display Name
D. Short Name
E. Brand Name
F. Suffix

Answer: C. Order Display Name

Select and Accept (or double click) your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS from the Database tab.
Compare your (non-configured) ERX's Order Name to this one:

How would you configure your medication record to get the screenshot above?
Medication Short Name: trn4## metoprolol tartrate
Medication Brand Name: Lopressor
Inpatient Order Name Suffix: tablet
Include Strength in Order Name? No
Include Form in Order Name? No

Part 2: Configuring the Order Composer
Compare your (non-configured) ERX’s Order Composer to this one:

What field displays in your ERX but is NOT in the screenshot? Rate
Is your Dose field required or recommended? Should it be possible to sign an order for this med without a dose?
It's recommended (yield sign). No, dose should be required (stop sign).

How can you remove the Rate field and make the Dose field required?
Attach an Order Composer Configuration (OCC)—probably "RX SIMPLE MED"

In addition to configuring the Order Name, requiring the Dose field, and removing the Rate field, what are THREE additional settings to make your Order Composer match the screenshot? (There might be more than three, and don’t worry about the specific field names; just go for the concepts.)
Dose buttons (25, 50, and 100 mg)

Allowed Routes (Oral, maybe others; default route = Oral)

Frequency buttons (Daily, BID)

In the Dose field, enter "50 mg". 
Click the magnifying glass next to "mg". 
What units are allowed? All of them
Is that appropriate? No
Click the magnifying glass next to Route.
What routes are allowed? All of them
Is that appropriate? No
Part 3: Dosing Units & Rounding
Change the dose to "33 mg" (that would be about 2/3 of a tablet).
In reality, could a nurse actually give 33 mg? No
Compare your (non-configured) ERX to this screenshot:

How can you configure your ERX record to behave as shown above? Finish filling in the screenshot:


For #2:  set the Administration Rnd Factor to "0.5".  For #3 (below), set the Dispense unit to "tablet" and the Rnd Factor to "1".

Look at the Dispense section in the Order Composer.
Compare your Dispense amount field to this screenshot:

The Dispense amount is blank in your order. The system doesn’t know what to dispense.
In the text screenshot above, see if you can figure out how to fix this. Epic should dispense in “tablets” and round the dispense amount up to the next whole tablet.
Part 4: Medication Lists & Preference Lists
You also need to add your medication to the correct lists.

Give your order a Dose of “50 mg”, Route of Oral, Frequency of “Daily” [200001] and click Include Now.
Click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and ordering provider. 
You see this flag under the order name: . To make that flag go away, you need to add your ERX to which of the following lists? (pick ONE):
Your central pharmacy’s medication list (EFY)
Your hospital’s formulary (EFY)
Your hospital’s facility preference list (LPF)
Your physician’s preference list (LPF)
Answer: B

Look at the Products to dispense section. What Package is dispensing?
None. It isn't selecting a package!

To make sure the appropriate package dispenses, you need to add your ERX to which of the following lists? (pick ONE):
Your central pharmacy’s medication list (EFY)
Your hospital’s formulary (EFY)
Your hospital’s facility preference list (LPF)
Your physician’s preference list (LPF)
Answer: A

If you add your ERX to the list in step 5, it will automatically be added to which of these lists? (pick ONE)
Your central pharmacy’s medication list (EFY)
Your hospital’s formulary (EFY)
Your hospital’s facility preference list (LPF)
Your physician’s preference list (LPF)
Answer: C

Under the Products to dispense, click the hyperlink for your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS.
Click the Package field.
Choose the 100 EA Standard bottle from Mylan (0378-0032-01).
In the Dispense field, enter “1 tablet”.
Stay here for the next part.
Part 5: Charging
You selected an NDC to dispense. The system knows how much the NDC costs, but how much will you charge for it? Let’s find out.

At the top of the order, click Show Charge.
The system doesn’t know which charge table to use.
Dismiss the error message. Expand the Charging section at the bottom left.
What is missing that will help the system pick a charge table? Charge Method
You want this to be "Unit Dose Standard." In which record would an administrator fix this problem? (Choose ONE).
A. Package (NDC) record
B. NDC Grouper (NDG) record
C. Medication (ERX) record

C. Medication (ERX) record. They COULD do it in the NDC or NDG (if there was one), but the ERX would be the most efficient.

Assigning a charge method would allow the system to calculate a charge. What additional setting would you need to make in your ERX record to allow that charge to get to the charge router? Linked Procedure (a.k.a. Procedure ID) 
Part 6: Dispensing
When dispensed from the central pharmacy, this medication should be on a cart and print first dose labels.

Let’s make sure it’s on the appropriate cart. 
Write down the Dispense Code in the screenshot below:

Now, consider this screenshot from Rx System Definitions (in Classic):

What Cart Group will your order have? Unit Dose
True or False: Based on the two screenshots above, your ERX record must have a value in the Default dispense code field. False
Consider this screenshot of the TRN### UNIT DOSE CART, which already exists:
 

Does this cart come from your order’s dispense location? Yes
Does this cart include your order’s Cart Group? Yes
Does this cart serve your TRN### 4 South unit? Yes
When does this cart’s next interval start? 10:00 am
When did that interval close? 8:00 am
Look at your order's schedule in Verify Orders. If you verify this order right now, how many first doses would you expect to get? Two 
This is a unit-dose medication, meaning each pill is individually wrapped and labeled in advance. You typically put them in an envelope for the patient and send the envelope to the floor. Given that, how many labels would you need to actually print? 1
Let’s see what happens. Verify the order.
Go to Order Hx for your order.
Hint: Go to the Medications activity, select your order, click Order Hx.
How many “Dispense (First Dose)” actions do you see?  Two 
Look for the Label Hx button. (It may be under the More button.)
The button is grayed out, which means that no labels have printed.
What must you configure to get a label to print? Choose ONE only.
A. Your central pharmacy (PHR) record, the Label Routing form
B. Your unit dose cart (CRT) record, the Reporting form
C. Your metoprolol tartrate (ERX) record, the Default Dispense Code form
Answer: A

Part 7: Administration
Let’s look at how this order appears on the MAR. (Normally a nurse would do these steps, but you'll do them as your pharmacist to avoid logging out and back multiple times.)

Go to the MAR for Caleb. 
Click the Due bubble for the Metoprolol Tartrate tablet 50 mg.
Compare your administration to the screenshot.
What appears on the screenshot that does not appear on your screen?
A place to record BP and heart rate (Associated Flowsheet Rows). 



Metoprolol tartrate is used to manage blood pressure and heart rate, and nurses will often document those vital signs as part of administering the med. You'll see soon how to make these flowsheet rows appear in the med administration window. 
Click Accept to confirm your administration.
If You Have Time: Document Your Findings
Take a few minutes to review the key settings and steps for configuring a simple ERX record. Fill in the tables below:

Medication Naming
Configure this field to make it easier to find the med when searching for it:	
Synonyms

Configure this field to control how the name appears on search results in the Orders activity:	
Order Display Name

Configure these fields to control how the medication’s Order Name appears (in the Orders activity, on the MAR, etc.):	
Short Name, Brand Name, Suffix, Include Strength, Include Form (N)

 

Order Composer
Attach one of these to your Medication (ERX) record so the right Display Items appear, and the correct fields are required:	
Order Composer Configuration (OCC)... in this case RX SIMPLE MED

True or False: Making a frequency the default will also make it a button.	
False

True or False: If you don’t specify the allowed order units, routes, or frequencies, then every choice is available.	

True

If you want only SOME of your allowed routes to be buttons, configure the buttons on this screen.	
Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections
(a.k.a. the "tic tac toe screen")

 

Dosing Units
On the Rx Unit Equivalence screen shown below, configure this additional setting to ensure that doses are never more precise than a 1/2 tablet.



Administration Rnd Factor = 0.5

On the Rx Unit Equivalence screen, configure these fields so the system always dispenses in whole tablets:	
Dispense unit = "tablet"
Dispense Rnd Factor = 1

BONUS Question: Providers dose this medication in "mg" but it is administered and dispensed in tablets. Configure these fields to establish that 50 mg = 1 tablet.

(Your instructor will go over this with you if you don't know!)	
   Equiv Qty  Unit
1. 50              mg
2. 1                tablet

 

Medication Lists & Preference Lists
Add your ERX record to this list, or it will be flagged in Verify Orders:	
Hospital's Formulary

Add your ERX record to this list, or the system won’t know which NDC to dispense:	
Central Pharmacy Medication List

If you add your ERX to the Central Pharmacy Med List, it will also appear on this list:	
Facility List

 

Dispensing
If you don’t give your ERX record a dispense code, the system will use this dispense code by default:	
Unit Dose

That default dispense code will cause the medication to have this cart group:	
Unit Dose

To ensure that the proper labels print at the proper times, you must configure this screen in your Pharmacy (PHR) record:	

Label Routing

 

Charging	 
Assume you have one charge map in your system and your charge tables are all built. Also assume you set your costs in your NDCs.

What two additional settings do you need to make in an ERX record for it to trigger charges?


Charge Method (in this case "Unit Dose Standard")
Linked Procedure (in this case, HC RX 637)

 

Administration
True or False: For some medications, nurses want to document specific flowsheet rows at the same time they document an administration.	

True (Designate the specific FLO record in each ERX)

Exercise 2: Configure an IMS Solid
In this exercise, you’ll configure the TRN## METROPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record you were exploring earlier in class. Much of this will be review from your previous class, so the steps will be less specific.

Part 1: Configure Your ERX Record
Log into Text as your administrator. Go to Clinical Administration >> Meds, Allergens, Imm, etc. >> Medications (ERX).
Open your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record (remember to use your TRN###).
In the Configured? field, choose “yes”.
Other analysts will be able to see this information on the Database tab. It will help them to determine whether or not an ERX record should be added to a preference list or SmartGroup.
Users should be able to search for this record by "Lopressor."
Hint: make it a synonym. 
For charging, this med should be linked to procedure record HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS (ALT 250 FOR MEDICARE IP) [6370000001].
Hint: Use a field on the first screen, bottom left.
Page down to the Facility Administered Packaging and Billing Settings screen.
Give your ERX a Default Charge Method of “Unit Dose Standard”.
On the Inpatient Order Defaults screen, make sure this record appears in search results in the Orders activity like so:
trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet
(replace ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet)
The Default Frequency should be “Daily” [200001]
Add dose buttons for 25 mg, 50 mg, and 100 mg. None of them should be selected by default.
Hint: use the Suggested Doses for Order Entry fields at the bottom.
Page down to the Medication Order Name Text screen. Configure the Order Name like so:
Medication Short Name: trn### metoprolol tartrate
(replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet)
Medication Brand Name: Lopressor
Inpatient Order Name Suffix: tablet
Page down once. Configure the following:
Include Strength in Order Name? No (we'll talk about why this is "no" in a little while!)
Include Form in Order Name? No
On the Rx Unit Equivalence screen, configure this record so that:
The Medication Unit is "mg"
The Administration and Dispense Units are both “tablet”
Nurses can split tablets in half (Hint: use the Administration Rnd Factor)
Pharmacy always dispenses whole tablets (Hint: use the Dispense Rnd Factor)
In the lower left corner, indicate that 50 mg is equal to 1 tablet:

The order of these rows does not matter.
Page down to the Rx Order Setup screen and indicate that users should only order this in the following units:
mg
mg/kg
mg/kg/day
On the same screen, make “Oral” the default route.
Allow users to select any of these routes: “Per G Tube,” “Per J Tube,” and “Nasogastric”.
On the Dispense Code Configuration screen, leave the Default dispense code field and Default cart group field blank.
You’ll use the system defaults of “Unit Dose”.
On the Order Composer Configuration screen, for a Context of “Inpatient” use the Configuration “RX SIMPLE MED” [4080200001].
On the Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections screen, make “Daily” [200001] and "2 times daily" [200006] Frequency buttons and “Oral” the only Route button.
Page down 16 times. On the MAR Flowsheet screen (not the MAR Flowsheets Documentation screen!), enter “5” for Blood Pressure and "8" for Pulse in the Flowsheet Rows field:

This causes the Blood Pressure and Pulse flowsheet rows to appear in the Med Administration form in the MAR activity.
Press SHIFT+F7 to close your record and allow your changes to be seen in Hyperspace.
Part 2: Add Your Medication to Your Lists
Launch Classic and log in as your administrator (ADM##/train).
You’ve started stocking this medication.
Open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST record (Classic >> main toolbar >> Rx Admin >> Medication List Admin).
Add your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record to this list. Hint: Remember to click Edit.
Your pharmacy stocks the 100-each bottle (0378-0032-01) and does not dispense the entire package. (Hint: make sure it has a check mark!)
Click Accept (not Cancel!).
Make sure there’s a green dot under the P column for your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record.
That will add it to the Preference List (LPF) record that appears on the Facility List tab for your hospital.
Close the Medication List record.
This med been approved for use by your P&T committee.
Open your TRN### HOSPITAL FORMULARY medication list record. (Rx Admin >> Medication List Admin)
Add your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record.
The system only checks if the ERX record is approved. It doesn’t care about NDCs, so you don’t need to select one. Click Accept.
Will adding a medication to this med list cause it to show up on any preference list (LPF) record? No
Hint: To check, click the Link Pref List button and see if an LPF is linked. 
Close your formulary record.
Part 3: Configure Label Routing
Your unit dose cart record is already configured in your central pharmacy, so you just need to configure label routing for your first doses.

In Classic, open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY (Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin).
On the Label Routing form, add a row that makes the following happen:
Whenever you dispense first doses of a Unit Dose medication…
…print the SmartText “RX LABEL – UNIT DOSE [4084970101]…
…on the TRN CENTRAL 1ST DOSE/REDISPENSE printer.
Enter “Yes” under the Group? column.
If there is more than one first dose for a single order, the doses will be grouped on a single label.
Configure similar rows for PRN Par Dispense (First Dose) and Redispense actions for unit dose medications, with the same labels.
Your Label Routing form should look like this:

WATCH OUT! Make sure you used the Dispense (First Dose) action and not the Dispense (1st First Dose) action.
Close your Pharmacy record.
Part 4: Test Your Work
Go back to Hyperspace and log in as your pharmacist (RX##/train) and open Caleb's chart. 
Discontinue Caleb’s metoprolol tartrate order. Choose an order mode and provider. 
Click the +New button next to the Place orders or order sets field.
Enter “trn### lopressor” in the search field (replace ### with your TRN###).
Does your record appear like this on the Facility List tab?
trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet
Double click to Accept your metoprolol tartrate record (you can also single click the medication and click Accept).
The Order Composer opens automatically. It should look like this:

Enter a dose of "33 mg" and tab off the field. 
Confirm that you get an error, saying that the nearest available dose is 25 mg. 
Click the 25 mg dose button. 
Confirm that the Calculated dose is "0.5 tablet"
Down under the Dispense section, confirm that the Dispense amount is "1 tablet"
Change the dose to 50 mg.
Next to the First Dose field, click Include Now. 
Click Sign & Verify. Choose an order mode and provider. Confirm that:
You do NOT see a "Non-formulary" flag on this order.
You DO see Package (100 Each bottle).
Click Show Charge.
The order charge should be $3.00.
Close the charge window. Click Verify. 
Go to Order Hx for the order.
Hint: Go to Medications activity. Select the ACTIVE metoprolol order.
You should see two actions for “Dispense (First Dose)”.
Were charges triggered? Each dispense action should have a green +.
Click Label Hx (it might be under the More button).
Do you see a single row (one label) that contains two doses, like this?

Go to the MAR and click the Due time for the active metoprolol order.
If you see a warning that you are administering too close to another dose, click Accept.
Is there a space to document the patient’s blood pressure and heart rate? There should be.
Click Cancel, Discard your documentation, and close Caleb’s chart.
If You Have Time: Configure a Second Medication
In this exercise, you’ll configure one strength of prednisone tablets, a steroid. This exercise will be less guided than the previous.

Part 1: Configure Your ERX Record
Configure your TRN### PREDNISONE 2.5 MG PO TABS to meet the following needs:

Users should be able to find this record by searching for Deltasone.
Willow should generate a charge for this med. Use…
The same linked procedure as metoprolol tartrate [6370000001].
A default charge method of “Unit Dose Standard”.
On search results in Hyperspace, it should appear as:
trn### predniSONE (Deltasone) tablet
(replace ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet)
The medication’s Order Name and Order Composer should appear like so:
Nurses can cut this medication in half, but pharmacy will always dispense whole tablets.
Users can only order this in mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day.
Users can only order it with a route of Oral, Per J Tube, Per G Tube, and Nasogastric.
All frequencies are allowed.
Part 2: Add Your Medication To Your Lists
TRN### PREDNISONE 2.5 MG PO TABS are:

Approved for use in your hospital.
Stocked in central pharmacy (using NDC 0054-4742-25, a 100-each bottle) and should appear on your facility list tab.
Part 3: Test Your Work
In Hyperspace as your pharmacist, go to the Orders activity for your Caleb patient. Then:

Click the +New button to search for “trn### prednisone” (replace ### with your TRN###)
It should be on your Facility List tab.
Compare the Order Composer to the screenshot earlier in the exercise. (Fix any problems you find.)
It is okay if you do not see weight-related fields.
Enter a dose of 2.4 mg. The admin dose should change to 1 tablet.
Look at the Dispense section of the Order Composer. You should see:
The Package field show a 100 Each Bottle.
The Dispense amount is 1 tablet.
If everything looks right, change the dose to 2.5 mg, choose a frequency of Daily, and click Sign & Verify.

Is it flagged as Non-Formulary? (It should not be.)
Is the Dispense Code “Unit Dose?” (It should be.)
If everything looks right in Verify Orders, you can reject your order. Caleb will not need it!

Key Takeaways
IMS solids are commercially available tablets, capsules, and suppositories with one active ingredient. They are available in multiple strengths; each strength is a different simple ERX record.

Naming

Configured?
Set to “yes” if you are configuring the ERX
If an ERX has been configured in the Foundation System, “Foundation System” will appear there
Displays on the Database tab
Synonyms
Common brand names, abbreviations, mnemonics
Order Display Name (for IMS solids):
<generic name> (<Brand>) <form>
Leave the strength off of the order display name—IMS will pick strength(s) for users based on dose, availability
Order Name
Medication Short Name: <generic name>
(lower case or TALLman)
Medication Brand Name: <Brand>
(first letter capitalized or TALLman, no parentheses)
Inpatient Order Name Suffix: <form>
Include Strength in Order Name? No (for IMS solids)
On IMS solids, strength can be redundant/contradictory with dose
Include Form in Order Name? No
 
Order Composer

Default Frequency
If med is almost always ordered with same frequency, set it as default
Otherwise, leave blank; make users pick
Suggested Doses for Order Entry
Suggested doses = dose buttons
If med is almost always ordered with a particular dose, set as default
Otherwise, set no default; make users pick
Allowed Order Units
Blank = all units listed on Rx Unit Equivalence screen are allowed
Limit to all appropriate unit
Allowed & Default Route
Blank = all routes are allowed
Limit to all appropriate routes (will all appear as buttons by default, but see below)
Set most common route as "Yes" in Default column
To force user to select a route, "No" in all rows in Default column
Allowed Frequencies
Blank = all frequencies allowed
Typically left blank
Inpatient PRN Reasons
Include appropriate choices if med commonly ordered PRN
Blank = user must enter free-text PRN Comment
Order Composer Configuration (for IMS solids)
For Context "Inpatient," use RX SIMPLE MED
Makes Dose field required, removes Rate field
Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections ("tic-tac-toe screen")
Frequency buttons: list common frequencies (blank = no frequencies buttons)
Route buttons: list the routes you want to appear as buttons (blank = all allowed routes are buttons, if defined)
 
Dosing Units

Medication Unit
The unit in which the active ingredient is measured
For IMS solids: typically units like mg, g, mcg, Units, mEq
Administration & Dispense Units
What nurses count when administering a dose, what pharmacy counts when dispensing a dose
For IMS solids, typically units like tablet, capsule, suppository, lozenge, etc.
Both should be the same (for IMS solids)
Administration Rnd Factor
Tells system how to round calculated dose; prevents overly-precise doses
Set to 1, or (if nurses can split) 0.5 or 0.25
Dispense Rnd Factor
Tells system how to round dispense amount of each dose
Set to 1 (pharmacy dispenses whole pills)
 
Dispensing, Charging, and Administration

Dispense Code
For most IMS solids: Unit Dose (or leave blank; this is the system level default)
Alternatives include: Hazardous Unit Dose
Configure Label Routing table in dispensing Pharmacy (PHR) to indicate what label(s) print(s) for which actions
Common actions for Unit Dose medications:  Dispense (First Dose), PRN Par Dispense (First Dose), Redispense, maybe Dispense (Cart Fill)
System Definitions maps dispense codes to cart groups; Cart (CRT) records use Cart Groups to determine which meds to dispense
Linked Procedure
Enter appropriate EAP record; passes charge to charge router
For most IMS solids: HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS (ALT 250 FOR MEDICARE IP)
Default Charge Method
Used to determine which charge table (markup formula) use
Cannot calculate charge amount without one
For most IMS solids: Unit Dose Standard
Flowsheet rows
Link flowsheet row (FLO) records that will appear in Med Administration window on MAR
Allows nurses to document relevant info (blood pressure, heart rate, pain, etc.) while administering some meds
Work with Inpatient Clinical Documentation team
Overview of IMS
The term “IMS” comes from “Intelligent Medication Selection,” the feature that allows Epic to pick the right ERX(s) to dispense based on the dose and what’s available. IMS streamlines the ordering process for these medications. Users don’t need to select the strength of the pill; they just select the drug and the form and enter a dose. IMS picks the strength(s) for them.

Example	
Metoprolol tartrate PO tablets are an example of IMS solids; they come in 25, 50, and 100 mg tablets. Each strength of tablet is a different ERX record.

Suppose your hospital carries both the 25 and 50 mg tablets. When a user selects either tablet in the Orders activity and enters a dose of “25 mg,” IMS changes the product to the 25 mg tablets. If the user enters a dose of “50 mg,” IMS changes the product to the 50 mg tablets. If the user enters a dose of 75 mg, IMS chooses to dispense a solid-form mixture containing a 25 mg tablet and 50 mg tablet.

Why is IMS Necessary?
When writing paper orders, physicians indicate the medication, dose, route, and frequency. They don’t usually care how the medication is administered or dispensed; that’s Pharmacy’s job. IMS for solids makes the ordering workflow similar to writing a paper order.



In Hyperspace, go to the Orders activity for Caleb. Click +New, and search for “trn### met tart tab” on the Facility List tab.

You only have one result on your Facility List because you only added one strength of metoprolol tartrate during the exercise. It does not have the strength in its name on the facility list because you did not include it in the Order Display Name. So far, so good! 
Select your metoprolol tartrate tablet (this is the 50 mg tablet you just configured). Select a dose of 25 mg.

Change the dose to 75 mg. Notice that the system is dispensing 1.5 tablets.

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your trainer go to Orders for their Wayne patient, click +New, and search for “met tart tab.”



TRAINER DEMO: Your trainer will select this medication. Watch how the Product changes to match the dose:



If a dose requires a combination of strengths, IMS creates a solid-form mixture on the fly, using the fewest number of pills from what’s available near the patient.

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your trainer enter a dose of 75 mg, and note the ingredients used in the Dispense section.

What is IMS choosing to dispense? 
One 25 mg tablet, plus one 50 mg tablet.

Adding IMS Solids to Medication Lists
IMS will only work if the system finds products available to dispense. This means you must add IMS solids to your medication lists before IMS will work.

Pharmacy Medication Lists
On your central pharmacy’s medication list:

Add all strengths that you stock anywhere in hospital.
Be sure to select the NDCs you stock for each strength.
Clear the green dot from all but the smallest commercially available strength.
This medication should appear only once on your Facility List (rather than once per strength).
If anything goes wrong with IMS, having this strength on the Facility list will allow orders to cover the widest range of doses.
On the medication lists for other pharmacies:

Add strengths that are stocked in that location.
Green dots don’t matter; these med lists aren’t linked to preference lists.
IMS will only choose products that it finds on the medication lists of the pharmacies serving the patient.

In Classic, add the 25 mg strength of TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE PO TABS to your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List (not the 100 mg tablets).

Indicate that you have the first listed NDC.
Make sure only the 25 mg strength appears on the Facility List tab.
Close your med list to save your changes. 
In Hyperspace, go to Orders for Caleb. Remove any unsigned orders.

Click +New, and search for “trn### met tart tab”.

There should be one match on the Facility List tab.
Accept the “trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet” and test these doses:

Dose	Dispense from	Product Administered
25 mg	Central Pharmacy	25 mg tablet x 1
50 mg	Central Pharmacy	50 mg tablet x 1
100 mg	Central Pharmacy	50 mg tablet x 2
(because you don’t stock the 100 mg tablets)
12.5 mg	Central Pharmacy	25 mg tablet x 0.5
75 mg	Central Pharmacy	50 mg tablet x 1 and 25 mg tablet x 1
In Classic, add TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS to your TRN### 4-South ADS med list. Use the first NDC. Close the list!

Back in Hyperspace, test the following doses:

Dose	Dispense from	Product Administered
50 mg	4-South ADS	50 mg tablet x 1
100 mg	4-South ADS	50 mg tablet x 2
25 mg	4-South ADS	50 mg tablet x 0.5
(system finds 50 mg tablet in ADS, and considers that more convenient than dispensing a 25 mg tablet from central; this can be configured!)
12.5 mg	Central Pharmacy	25 mg tablet x 0.5
(nurse can’t use 50 mg tablets in the ADS for this dose because the Administer Rnd Factor is 0.5)
Remove the order without signing it.

Hospital Formulary
On your hospital’s formulary add all strengths (even ones you don’t carry).

Why? Because the “Non-formulary” flag is assigned before IMS happens. When a user enters a new order, the system checks whether the ERX record they selected (from a preference list, during medication reconciliation, or from the Database tab) is on the formulary. IMS then happens, possibly changing the product to something that is on the formulary. But it’s too late! The order appears as “Non-formulary” because the product that the user selected wasn’t on the formulary list.

In Classic, add all strengths of TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE PO TABS to your TRN### Hospital Formulary. Close your list to save your changes. 

TRAINER DEMO: Watch as your trainer adds only their 25 and 50 mg strengths to their hospital’s formulary.

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your trainer go back to Hyperspace and:

Give Caleb a prior to admission order for their 100 mg tablet.
Order that med for the admission (click the green plus) and click Sign & Verify. 
Make Observations
What strength was the metoprolol tartrate that the patient was taking prior to admission?	
100 mg

When your trainer ordered the medication for the admission, what strength did Epic switch to?	
50 mg

Is the order being flagged as non-formulary? Is that what you want to happen?	
Yes; we do not want that to happen though because it's approved.

Think back. Which strengths did your trainer add to their formulary?	
The 25 mg and 50 mg strengths

What could the trainer add to their formulary to fix this issue?	
Add the 100 mg strength ERX

Critical	If an IMS solid is approved by your P&T committee, add all strengths of that product to your formulary—even the ones you do not stock. Failure to do so might result in orders being inappropriately flagged as non-formulary. 
How Does IMS Work?
At a very high level, IMS works when:

A med is ordered for a patient in a bed…
…that med is configured to use IMS…
…and other IMS-equivalent products are available to be dispensed.
Critical	IMS will only work if the patient’s hospital has a central pharmacy (with a med list). If you haven’t designated a “main pharmacy” for the patient’s location (in Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin), IMS won’t work at all.
Enabling IMS in the ERXs
The following settings must be made for IMS to work: 

Use Scientific Medication and Dose Units



If any of the fields pictured above, the Medication unit, Allowed Order Units, or Suggested Doses for Order Entry Units, use form-based units (tablet, capsule, etc.), then IMS won’t work. IMS only works with the following units: g, mg, mcg, ng, pg, mEq, Units, Million Units, milli-units, and International Units (IU). Remember leaving Allowed Order Units blank means all units are allowed, including form-based ones! In addition to just being bad build, leaving the Allowed Order Units blank in an IMS solid ERX can break IMS!

Enable Intelligent Medication Selection



Critical	The Use IMS when this medication is ordered field does not come preconfigured by the third-party data load. You must enter “Yes - Solids” in this field for every IMS solid Medication (ERX) record.
How IMS Picks Its Products
Third-party data vendors apply a number to each medication that expresses the specific medication, form, route and strength of the ERX record. The number and format change from vendor to vendor. For Medi-Span (which the training environment uses), IMS considers ERXs to be interchangeable if the first 12 digits of this number are the same.



Critical	
The GPI/GMI/GPK also determines:

Which NDCs “map” to which ERX records
Which dose warning rules & conditions apply to the medication
DO NOT change the GPI/GMI/GPK generated by your third-party data vendor.

IMS uses the Strength and Strength Unit fields to determine how many mg (or mcg, or g, etc.) are in “one pill.” These come from the data vendor; you should not edit these fields.



At a high level, IMS works like this:

Look at the first dispense location that serves the patient.
Are there any IMS-equivalent products available in that location? Can it get the requested dose with those products? If so, go on. Otherwise, skip to step 6.
Identify all the possible “solutions” (products IMS could pick in order to get the requested dose).
Rule out any solutions that break the rules configured for IMS (such as how many total pills or different products are allowed; see the Beyond the Basics sections below). Are there any remaining solutions from this dispense location? If so, go on. Otherwise, skip to step 6.
Is there only one solution? If so, use that one. If there are multiple solutions, choose the one that uses (in this order):
The fewest pills that must be split by nursing
The fewest total pills (regardless of strength)
The fewest different ERX records
If there are no acceptable solutions in this dispense location, go to the next dispense location that serves this patient. Return to step 2.
Example	
You order 25 mg of metoprolol for Caleb. The first dispense location is the ADS cabinet, which has 50 mg tablets. There are no IMS rules preventing nurses from splitting tablets. The ADS is selected, and the nurse administers 0.5 x 50 mg tablet.

If the ADS does not allow nurses to split tablets, the ADS is skipped and Epic goes to the next dispense location Eventually, it gets to central pharmacy and dispenses a 25 mg tablet.

Troubleshooting IMS
If IMS for solids isn’t working as expected, use the IMS Trace utility in Order Hx to troubleshoot. It contains a detailed description of the system’s process for selecting the final product (or products) to dispense.

In Hyperspace or Classic, go to Order Hx for the order.
In the report at the bottom of the screen, expand the Troubleshooting Information section.
This section provides lots of troubleshooting information and links to jump to relevant records or further reports.
Click Jump to IMS Trace.
The IMS Trace Details report shows the system’s considerations for choosing the product. Here are some tips for reading the report.
Text highlighted in red calls your attention to a problem. For example, if you have used non-scientific units throughout the record, you’ll see:

You may also see that IMS is currently disabled because “I ERX 190 is not set to Yes…” This means you forgot to enter Yes in item 190, Use IMS when this medication is ordered?
Missing strength or strength unit is called out with the phrase, “There is no medication strength/unit for…”
If a product is not listed in the Generically Equivalent Products Being Considered section, the GPI/GMI/GPK may be incorrect.
The report will also tell you if IMS failed because you don’t have a Central Pharmacy record linked to your Hospital (EAF).
In Hyperspace, discontinue any existing orders for metoprolol for Caleb. (Pick an order mode and provider.)

Enter a new order for trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet 25 mg. Sign the order (and automatically verify it). Pick an order mode and provider.  

Go to Order Hx for this order, and review IMS Trace for Caleb’s metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet order.

Skim through the Evaluating Departments section. How many options did the system find for dispensing this order? (Hint: Look for “cases” or “solutions”.)
Only 1

Modify Caleb’s metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet dose to 12.5 mg. Sign the change. Pick an order mode and provider. 

Review IMS Trace for the new, modified order. Look through the Evaluating Departments section again. 

Which pharmacies did the system check for Caleb’s department? Why are they skipped?
TRN### 4-South ADS -- only has the 50 mg tabs

TRN### Load to ADS -- no equivalent meds on list

TRN### 4-South Satellite -- only dispenses first doses

Critical	
If you believe IMS should have found an equivalent product in a pharmacy, but the IMS trace utility shows that it did not, there are a few possible reasons:

Medication is on the med list, but no NDC is selected.
You just added the medication/NDC to the list, but have not yet closed the list.
The pharmacy dispenses only first doses, PRN meds, or meds with a given DEA class in the dispense logic table. 
Beyond the Basics: Limiting the Number of Pills and Products to Dispense
Beyond the Basics	The following section on Limiting the Number of Pills and Products to Dispense is beyond the basics. You may find it interesting or useful, but is not required.
IMS will limit the number of pills it selects based on this setting in Pharmacy System Definitions.

Path: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy System Definitions >> IMS form



This can be overridden at the Pharmacy record level. You can also limit the number of different products (strengths) for a single order.

Path: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> IMS form



Beyond the Basics: Preventing Split Tablets
Beyond the Basics	This section on Preventing Split Tablets is beyond the basics. You may find it interesting or useful, but is not required.
By default, IMS considers dispensing from a pharmacy that requires nurses to split tablets. If you want to prevent this, open each Pharmacy (PHR) record where you don’t want nurses splitting tablets. Clear the Allow dispense of products that need to be split by nursing checkbox.

Path: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> Dispensing Information form



Critical	If you clear this checkbox while troubleshooting your split tablet for your Willow Inpatient Administration project, it will break IMS. Don’t touch this in training.
 

Beyond the Basics: IMS for Liquids
Beyond the Basics	This section on IMS for Liquids is beyond the basics. You may find it interesting or useful, but is not required.
Starting in November 2020, IMS is also available for liquids and reconstitutable products. This is set up very similarly to IMS for solids, but the value on the Intelligent Medication Selection screen is different:



If you want to learn more, ready Configure IMS for Simple Medications on Galaxy.

Configuring IMS Solids
Configure groups of IMS-interchangeable records to have almost identical settings. Only one of those records typically goes on the Facility List, but end users might still select the other strengths:

Pharmacy staff might select a specific strength from the Database tab.
Physician/nurse preference lists and Order Sets might be built using specific strengths.
During admission med rec, physicians might order specific strengths a patient was taking at home.
Regardless of which strength of ERX a user selects, the name and order composer should look the same.

Example	You’re configuring IMS for metoprolol tartrate tablets. You need to configure all available strengths: 25 mg, 50 mg and 100 mg. Only the 25 mg record will be on the Facility List, but all three should have the same order names, order display name, OCC, buttons, and defaults.
Configuring Naming
Give each strength the same short name, brand name, suffix, and order display name. Follow the same format you have with other ERXs, except:



Do NOT include the strength in the order display name or the order name. Why?

Only the ERX with a green dot (the smallest commercially available strength) appears on the Facility List; if it included its strength in the order display name, users might assume that only that one strength is available.
Including strength in the order name is redundant/confusing with dose; for example:
“metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) 25 MG tablets 50 mg”
Configuring the Order Composer for IMS Solids
Similarities Between Strengths
The Order Composer for each strength should be basically identical, with the same:

OCC
Dose, frequency, and route buttons
Allowed order units, routes, and frequencies
Default route
Default dose (or lack of default dose)
Default frequency (or lack of default frequency)
You want the Order Composer to appear the same no matter which ERX the user initially selects.



Regarding default doses and frequencies, either:

Set the same default in all strengths of an IMS solid (if the medication is almost always ordered with the same dose and/or frequency), or
Set NO default in all strengths of an IMS solid (to force users to pick)
This might vary from drug to drug. For example, metoprolol tartrate tablets do not have a clear "almost always" dose, so no default dose is configured in any strength. By contrast, zolpidem CR tablets are almost always dosed at 6.25 mg, Nightly PRN and those values are set as defaults in both the 6.25 mg and 12.5 mg ERX records. 

The goal is consistency: no matter which ERX record the user initially selects, the Order Composer should appear the same. 

Configuring Dosing Units for IMS Solids
 





Critical	
While all the strengths in a group of IMS solids should have the same Medication Unit, Administration Unit, and Dispense Unit, the Equiv Qty and Unit table must be different in each record, because that field is effectively what defines the strength of each record!

The Administration Rnd Factor might also be different between strengths. For example, your organization might allow nurses to split the smallest strength of tablets, but not split the larger strength(s).  

Configuring Different Order Composers for Different Patients
It is possible to configure multiple, different order composers for the same ERX. Some solid medications may be dosed differently based on the age of the patient. You might use weight-based doses for pediatric patients, but standard (simple) doses for adults.

Example	Metoprolol tartrate tablets are sometimes ordered for pediatric patients with doses like 1 mg/kg/day or 2 mg/kg/day. It’s also ordered for adult patients, in which case the common doses are 25, 50, or 100 mg. Your organization has decided that it’s best to not have a default dose for this medication.
Medication override contexts allow you to have a single ERX record that has different default values and buttons based on the age (or other details) of the patient.


Compare the screenshots. Circle things that are different between them.

The “base” version of the ERX record will contain the settings that are the same between all patient groups.

To configure a medication with override contexts:

Configure the “base” version of the ERX record.
Configure override contexts for different patient groups.
Critical	Override contexts can be used with ANY simple ERX record, not just IMS solids. They are commonly used for liquid medications because they are the ones with most significant differences based on the patient’s age. In a later chapter, you’ll see how override contexts are used for liquid medications too.
What Are Override Contexts?
Medication override contexts are values in a category list. Each context is paired with a Rule (CER) record that evaluates details about the patient. If the patient satisfies the conditions of the rule, they qualify for that context. Within an ERX record, items can be configured to appear for a patient who falls within a context, overriding what is set in the “base” ERX record.

Unless otherwise specified, the age ranges in the Foundation System override contexts are specified as:

Neonate: 4 weeks old or less (plus certain premature babies based on gestational age)
Pediatric: 14 years old or less
Adult: 140 years old or less
Critical	For most contexts, the Foundation System does not define a lower age-range. When using a context like “Adult,” you define what is not “Adult” by adding another context, like “Pediatric.” Only when used together with “Pediatric” does “Adult” come to mean 15-140 years old.
There are, however, over 135 contexts (with corresponding rules) available in the Foundation System. Many of them are very specific, applying only to patients with specific ranges and combinations of age, weight, CrCl, and/or GFR results.

Creating new override contexts is beyond the scope of this class. If you need to configure new contexts in your system, see Galaxy >> Medications Setup and Support Guide >> Set Up Rule-Based Override Contexts. 

Step 1: Configure the “Base” Version of the Record
For each ERX record with override contexts, you must configure the “base” version of that ERX record. This is just like configuring a simple ERX record.

Some settings MUST be made in the base record, while others are strongly recommended.

MUST be in base record	Strongly recommended
Naming (synonyms, order display name, and the order name)
Order Composer Configuration
Product-specific administration instructions
Medication, Administration, and Dispense units (not necessarily the Rnd Factors)
The equivalence table
Allow all options that might be used in ANY context:

Allowed order units
Allowed routes
Allowed inpatient frequencies
Any other settings (such as dose buttons, default dose, etc.) that will NOT vary from context to context.

Why include ALL allowed units/routes/frequencies in the base record? When you add a simple ERX record to a preference list or a SmartGroup, the allowed options available are based on the base version of the ERX record—not the override contexts.

Example	
Metoprolol tartrate tablets are usually ordered in “mg” for adults but in “mg/kg” or “mg/kg/day” for pediatric patients.

If the base record only allows “mg”, even if you allow “mg/kg” and “mg/kg/day” in the pediatric context, you can only select “mg” when you add this medication to a pediatric Order Set or preference list.

To avoid this, the base record should include all three allowed units: mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day.

If you plan to override an item in any override context, leave that item blank in the base ERX record. When users order this medication for a patient not covered by any of the override contexts or add it to a preference list (preference lists don’t have contexts), it’s safer to have NO defaults/buttons than potentially WRONG defaults/buttons.

Example	For metoprolol tartrate tablets, the dose buttons will be different for the Adult and Pediatric contexts. Those values should be left blank in the base ERX records. That way, if you order the ERX for a "John Doe" patient (whose age can't be determined), no dose buttons appear.
In Text, edit your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 25 MG PO TABS record, remove the dose buttons.

Hint: Use F1 to delete an entire row.
We're editing the 25 mg tablets, not the 50 mg tablets, because the 25 mg are the ones on your Facility List (the ones with the green dot). In the real world, you'd do this in all three strengths of metoprolol tartrate tablets. 
Step 2: Configure Override Contexts
In each override context, configure only the values that are specific to that context. Leave everything else blank; those values will come from the base version of the record. In the context, you can configure:

Defaults for frequency, number of doses/hours/days, rate, and admin duration
Dose buttons and the default dose
Default route (via the Allowed Routes table; if you use this, be sure to include the same allowed routes in the base record)
Default (patient-specific) administration instructions
Ordering instructions
Buttons for frequency, route, duration, and rate
Rounding factors and methods for the dosing units (Medication, Administration, and Dispense)
You can technically designate different allowed order units and allowed inpatient frequencies in an override context, but Epic strongly recommends against it.

To add an override context to an ERX record:

Open the record and page down once to Medication Override Contexts.
Type the name of the context you wish to add (such as “Adult”). Confirm your choice by saying “Yes”.
Configure the appropriate values for this context.
To leave the context, page down past the last screen of the context or press SHIFT+F7.
You return to the base ERX record, on the Medication Override Contexts screen.
To edit an existing override context, put your cursor on it and press F6.
In your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 25 MG PO TABS record, configure an adult override context as shown below.



Create a “Pediatric” context.

Dose buttons: 1 mg/kg/day, 2 mg/kg/day
No default dose
Put Overlapping Override Contexts in the Correct Order
If you create multiple, overlapping override contexts for a medication, be sure to list the more-specific context(s) first. The system uses the first override context which applies to the patient.

Example	The “Adult” context applies to any patient less than 140 years old. “Pediatric” applies to patients 14 and below. You must list “Pediatric” before “Adult”.




Make sure “Pediatric” comes before “Adult”.

Close your metoprolol tartrate record.

Critical	If you are using IMS for solids, you should configure the same override contexts in each strength of ERX record. This will ensure that the override contexts will have an effect when any of the ERX records are ordered. We are going to skip this step in class to save time.
In Hyperspace, remove any unsigned orders for Caleb. Search for and select order your trn### metoprolol tartrate tablet.

The Order Composer should open automatically.
Dose buttons should be: 25, 50, and 100 mg.
Open your Buffy (pediatric) patient and order your trn### metoprolol tartrate tablet.

The Order Composer should open automatically.
Dose buttons should be: 1 mg/kg/day and 2 mg/kg/day.
Critical	Override contexts cannot change the product being dispensed. IMS does that. Override contexts can, however, have an impact on whether IMS is allowed to work. If you configure dose buttons and allowed order units in an override context, they must be scientific units. 
Dispensing IMS Solids
Configuring Labels and Carts for IMS Solids
Individual IMS solids use the Dispense Code “Unit Dose”. You added rows to your Label Routing table earlier to cause labels to print for this dispense code.

When IMS decides to dispense a dose using multiple strengths, it creates a solid-form mixture on the fly. A solid-form mixture is a combination of solid products that your pharmacy dispenses for a single order. The products aren’t actually mixed together, they’re just dispensed and administered together. Epic selects the products to dispense, changes the dispense code to “Solid form mixture” and indicates that we are dispensing individual ingredients instead of combined ingredients. Epic will still print a single label to accommodate the multiple ingredients. 



In order to print labels for orders with the Solid form mixture dispense code, you must configure specific rows on your label routing table in addition to the Unit Dose rows:



Beyond the Basics	
How does that automatic switch occur?

When IMS dispenses two or more strengths of tablets for a single dose, it does so using an ERX record named ZZ_IMS_TEMPLATE. This record is a solid-form mixture that’s already built when you receive your copy of the Foundation System. You should rarely need to modify this record; contact your Epic representative before you do so.

If you’ve configured label routing for both the “Unit Dose” and “Solid form mixture” dispense codes, then label printing is configured for your IMS solids. Likewise, these meds will be included in the Unit Dose cart group.

 

Beyond the Basics: Administration
Beyond the Basics	This following section on Barcode Administration is beyond the basics. You may find it interesting or useful, but is not required.
Embedding Flowsheet Rows in the Administration Form

You can embed flowsheet rows in an IMS solid. Put the flowsheet rows in ALL strengths of the medication.

Barcode-Enabled Medication Administration

When barcode scanning, nurses don’t have to use the same products that IMS picked. They can scan any combination of IMS-interchangeable products that add up to the calculated dose. No special set-up is required.

You can also make tablets and capsules of the same drug interchangeable for barcode scanning. For more information, refer to the “Allow Barcodes Scanned for One Medication to Match Orders for Another Medication” section in the MAR Setup and Support Guide.

Configuring Charging for IMS Solids
In each strength of an IMS solid:

Add an appropriate linked procedure. IMS solids rarely have HCPCS codes and they’re self-administrable, so in the Foundation System, they will generally be linked to “HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS (ALT 250 FOR MEDICARE IP).”
Add a default charge method. Using the Foundation System’s charge methods, IMS solids will most often be “Unit Dose Standard,” but a few will be “Oral Bulk” or “Oral Chemotherapy.”
If IMS dispenses a combination of strengths for an order, charges will be generated for the individual ingredients.

Critical	You need to configure the procedure and default charge method in each strength. The system will use the linked procedure, charge method, and cost of the ERX(s) and/or NDC(s) dispensed rather than the ERX selected during order entry.
 

Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

What Order Composer Configuration (OCC) record should you attach to an IMS solid simple ERX record? Choose ONE answer only.
RX BULK PRODUCT NO DOSE REQUIRED
RX NON FORMULARY CONFIGURATION
RX SIMPLE MED
This is a trick question; IMS solids don’t need an OCC
C) RX SIMPLE MED. IMS solids are dosed medications. RX SIMPLE MED is the OCC to use for any medication that has the standard Dose, Route, Frequency, and Admin Instructions display items.

During training, a nurse super-user runs across the following situation. When ordering acetaminophen, she says, “I see only one hit on the Facility List tab: acetaminophen (Tylenol) tablet, with the dose of 325 mg. But when I dose the order at 500 mg and sign it, it shows up as 1 x 500 mg tab on the MAR. Is that supposed to happen?” What do you think is going on?
IMS has switched the product behind the scenes from the acetaminophen 325 mg PO tab to the 500 mg PO tab.

A pharmacist calls you to say that he is seeing a lot of matches for “warfarin (Coumadin) tablet” on the Facility List. What’s worse, some of them do not have the right information in them; warfarin orders should have questions in them that users must answer before signing. But only some of the warfarin (Coumadin) tablets on the Facility List have these questions. After some digging, you decide to take a look at the central pharmacy medication list. Based on what you see below, what is the problem?


Two problems: First, all of the warfarin ERX records have green dots, which means all of them are appearing on the Facility List. That’s not right! Only 1 of the warfarin ERX records (the smallest commercially available strength) should have a green dot, so that only 1 match appears on the Facility List.

The second problem is that only SOME of the warfarin ERX records appear to be configured with the necessary questions. This is causing the inconsistent behavior. All of the IMS-interchangeable ERX records should have the fields, buttons, and allowed options, so that no matter which of the ERX records are chosen, the end user sees the same thing. It sounds like some of these warfarin ERXs have the questions and others do not, which is bad build.

“But why is that bad build?” you might ask yourself. “If only 1 warfarin ERX (the smallest commercially available strength) has a green dot, then that’s the only one that needs to be attached to those questions, right?’ Wrong! The green dot in the central pharmacy med list controls which ERX appears on the Facility List. But the other warfarin ERXs might still be selected:
- A patient could have been taking one of the other strengths at home and the doctor could order it during med rec, or…
- A pharmacist could go to the Database tab and manually select one of the other strengths

Because the order composer’s fields, buttons, defaults, and allowed choices are based on the ERX you initially select, ALL strengths of IMS-interchangeable medications should look alike.

Your organization has decided that they’d like to have different dose buttons, default doses, and frequencies displaying in the Order Composer for ACETAMINOPHEN 325 MG PO TABS when it is ordered for kids. You configure a pediatric override context with pediatric-appropriate buttons and defaults. When you add the medication to a pediatric Order Set, the defaults that show up are for adults. What did you do wrong?
Instead of creating a pediatric override context and an adult override context, you created just a pediatric override context and kept the adult-specific buttons and defaults in the “base” version of the record. When you add an ERX record to an Order Set or preference list, the defaults come from the “base” version.

 

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

IMS

IMS solid

GPI/GMI/GPK

Override context

"Base" ERX record

Embedded flowsheet row

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Configure the Order Composer for an IMS solid

Configure charging for an IMS solid

Configure dosing units for an IMS solid

Configure label routing for an IMS solid

Attach a Doc Flowsheet (FLO) record to a Medication (ERX) record so that nurses can document on that row while administering the med

Configure the Order Display Name for a solid IMS medication

Enable IMS in the ERX record

Add the correct product for IMS to the appropriate medication lists

Add the correct product for IMS to the Facility List

Configure the order composer to appear with different defaults and buttons depending on the patient

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

Which Order Composer Configuration (OCC) is appropriate for an IMS solid

Why the Administration Rnd Factor of an IMS solid will usually be 1, 0.5, or 0.25 (and when each value is appropriate)

Why the Dispense Rnd Factor of an IMS solid will almost always be 1

On which Medication List (EFY) and Preference List (LPF) records an IMS solid should be

Why you don’t need to assign a default dispense code or cart group in the ERX record for an IMS solid

How IMS affects ordering

How IMS affects dispensing

Why the default Order Display Name might be confusing

How Epic picks products to dispense

How Epic chooses which override context to use for a patient

Why you don’t need to do anything to get most medications to appear correctly on the Brain

Why embedding a flowsheet row in the MAR can be helpful for certain medications

2. Repackaged Split Tablets
Introduction
Many organizations cut tablets in bulk and repackage the partial tablets. These partial tablets are dispensed like any other unit-dose medication. This can be safer and more cost-effective than asking nurses to split whole tablets on the floor. There’s less opportunity for error or contamination, and the nurse doesn’t have to throw away the unused portion of the pill.

Example	If a patient needs a 12.5 mg dose of metoprolol tartrate, you can dispense a 25 mg tablet and ask the nurse to split it on the floor. Alternately, a technician can split a few hundred 25 mg tablets in advance and repackage them individually. They can be loaded into an ADS cabinet, dispensed as first doses, and/or included on a cart fill.
In this chapter you will learn how to create a custom ERX record and NDC record for tablets split in bulk. You’ll also learn how to make the split tablets interchangeable with other IMS solids.

By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Create a custom simple ERX record for a repackaged split tablet
Create a custom NDC record for a repacked split tablet
Configure IMS for a split tablet
In-Class Exercises
For each unit-dose solid that you split and repackage in bulk, create a custom ERX record and a custom NDC record.

Example	Metoprolol tartrate is commercially available in 25 mg tablets; this ERX is provided by your third-party data load. If you split the 25 mg tablets into 12.5 mg half tablets, you need a new ERX record to represent that strength. You’ll also need an NDC to represent the split tablets.
Exercise: Creating a Repackaged Split tablet
Part 1: Build a Custom ERX record
In Text, navigate to the Medication prompt.
Path: Text >> Clinical Administration >> Meds, Allergens, Imm, etc. >> Medications (ERX)
At the Medication: prompt, type an "*" (SHIFT+8) and press ENTER. 
This tells the system to create a new record.
At the MED ID#: prompt, press ENTER to let the system assign an ID.
At the MEDICATION NAME: prompt, enter “TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 12.5 MG HALF TABLET” (replacing ### with your TRN###) and press ENTER. 
At the VERSION DATE: field, press ENTER. 
Indicate that it this ERX is configured.
In the Synonyms field enter “Lopressor”.
In the Linked procedure field, enter “HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS (ALT 250 FOR MEDICARE IP)” [6370000001].
Same as linked procedure in commercially available ERX.
Enter “No” in both the Prescribable and E-Prescribable fields.
Prevents this ERX from being ordered for outpatient or sent to an
e-prescribing interface.
Page down to the Clinical Medication Information screen. Enter the following:
Display Strength: 12.5 mg
Strength: 12.5
Strength Unit: mg (CAUTION! Don't forget this. It's on the far right!)
Form: tablet (use category value 55)
Route: Oral (use category value 15)
This information normally comes from your third-party data vendor.
Critical	The Strength and Strength Unit fields are particularly important. IMS uses those fields to identify the strength of each interchangeable product.
Page down to the Intelligent Medication Selection screen.
In the Use IMS when this medication is ordered field enter “Yes - Solids”.
Page to the Interaction Related Information screen.
In both the Proxy medication for interactions and filters and Proxy medication for dose checking fields enter “37637” and press TAB.
The proxy medication is a standard (third-party) ERX record. Use the record you are creating split tablets from.
Ensures the correct medication warnings (drug-drug, drug-allergy, dose, etc.) appear.
Tab down to the GPI field and enter “332000301003!!”.
Yes, you need to replace the last two numbers with “!!” at the end.
Epic uses this to determine which medications are interchangeable for things like IMS, barcode matching, and NDC linking.
Beyond the Basics	
How do I know what to put in the GPI field?

In a Medi-Span environment (like the training environment), you should copy the GPI from the commercially available whole tablet and change the last two digits to non-alphanumeric characters. It is important to change the last two digits because, if you don’t, it may charge incorrectly. Find it in Text, or follow these steps in Classic:

Click Record Viewer on the main toolbar.
INI: ERX
Record: the name or ID of the commercially available record (the one you are splitting)
Click View Record.
Ctrl + F and search for “GPI”
For vendors other than Medi-Span, the approach is similar but slightly different; talk to your Epic rep for details and check out Repackage Split Tabs in the Medication Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy.

​​​​​​Page down to the Facility Administered Packaging and Billing Settings screen.
Enter a Default charge Method of “Unit Dose Standard.”
Typically set this the same as the simple ERX record you are splitting.
Page down to the Inpatient Order Defaults screen.
This medication should look like this on preference lists: “trn### metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet”.
Just as a review, why are we not including the strength in the name for this medication? (This medication will use IMS, so the strength doesn’t matter to users when picking this item from a preference list.)
On the same screen set the following defaults:
Default Frequency: Daily [200001]
We could also set our default dose and dose buttons on this screen. We are going to leave those fields blank, however, because we will configure them in an override context soon.
Page down to the Medication Order Name Text screen.
Configure the order name to appear as follows:
Short name:  trn4## metoprolol tartrate
Brand name:  Lopressor
Inpatient suffix:  half tablet
“half tablet” makes it clear to nurses and clinician that this is part of a tablet.
On the next screen: do NOT include the strength or form in the order name.
Page down to the Rx Unit Equivalence screen.
This medication will be dosed in “mg”.
Hint: Configure the Medication unit.
The medication will be administered and dispensed as a “half tablet”.
Hint: Configure Administration unit and Dispense unit.
Neither pharmacy nor nursing will split these half tablets further.
Hint: Configure the Rnd Factor for Administration and Dispense.
Configure the Equiv Qty table to indicate that “12.5 mg” is equal to "1 half tablet", like so:
Equiv Qty          Unit​​​​​​
12.5                     mg
1                         half tablet                        
Beyond the Basics	There is a system-level equivalency that 1 tablet = 2 half tablets = 4 quarter tablets = 1 each. You don't need to define that here. (Just like you don't need to define that 1 g = 1000 mg.)
Your screen should look like this:

Page down the Rx Order Setup screen.
The only allowed units for this medication should be mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day.
This medication is given orally by default; however, if the patient has a G tube, Nasogastric tube or J tube the physician should be able to specify those as routes as well. Set that up.
Page down to the Dispense Code Configuration screen.
Split tablets are dispensed like any other unit dose medication, so the Default dispense code should be “Unit Dose” (or blank; “Unit Dose” is the system default.)
Page down to the Order Composer Configuration screen. Set the context to inpatient, and enter the OCC as “RX SIMPLE MED” [4080200001].
Page down to the “tic tac toe” screen. Add two frequency buttons: “Daily” [200001] and “2 times daily” [200006].
Remember, if you don't define frequency buttons, no buttons appear! 
Make “Oral” the only route. 
Remember, if you don't define route buttons, all the allowed routes you defined earlier will be buttons.  
Close and re-open your record. Page down once to the Medication Override Contexts screen. Add a “Pediatric” context with the following:
Dose buttons: 1 mg/kg/day, 2 mg/kg/day
No default dose
Create an “Adult” context with the following:
Dose buttons: 25 mg, 50 mg, 100 mg
No default dose
Confirm that your override contexts are listed in the right order! (Pediatric, then Adult)
Press SHIFT+F7.
Part 2: Build a Custom NDC
No NDCs exist for your custom-made “split tablet” of metoprolol. You’ll need to create one from scratch.

In Classic, go to Rx Admin >> NDC Admin.
Create a new NDC (replacing ### with your TRN###):
Formatted NDC code: TRN###-888-02
Raw 11 digit NDC code: TRN###88802
Linked medication: TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 12.5 MG HALF TABLET
In the Number of packages field enter “1”.
Affects restocking workflows if you are using Willow Inventory.
In the Package size field enter “1” and press TAB.
In the Units field enter “half tablet”.
In the Package Description field select “Package”.
In the Implied unit field, enter “Single Package Unit”.
This way, when we get an ADS Dispense interface message that says the nurse pulled “1” of these packages, we interpret it as “1 half tablet” instead of “1 each” (which is wrong).
Likewise, when the nurse scans one of these packages, Epic will interpret it as scanning “1 half tablet” instead of “1 each.”
Click the Billing form.
Enter “0378-0018-01” in the NDC to send to billing field.
Payers won’t recognize custom NDCs on claims.
You’re sending the NDC you use to create your half-tablets.
Click the Cost Info form.
In the Cost to use for billing field, enter “0.024” and select Cost is per half tablet.
This is the cost of half of a tablet.
This cost must be updated manually; it is not connected to the cost set in the whole tablet record.
Click Close.
Part 3: Add Your Custom ERX and NDC to Your Medication Lists
Still in Classic, open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST. (Hint: Rx Admin >> Medication List Admin)
Click Edit. Then, click Add. In the Medication field, search for and select your TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 12.5 MG HALF TABLET.
Put a checkmark next your custom NDC (TRN###-888-02).
You’ll also see the NDCs made by your classmates, because you all used the same GPI in your ERX records.
Click Accept.
Remove the green dot next to your half tablet. There should only be a green dot next to the 25 mg strength, the lowest-strength commercially available ERX record.
Close your central pharmacy med list. 
Open your TRN### HOSPITAL FORMULARY. (Hint: Rx Admin >> Medication List Admin)
Add your half tablet and click Accept. 
Close all medication lists.
Part 4: Test Your Work
Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
In Caleb’s chart, discontinue any active orders. (Pick an order mode and provider.)
Click the +New and search for “trn### met half” on the Database tab. Select the metoprolol tartrate (Lopressor) tablet with 12.5 mg in the Strength column and click Accept.
The Order Composer should automatically open.
Confirm that your order name includes "half tablet" at the end.
Confirm that there is no default dose, and you have three dose buttons: 25 mg, 50 mg, and 100 mg.
Enter a dose of 12.5 mg.
Confirm that the Calculated dose is “1 half tablet.”
If so, proceed to step 6. 
If you see "0.5 tablet" instead, and the Product changes to your 25 mg tablet, then:
Open your half tablet ERX record in Text. Page down to the Clinical Medication Information screen. At the bottom confirm that Strength is "12.5" and Strength Unit (on the right) is "mg".
Then open your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List in classic. Confirm that your TRN### metoprolol half tablet is there, and that you have a check mark next to your NDC. Then Close the list.
SHIFT+F7 and start this part of the exercise over.
In the bottom of the Order Composer, in the Dispense section, confirm that:
Product shows TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 12.5 MG HALF TABLET
Package shows "1 half tab Package (TRN###-888-02)". (Click the  button to see the whole NDC.)
Change the dose to 25 mg. What happens?
The Calculated dose is now “0.5 tablet” (not “1 half tablet”).
The order name also changes to say “tablet” instead of “half tablet.”
The Dispense from field changes to “TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS”
The Product changes to the standard TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 MG PO TABS record, one that was imported from the 3rd-party data.
The Package changes to the 100-each bottle that is on your ADS cabinet’s medication list.
If you see the above changes, continue on to step 8.
If you do NOT see the changes above, and the calculated dose is "2 half tablet" and the Product is still your half tablet, then IMS is not working. 
Open your half tablet ERX record in Text.  
Page down to the Intelligent Medication Selection screen. You should have "Yes - Solids" in the first field. 
Page down to the Interaction Related Information screen. Confirm that the GPI is "332000301003!!" (including the !!)
Page down to the Rx Unit Equivalency screen. You should have "mg" in the Medication Unit field. 
Page down to the Rx Order Setup screen. Allowed Order Units must be populated, and should have only: mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day.
SHIFT+F7 and start this part of the exercise over. 
Change the dose back to 12.5 mg and click Include now.
Click Sign to sign and auto-verify the order. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Go to Order Hx for your metoprolol tartrate order.
Hint: Go to the Medications activity.
You should see at least one Dispense action with a green +, like this:
Select the Dispense (First Dose) row. Scroll down to the bottom of the report.
Confirm that you see the following charge information:

Part 5: Configure for Compounding & Repackaging
You might want to use Epic’s Compounding and Repackaging activity to track the creation of split tablets and to print repackaging labels for them.

In Text, open your trn### metoprolol tartrate 12.5 mg half tablet.
On the first screen, in the CNR type field, enter “Repackaging Record”.
Page down to the Repackaging Settings screen.
Configure the fields as follows:
Shelf life: 365 days
(controls the expiration date that prints on any labels)
Label SmartText: Rx Label - Compounding and Repackaging [40800000021]
(label that will print for each half tablet produced)
Source ERX: TRN### METOPROLOL TARTRATE 25 MG PO TABS
(ERX record for whole tablets that you’ll use to create the half tablets)
Default NDC: 0378-0018-01
(NDC of the whole tablets that you’ll use to create the half tablets)
In the bottom right corner, under the NDC field, enter “TRN###-888-02”
This is the NDC for the half tablets that you’ll be producing.
If you can NOT get your NDC to populate this field, then go to Classic >> Rx Admin >> NDC Admin. Edit your TRN###-888-02. Make sure that the Package size field (not the Count field, the Package Size field) is "1" and the Unit field is "half tablet". Close the NDC and try again in Text. 
Press SHIFT+F7.
In Hyperspace, go Pharmacy >> “Compounding and Repackaging”.
In the Medication to Produce field, enter your trn### metoprolol tartrate half tablet.
When a Select Batch Options window displays, specify that you want to create 100 half tablets. Do not change any of the other details.

Click Accept.
Notice that there is missing required information for your only ingredient, the 25 mg metoprolol tartrate tablet. Click on the ingredient to see what you are missing.
You need to enter a lot number, expiration date, and the quantity of whole tablets you are using.
In the real world, you'd usually scan the NDC barcode from the packages you were actually splitting.
In the Lot Number field, enter any string of characters.
In the real world, the lot number and expiration date come from the actual bottle of pills you’re splitting.
The system stores this information with this batch of repackaged tablets, so you can track them down in case of a recall.
In the Expiration Date field, enter “m+6” and press TAB.
The Shelf Life and Beyond-use date at the top of the screen update to match the expiration date you just entered.
Before, they were 365 days from now (the default you set in your split-tablet ERX record). But the tablets you’re using to create these half tablets expire sooner. The system uses the earlier of the two expiration dates.
In the Quantity field, enter “100”.
The Quantity used field updates to “100 half tablet.” It can be a little confusing to see half tablets here instead of tablets or eaches, but currently, this is the best way to prevent charging and interfacing errors. We are creating 100 half tablets.
Click Print Labels and select a Label Printer of “RXLBL”.
Notice that we are going to print 100 labels for 100 half tablets.
Click Print.
The system prints 100 labels.
You can see a preview of the printed label in the right sidebar in the Label Preview box.
Pretend you are the technician and you’ve just completed splitting, repacking, and labeling these half tablets. At the bottom of the screen, click Technician Final Check to sign off.
User ID: RXTECH
Password: epic
The batch will be sent off to a review step. You can see it on the Batches in Progress tab. You might need to click on you Alex user next to "Batches for". Make a note of the control number. _________________________
Now pretend you are a pharmacist who would like to check the technician's work. Go to the Pharmacist Queue (the tab with the green check in the upper left corner).
On the Compounding and Repackaging Check tab, click Manual Entry (look in the far top left corner of the activity) and type in the control number you just noted.
Look over the details that the pharmacist sees during their check. It is very similar to what you saw while preparing the split tablets.
Click Pharmacist Final Check. Yes, you are sure. Then, enter your password ("train"). 
Beyond the Basics	For more information, see the Compounding and Repackaging Medications Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy.
Key Takeaways
Configuring split tablets is similar to configuring IMS solids. This section will review settings that are different. For additional settings refer back to the previous chapter.

Creating the Custom ERX Record
Mark it as not prescribable or e-prescribable.
Enter a Strength and Strength Unit.
Remember to set Use IMS when this medication is ordered? to “Yes”.
Medi-Span customers, enter a GPI:
Copy the value from the whole tablet ERX record, but change the last two digits to non-alphanumeric, such as “!!”.
For example, if the value is “33200030100305” in METOPROLOL 25 MG PO TABS, make it “332000301003!!” in the 12.5 mg split tabs.
FDB, G-Standaard, and other non-U.S. customers: see the section of the Medication Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy called Repackage into Fractional Tablets for more information.
Enter the ERX record you are creating splits from in the Proxy medication for interactions and filters and Proxy medication for dose checking fields.
These fields ensure your custom ERX triggers medication warnings that the original ERX would trigger.
The Order Name is the same, except for the suffix which should represent the size of the split tablet (i.e. "half tablet" or "quarter tablet").
The Administration and Dispense Units are “half tablet” (or "quarter tablet) instead of “tablet”.
Equiv Qty table has two lines:
1 half tablet (or 1 quarter tablet, if you are quartering tablets instead of halving)
_____ mcg/mg/etc. (reflects strength of each split tablet)
The equivalency between “1 tablet” and “2 half tablet” and "4 quarter tablet" is configured at the system level, and prevents issues with charging.

Creating the Custom NDC Record
Link it to your custom split-tablet ERX record.
Indicate that its package size is “1 half tablet” (or "1 quarter tablet" if you are quartering tablets).
Set the Implied Unit to “Single Package Unit” (to support barcode scanning, and interfaces with ADS/robots/carousels).
Configure it to send a real, commercially available NDC to billing.
Assign a cost to use for billing. This must be updated manually; it will not come from the whole tablet NDC.
Add to Medication Lists
Add the split tablet to your formulary, your central pharmacy medication list, and the medication lists of any dispense locations that stock the split tablet.
Be sure to select (check in the M column) your custom NDC.
In the central pharmacy med list, make sure that this ERX does not have a green dot next to it. The smallest commercially available strength should have a green dot, and split tablets are not commercially available.
 

Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

Ibuprofen tablets are commercially available in 200 mg, 400 mg, and 800 mg strengths. If your pharmacy split the 400 mg tablets and repackaged them as 200 mg tablets, would you have to create a custom ERX record, a custom NDC record, or both?
Both. Although the 200 mg tablets exist commercially, you need to create a custom ERX to represent your half tablet. Otherwise, the nurses could get confused because the MAR is telling them to administer a “tablet,” but they are holding a half tablet. This could lead to administration errors.

You are creating a custom ERX record for PREDNISONE 25 MG PO TABS. This record represents the 50 mg prednisone tablets that you have split and repackaged for dispensing. What fields do you need to populate correctly to allow IMS to switch between the existing strengths of prednisone tablets and the custom ERX record you are creating? (Assume that you are using Medi-Span.)
First, you must configure the Strength & Unit fields on the Clinical Information Screen with a scientific unit like MG. Second, if Medi-Span is your third-party vendor, the GPI field (for Generic Product Index). You should also have an allowed order unit in MG that matches your Strength Unit, and have your Medication Unit in MG. You should also say Yes to Use IMS? Although that technically only matters if the half, 25 mg tablet is the one initially selected.

Suppose you created your PREDNISONE 25 MG PO TABS record. You’ve configured the fields in the previous question correctly, created a custom NDC, and otherwise set up the custom ERX record correctly. But when you order “prednisone tablets” and enter a dose of 25 mg, IMS decides to dispense a 20 mg tablet and 5 mg tablet from the central pharmacy instead of your 25 mg tablet.

What step did you forget to do?
You forgot to add the PREDNISONE 25 MG PO TABS (the custom ERX record) to your central pharmacy’s medication list. IMS won’t use products that aren’t on that list.

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

Custom ERX record

Custom NDC record

Repackaged split tablet

Intelligent Medication Selection (IMS)

Proxy medication

Generic Product Index (GPI) or Generic Medication Identifier (GMI)

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Create a custom ERX record to represent a repackaged split tablet

Create a custom NDC record to represent a repackaged split tablet

Configure IMS for a repackaged split tablet

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

Why you might need to create a custom ERX record

Why you might need to create a custom NDC record

What field IMS uses to identify medications that are “interchangeable” with each other

Why you should enter a proxy medication for a custom ERX record

Why you should use a dispense and administration unit of “half tablet” (instead of “tablet”) when creating an ERX record for a repackaged split table

Why you should enter the commercially available whole tablet in the NDC to Send To Billing field in a custom NDC.

3. Day 1 Lab
Introduction
The first two lab exercises (Part 1 and Part 2) present you with unguided challenges. They will reinforce and apply what you’ve learned already and will test your understanding of that knowledge. Work through these exercises on your own. Get as far as you can in the time you have. If you get stuck, ask your instructor for assistance.

The remaining parts of the lab are labeled “If You Have Time.” They present new challenges and information, and cover material that will NOT be included on your project or exam.

Part 1: Fix Your Warfarin Tablets
You’ve been asked to fix a medication. First, take a look at what is wrong with it.

Identify Problems with Your Oral Solid
Beyond the Basics	
Use the blank spaces below each configuration requirement to write down what you plan to do in the system. Research shows that writing out complex plans helps your brain to retain learning long term.

If you view this training companion in Galaxy with the answers visible, the solutions to each problem will appear in those blank spaces.

Log in to Hyperspace as your Pharmacist (RX##/train). 
Go to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Enter “warfarin” in the Place orders or order sets field. Go to the Facility List tab. 
PROBLEM: There are several matches for warfarin here on the Facility List tab. Your trn### warfarin should be here (but it is not), and it should be the only choice.
You'll need to add your TRN### Warfarin to the TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List, check an NDC, and remove the green dots from the other Warfarin ERXs that are already on the list.

Go to the Database tab.
Look up “TRN### WARFARIN” (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).
PROBLEM: The only result is for “trn755 warfarin (Coumadin) tablet 1 mg”. “755” should be your TRN### instead.
PROBLEM: The strength of the tablet appears in the name. You don’t want it to.
You need to edit the Order Display Name to fix both of the problems above. 

Let’s confirm that this is actually your TRN### WARFARIN record. Cancel the search window without choosing anything.
Close Caleb’s chart.
Go to Epic and search for “Report/HTML Assistance”. Select that option, and click OK.
Open Caleb’s chart.
Search for TRN### WARFARIN again.
On the Database tab, right-click on the Medications heading and choose Show troubleshooting columns.

An additional column called OTLID will appear in your search window. Expand it by dragging to the right to see the record name. It should have your TRN### in it:

Great! This is the record you were searching for. Select and accept “trn755 warfarin (Coumadin) tablet 1 mg.”
Turn off the hidden information that is now showing by going back to the Epic button and selecting “Report/HTML Assistance” again. Click OK.
Open the order composer for your warfarin order:
PROBLEM: The order name starts with trn755. Instead of 755, you should see the TRN### from your class info sheet.
You need to change the Medication Short Name in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.

PROBLEM: You find “tablet tablet” in the order name.
You need to set Include form in order name to "No" in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.

PROBLEM: The Package field says "Medication not on med list". 
When you add this ERX to your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List, you need to put a check mark next to an NDC.  

Enter a dose of 1 mg.
PROBLEM: There is an error message for the Calculated dose.
You need to fill in the Equiv Qty and Unit table in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.

Select a dose of 5 mg. 
PROBLEM: IMS does not switch the Product to the 2.5 or 5 mg tablets.
You need to set Use IMS when this medication is ordered? to "Yes - Solids" in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.

Select the Daily frequency button.
PROBLEM: The scheduled administration times starting tomorrow are 0900. Warfarin should be given in the evening. 
You need to change the Frequency button in your in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS. See step 20 for the specific frequency to use. Be sure to change this on the Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections form (i.e. the "tic tac toe" screen). 

Select the Once frequency button.
PROBLEM: The scheduled administration is “now.” It should be at 1700 tonight.
You need to change the Frequency button in your in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS. See step 20 for the specific frequency to use. Be sure to change this on the Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections form (i.e. the "tic tac toe" screen). 

In the Frequency field, click the magnifying glass. 
PROBLEM: All frequencies are available. Only warfarin-specific frequencies should be allowed.
Let's find the correct frequencies now before you go on to fix these issues.
In the Frequency field, search for "warfarin".  Write down the IDs of the ones that should be used for warfarin:
  Daily: 200055
  Once: 200903
Hint: There are three frequency fields to configure in the ERX record: frequency buttons, allowed frequencies, and default frequency. If any of them have the incorrect frequencies, clear them out before attempting to fix this problem.
Fix the Problems
Now fix the problems you just identified. Then test your oral solid using the steps below.

Test Your Oral Solid (and Find Two New Problems)
Follow these steps and evaluate each “CHECK” statement to see if you have met the requirements above.

In Hyperspace, open Caleb’s chart. (Hint: If it’s already open, CLOSE it before testing!)
Click +New to open the Order and Order Set Search window.
Search for “warfarin”.
CHECK: On the Facility List tab you see one match for warfarin. The name is “trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet” where ### is the TRN### from your class info sheet.
Hint: If you think you fixed this, but it doesn’t seem to have worked, ask yourself—did you fix your ERX record before or after adding it to your med list?
Beyond the Basics	
If you fixed the ERX after adding it to your med list, then:

Go back to Classic and open your central pharmacy med list.
Remove the green dot from your TRN### WARFARIN, then click Read Only to save your change and remove the warfarin from the linked pref list.
Click Edit, put the green dot back, and click Read Only again (to save your change and add the warfarin back with the corrected display name).
Return to Hyperspace and start this section over.
Alternatively:

Go back to Classic and open your central pharmacy med list.
Click Link Pref. List
Click Rebuild Preference List, yes you are sure.
Close your med list, then return to Hyperspace and start this section over.
Select the order and click Accept.
CHECK: The order composer opens automatically.
CHECK: The order name is “trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet” where ### is the TRN### from your class info sheet.
Enter a dose of 1 mg.
CHECK: The system displays a Calculated dose of 1 tablet. The order name is now trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet 1 mg”.
CHECK: The Package field shows an NDC (doesn't matter which one). 
Change the dose to 5 mg.
CHECK: The Product changes to WARFARIN SODIUM 5 MG PO TABS.
CHECK: The dispense code is “Hazardous Unit Dose” (because warfarin is technically poisonous; it needs to be handled with special care).
PROBLEM: No labels will print for hazardous unit dose meds! You never added rows for that dispense code to your Label Routing table.
When you dispense a first dose for hazardous unit dose medications, you should print label “RX LABEL - UNIT DOSE” to the TRN CENTRAL 1ST DOSE/REDISPENSE printer. (Note: Yes, this is the same label that we use for unit dose medications, however, there is a rule-based banner that will appear at the top of the label whenever the dispense code is Hazardous Unit Dose.)
This label should print for both PRN and non-PRN first doses, and when you redispense a hazardous unit dose. If multiple doses are dispensed at once, they should print on a single label.
You need to add three rows to the label routing table in your central pharmacy using the information above. 

Change the dose back to 1 mg.
CHECK: The Product changes to your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.
PROBLEM: The dispense code changes to plain old “Unit Dose.” It should be “Hazardous Unit Dose”.
Change the dispense code in your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS to Hazardous Unit Dose. 

Select the Once frequency. Then select Daily.
CHECK: The scheduled administration times are 1700.
Click Include Now to ensure a dose is dispensed when you verify it.
Click Sign. Pick an order mode and provider. 
If you see an order validation window pop up, click Accept. It is a tool for analyzing performance data, and it will only appear if you haven't disabled the Report/HTML Assistance that we enabled earlier.
Go to Order Hx for the order.
PROBLEM: You see that no charge was generated for the dispense of this order.
Fix the New Problems and Resubmit the Charge
Configure your warfarin and your pharmacy so that:

When you dispense a first dose (or redispense a dose) of your warfarin, it prints the “Rx Label – Unit Dose” label to the correct printer, just like other unit dose medications. However, the label will include a Hazardous banner across the top.
When you dispense your warfarin tablet, the system generates a charge correctly using the following information:
Warfarin tablets do not have a HCPCS code assigned, and they are considered self-administrable. 
A charge for warfarin tablets should calculate just like any other unit dose medication in the system.
Based on this information, the Linked Procedure in the ERX record should be HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS [6370000001]. See RX305 Lesson 11. 

Because it's like every other warfarin, you can check another warfarin ERX record for the correct Charge Method. Charge Maps and Charge Tables are already configured in your environments, so the charge method is the key to have the system calculate a charge correctly. 

Once you think you’ve fixed these problems, test it:

In Hyperspace, go to the Orders activity for Caleb. Discontinue any active warfarin orders. (Pick an order mode and provider.)
Order your trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet with a dose of 1 mg and frequency of “Once.”
Click Sign & Verify. Override any duplicate therapy warnings. Pick an order mode and provider. 
CHECK: The dispense code should be “Hazardous Unit Dose.”
Click Label Preview.
CHECK: The label that appears should say “Hazardous - PPE required” across the top.
Close the label preview.
Click Verify.
Go to the Medications activity. Select the active trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet 1 mg order and click Order Hx.
CHECK: You see a green plus in the “dollar bill” column for the Dispense (First Dose) action.
There is a minimum charge of $3.00 built into the Charge Table for unit dose medications, so the charge for your warfarin will be at least $3.00 (the specific charge will vary based on what NDC you indicated you have in stock on your central pharmacy med list). 
Part 2: Create a Half Tablet for Warfarin
Read all of the requirements before starting to build. Once you are finished building, come up with a plan for testing your split tablet, and then test it!

Creating ERX record in Text

Name: TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 0.5 MG HALF TABLET (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).

 

Configuring the Order Composer

The order composer should match your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TAB record except for the following:
- The Order Name should start with your trn### and should say “half tablet” instead of “tablet”
- When the dose is 0.5 mg, the Calculated Dose and Dispense Amount should be “1 half tablet” instead of “0.5 tablet”.
- Nurses cannot split the half tablets. "1 half tablet" is the smallest amount they can administer. 
- Tip: You can launch two sessions of Text and the same time, and access the 1 MG record as you configure your new record!

 

Enabling IMS

Interchangeable with the existing, commercially available WARFARIN SODIUM PO TAB records, including your TRN### record from Part 1.

It should trigger drug-drug, allergy, and other warnings as if it was “WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TAB” [11664] (not your TRN### copy). 

 

Configuring Charging

Charge calculates just like any other unit dose medication.

Charge is sent to the Charge Router.

 

Creating a Custom NDC record

NDC code: TRN###-888-88 (replacing ### with your TRN###).

Each package is 1 half tablet. (Don't forget the Implied Unit!)

The NDC that appears on the bill is the same as the one used for your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.
- Hint: You'll need to check your central pharmacy med list to see which NDC you selected. 

Its cost should be 1/2 of the cost of the NDC you use for your TRN### WARFARIN SODIUM 1 MG PO TABS.
- Hint: You'll need to edit the NDC that you used in the previous step, find its cost to use for billing, and do some math!   

 

Adding to Medication and Preference Lists

If this were added to a preference list, it would appear as: trn### warfarin (Coumadin) tablet

It's approved for use

It's available in your hospital, using your custom NDC.

When a user searches for warfarin, this record should NOT appear on the Facility List tab; it's not the smallest commercially available strength. 

If You Have Time: Configure a Unit Dose Compound
In this exercise, you’ll configure one strength of Percocet tablets, a brand name for oxycodone-acetaminophen, a narcotic painkiller. Percocet is an example of a unit dose compound. Unit dose compounds are single tablets or capsules that contain more than one active ingredient. Their setup is similar to that of IMS solids, except:

Because there are multiple active ingredients, they are dosed in units of "tablet" or "capsule" rather than "mg" or "mcg"
Because they are dosed in "tablet" or "capsule," they can't use IMS. Users must pick a specific strength of product from the Preference List, Facility List, or Database.  
Part 1: Configure Your ERX Record
Configure your TRN### OXYCODONE-ACETAMINOPHEN 5-325 MG PO to meet the following needs:

Users should be able to find this record by searching for Percocet, Endocet, or Roxicet (all of these are brand names for this drug).
Willow should generate a charge for this med. Use…
The same linked procedure as the metoprolol tartrate tablet [6370000001].
A default charge method of “Unit Dose Standard”.
This medication will NOT use IMS. 
On search results, it should appear as: trn### oxyCODONE-acetaminophen (Percocet) tablet 5-325 mg (replace ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet)
The medication’s Order Name and Order Composer should appear like so:

Hint: the "1 tablet" at the end of the order name is the dose and appears automatically. "5-325 MG" is the vendor-imported strength, and "per tablet" is the suffix. 
Nurses can cut these tablets in half, but pharmacy will always dispense whole tablets.
Users can only order this as “tablet”. 
Users can only order it with a route of Oral, Per J Tube, Per G Tube, and Nasogastric.
All frequencies are allowed.
HINT: Configure PRN Reasons on the Inpatient PRN Settings screen.
When nurses administer this medication, the Flowsheet Row “R PAIN SCORE” [3040104280] should appear in the Med Administration form.
Part 2: Add Your Medication to Your Lists
TRN### OXYCODONE-ACETAMINOPHEN 5-325 MG PO TABLETS are:

Approved for use in your hospital.
Stocked in central pharmacy (using NDC 0406-0512-05, a 500-each bottle) and should appear on your Facility List tab.
Part 3: Test Your Work
Log into Hyperspace as your Pharmacist (RX##/train). Go to the Orders activity for your Caleb patient. Then:

Click the +New button to search for “trn### Percocet” (replace ### with your TRN###)
It should be on your Facility List tab, and appear like so:
trn### oxyCODONE-acetaminophen (Percocet) tablet 5-325 mg
Double-click your med (or single click the med and click Accept).
Compare the Order Composer to the screenshot above. (Fix any problems you find.)
Enter a dose of 0.65 tablet. The calculated dose should round to 0.5 tablet, with an error. 
Change the dose 0.5 tablet.
Look at the Dispense section of the Order Composer. You should see:
The Package field show a 500 Each Bottle.
The Dispense amount is 1 tablet.
If everything looks right, change the dose back to 1 tablet and click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider (If you receive any warnings, you can override them).  

Is it flagged as Non-Formulary? (It should not be.)
Is the Dispense Code “Unit Dose?” (It should be.)
Part 4: Configure Dispensing for This Medication
If you were dispensing from central pharmacy, you’d be done. Percocet will be included on your unit dose cart and labels will print. However, since Percocet is a C-II controlled substance you want it to be dispensed only from an ADS cabinet.

Open your TRN### 4-South unit and examine the dispense logic (Classic >> Rx Admin >> Unit/Department Admin).
Percocet should come from your ADS, but it’s not currently loaded. When an order is verified:
A “load label” should print in central pharmacy.
The MAR should show “trn### Pharmacy to Load in ADS” as the dispense location.
Add your TRN### OXYCODONE-ACETAMINOPHEN 5-325 MG PO TABS to the appropriate medication list for this workflow to happen.
Do you need to choose an NDC when you add this to the medication list? Why or why not?
No, the NDC will come from the central pharmacy med list because that med list is attached to your TRN### LOAD TO ADS pharmacy.

Close the Medication List.
Back in Hyperspace >> Caleb's chart >> Verify Orders, refresh Dispense Details to see if your change worked.
Part 5: BONUS – Enable Daily Dose Tracking
Percocet contains acetaminophen, which is found in many other drugs. Patients shouldn’t get more than 3 g of acetaminophen in a 24-hour period. While the third-party vendor data includes dose warnings, they can only flag users about potential overdoses within a single order. If you want the system to track daily dosages across multiple orders, you need to configure daily dose tracking.

To do this:

In Text, open your TRN### OXYCODONE-ACETAMINOPHEN 5-325 MG PO TABLETS record.
Page down to the Rx Chemical Information screen. Configure the first row like so:

Close your record.
Back in Hyperspace, verify Caleb’s Percocet order.
Find Percocet on the MAR and expand the order details (Hint: click the Summary Sentence, not the Order Name.)
Look at the acetaminophen details on the right side.
Document an administration (click under the current time column). Enter a pain score of 4.
Click Accept.
Look at the order details on the MAR again.
Note the Acetaminophen information now it shows that 325 mg have been given (because you documented giving 1 tablet of Percocet, and each tablet includes 325 mg of acetaminophen).
In the Foundation System, acetaminophen has already been configured as a chemical to be tracked daily, with a max daily dose of 3,000 mg.
4. Injections and Oral Liquids
Introduction
Injections and oral liquids represent a substantial amount of the orders that pharmacies dispense.

 	Administered…	Dispensed as…
Injections	
Through an IV port
Intramuscularly (IM)
Subcutaneously
All at once, or relatively quickly
Unit-dose syringes
Custom drawn syringes
Oral Liquids	
By mouth (oral)
Through a tube
G tube
NG tube
J tube
All at once
Unit-dose oral syringes
Unit-dose cups
Custom drawn syringes

These two types of medications have a great deal in common. In particular:

They often come in multiple concentrations of the same drug. Each concentration is a separate ERX record.
Because they are liquids, they can be dosed very precisely.
Often used for both adult patients and pediatric patients.
Default values and buttons might need to change based on the patient for whom the medication is being ordered.
Often come in multiple package sizes.
May be dispensed as unit-dose syringes/cups/vials, or drawn up as custom syringes with the exact dose needed.
You might even “prepack” them, creating custom packages (and NDCs) for common doses.
Example	
Furosemide (Lasix) is used to treat edema (fluid retention). It’s available as oral tablets, an injection, and an oral liquid. At your trn### Hospital, you stock the injection and oral liquid.

For the oral liquid, you carry the 10 mg/mL strength and stock 4 mL unit-dose cups and 120 mL bottles. You use the bottle to draw custom doses, and you prepack 1 mL, 2 mL, and 3 mL oral syringes.

By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Configure dosing units for injections and oral liquids
Change an order’s dispense code based on the volume being dispensed
Create an NDC for product that has been “prepacked”
Enable and configure Intelligent Package Selection (IPS)
Configure label printing for custom-drawn syringes
Beyond the Basics	This chapter covers injections and oral syringes that are commercially available (simple ERXs). If you create a syringe with a combination of ingredients (for example, by diluting a drug in normal saline or D5W), that will be a mixture record. These are discussed in the chapters on Main Ingredient Mixtures and Configuring IV Piggybacks.
Configuring Naming
Injections and oral liquids follow the usual naming conventions, with a few considerations:





In both oral liquids and injections:

Include the strength in the Order Display Name if there are multiple strengths available (users should know what product they're ordering)
If only one strength is available, there's no need to include it in the Order Display Name
Do not display the strength in the order name (it doesn't add much value, and can be confused with the dose) 
Configuring Dosing Units
 

Example	FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML PO SOLN is dosed in mg, mg/kg, or mg/kg/day. There are 10 mg of furosemide in each mL of solution, so you’d configure the Rx Unit Equivalence screen like so:


Rx Unit Equivalence screen settings for oral liquids and injections

How Does Epic Use and Calculate Dosing Units?
Dosing units are straightforward with solid medications. The Medication Unit is the unit the drug is dosed in; the Administration and Dispense Units are either capsules or tablets and the Rnd Factor represents whether the pill can be split.

Liquid medications are more complicated. With liquids, you’re much more likely to have complex, weight-based doses (such as “mg/kg” or “mg/kg/day”). And theoretically, you can measure a liquid dose very precisely. That means you have a wider range of possible doses. It’s important to understand what each dosing unit is and how Epic calculates each.

At a high level, here’s how dosing units work:

Simplify the ordered dose, by converting it into the Medication Unit.
Convert the simplified ordered dose into the Administration Unit, and apply the Administer Rnd Factor. The resulting value is one of two values called the calculated dose. Take that value and convert it back into the Medication Unit. This is the other calculated dose value, and it represents the amount of medication the patient will actually receive.
Convert the calculated dose into the Dispense Unit and apply the Dispense Rnd Factor. This is the dispense amount.
Critical	
The system performs the steps above for any medication order that has a discrete dose (and for each ingredient of a mixture).

We’re discussing the process in the context of oral liquids and injections because this is the first group of medications we’ve discussed where the details of this process are important.

Step 1: Simplify the Ordered Dose


Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train). Order your trn### furosemide for Buffy, select a dose of "0.5 mg/kg", and hover over the i icon to see dose calculations.

Beyond the Basics	If the ordered dose is in a unit listed in the Other medication field, the system won’t simplify it to the Medication Unit. It will use the ordered dose’s unit instead. Use the Other medication field for drugs that are commonly ordered in different units (such as both “mg” and “g”).
Standardized Dosing
Some pharmacies use standardized dosing to reduce pharmacy workload when dispensing complex doses (doses in units such as “mg/kg” or “mg/day”).

Example	
Your furosemide oral solution is commercially available in 4-mL unit-dose cups, 60 mL bottles, and 120 mL bottles. Your pharmacy “prepacks” the 120 mL bottles into standardized oral syringes: 1 mL (10 mg), 2 mL (20 mg), and 3 mL (30 mg).

If a complex dose is within 10% of any of those syringes or the 4 mL cups, you’ll dispense a unit-dose package rather than draw a custom syringe.



Beyond the Basics	If the Maximum deviation percentage from standard dose field is blank in the ERX record, there is a system-wide default. In the Foundation System, this is configured to 10%.
Alternately, you can define upper and lower bounds for each dose (instead of a maximum deviation percentage) and/or a rounding factor (instead of specific standardized doses). You’ll see examples of this in the IV Piggyback chapter.

Configure your furosemide to match the screenshot above then close your record.

Order it for Buffy with a dose of 1 mg/kg. 

Confirm that a dose of 1 mg/kg simplifies like so:



Critical	
By default, Standardized Dosing Only Works for Complex Doses!

Standardized dosing only occurs if the ordered dose is in a complex unit, such as a weight-based (mg/kg) or daily (mg/day) dosing unit. If a dose is in the simple Medication Unit, the system does NOT apply standardized doses.

When you ordered furosemide with a dose of 1 mg/kg for Buffy (who weighs 29.3 kg), standardized dosing occurs and the simplified ordered dose is 30 mg.

If you enter a dose of “29.3 mg,” the system uses that dose. It’s already in the Medication Unit (“mg”), so there’s nothing to simplify. (And if a user intentionally types “29.3 mg,” that’s probably exactly what they want.)

Beyond the Basics	To allow standardized dosing to work for simple dosing units, in the ERX record on the Rx Standardized Dosing screen, set Enable standardized dosing for simple units to "Yes".
Step 2: Convert and Round to Calculate the Calculated Dose

The calculated dose is the physical amount of product the nurse will give to the patient. It's represented by two equivalent values. One value uses the Administration Unit, and the other value uses the Medication Unit. 

The Calculated Dose, in the Administration Unit
First, Epic uses the Equiv Qty and Unit table to convert between the simplified ordered dose and the Administration Unit.



Once the dose has been converted into the administration unit, the system applies the Administration Rnd Factor. The value that results is part of the calculated dose.



Beyond the Basics	If you are charging on administration for a medication, the charge is based on the calculated dose.
The System Level Liquid Rounding Table
The System Level Liquid Rounding Table is used when:

Administration Unit is “mL”.
Administration Rnd Factor is blank.
Path: Clinical Administration >> Management Options >> View System Definitions >> Medication, Allergy, Imm, etc. >> Dosing, Rate Calculation >> page down x3.



Go to the Orders activity for your Buffy patient. Search for and select your TRN### FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML PO SOLN record.

Enter each of the following doses. For each, hover over the icon and make a note of the Calculated Dose (in mL) and how closely the system is rounding it.


0.25 mg/kg: Calculated Dose: 0.73    mL (rounded to the nearest 0.01    mL)
0.5 mg/kg: Calculated Dose: 1.45    mL (rounded to the nearest 0.05    mL)
2 mg/kg: Calculated Dose: 5.9    mL (rounded to the nearest 0.1    mL)
Compare the Calculated Doses and Rounding factors you recorded to the System Level Liquid Rounding Table in the screenshot above. Do they match?

Critical	You can override the system-level table by entering a round factor in the ERX. If a Rnd Factor is entered in the ERX, the system will always round to that amount, no matter how big or small the dose is. 
The Calculated Dose, in the Medication Unit
The calculated dose that displays with the Medication Unit is the amount of active ingredient that the patient will receive. It appears:

At the end of the Order Name.
On the MAR administration window.
Although they use the same value, the simplified ordered dose and the calculated dose are separate because the amount of drug the patient receives is determined by how precisely the nurse measures the product. If the nurse rounds to the nearest 1 mL, the patient might receive a different amount than if they round it to the nearest 0.5 mL.

To get the medication unit-based calculated dose, Epic converts the rounded, administration unit-based calculated dose back into the Medication Unit. It uses the Equiv Qty and Unit table to do the math.

Beyond the Basics	Epic applies the Medication Rnd Factor to this step. As a rule, leave this field blank (or enter 0.0001). That means “don’t round the dose again.”


Orders activity and MAR activities: the calculated dose

The Allowed Dosage Deviation Percentage
The conversion from the ordered dose to the calculated dose in the Admin Unit to the calculated dose in the Medication Unit can sometimes result in ugly calculated doses.

Example	A physician enters a 325 mg dose for acetaminophen (Tylenol) 160 mg/5mL oral elixir. The rounded calculated dose is 10.2 mL. Technically, that’s 326.4 mg, not 325 mg.
 



This behavior can confuse (or just annoy) end users, especially if the difference between the ordered dose and the calculated dose is very small.

To prevent frustration, the system has an allowed dosage deviation percentage. This can be set system-wide and overridden in individual ERX records if needed. In the Foundation System, the allowed dosage deviation percentage is set to 1%.

That means that if a provider enters a dose within 1% of the calculated dose, the system displays the ordered dose instead, on both the Order Composer and the MAR.





System Definitions & Orders activity: the allowed dosage deviation percentage

Beyond the Basics	
You can override the allowed dosage deviation percentage for a specific ERX record on its Rx Unit Equivalence screen.

For example, you might set the allowed dosage deviation percentage to “0” for chemotherapy meds. This would result in the system showing the precise calculated dose, which can be important for such dangerous drugs.

 The Allowed Dosage Deviation Percentage setting only applies if:

The ordered dose is a simple dose, placed using the Medication Unit (or one of the Other Medication Units)
-or-

The ordered dose is complex but a standardized dose is used after simplifying.
Example	
For example, when your order acetaminophen 160mg/5mL elixir, a dose of "325 mg" will use the Allowed Dosage Deviation Percentage because “mg” is the Medication Unit. The calculated dose would appear as 325 mg instead of 326.4 mg.

However, a dose of 11.1 mg/kg for Buffy (who weighs 29.3 kg) would simplify to 325.23 mg. After converting to the Administration Unit and rounding to the nearest 0.1 mL, that'd result in a calculated dose of 326.4 mg.  326.4 mg is within 1% of 325.23 mg, but the Allowed Dosage Deviation Percentage would not be used because “mg/kg” is a complex dose (and the ERX has no standardized dosing). The actual calculated dose of 326.4 mg would appear.

Step 3: Calculate the Dispense Amount
Once the system has the calculated dose, it uses that to calculate the dispense amount. The dispense amount is the amount of physical product that pharmacy will dispense to the nurse.

To calculate the dispense amount, the system converts the calculated dose into the ERX’s Dispense Unit and then applies the Dispense Rnd Factor. This is often a formality, because for liquid medications these are usually the same as the Administration Unit and the Administration Rnd Factor.



If the dispense amount is in mL and the dispense location has Intelligent Package Selection enabled, the system uses the dispense amount to pick an appropriate package. If the entire package is dispensed, the size of the package becomes the dispense amount.

Beyond the Basics	If you are charging on dispense, the dispense amount is used to calculate the charge.
 

Creating “Prepacked” NDCs
Many organizations “prepack” their injections and oral liquids for common doses. These prepacked syringes or cups can then be stocked in ADS cabinets or dispensed as a unit dose meds with no special prep required.

If you prepack a product:

Create a custom NDC for each package size and type.
Link to commercially available ERX record.
Package size and unit reflect the volume.
Include an appropriate package description (for IPS to work).
Send the NDC of the larger, commercially available package to billing.
Sync the Cost Info to that same NDC by using the same Cost ID as the larger NDC.
This will ensure that you receive future cost updates from the 3rd party data vendor too.
If charging on admin, use Charge in increments of field to ensure that you’ll charge for the entire package.
Add NDCs to the appropriate medication lists.
 
Example	
Your hospital prepacks furosemide oral solution into 1 mL, 2 mL and 3 mL unit-dose syringes. Each size is a different NDC record. You produce all three from the 120 mL bottle (0054-3294-50).

The 2 mL and 3 mL syringes are already configured.

Create a new NDC for your prepacked 1 mL syringe. Classic >> Rx Admin >> NDC Admin >> Create New.

Formatted NDC: TRN###-999-01
Raw 11 digit NDC: TRN###99901
Linked Medication: TRN### FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML PO SOLN
Replace “###” with the TRN### on your class info sheet.
Configure the Package size and Units field to reflect the volume (1 mL). Configure the Package description field to reflect the type of package.



Critical	
The fields above are critical, in particular the Package Size and Unit. Intelligent Package Selection, barcode scanning, and charging won't work without them.

The Package description is also important, and can cause problems with Intelligent Package Selection if missing. 

On the Billing form, make sure that NDC 0054-3294-50 (the 120 mL bottle) appears on any claims that use your 1 mL prepacked syringe.

Hint: use the NDC to send to billing field.
On the Cost Info form:

Set Charge in increments of to the size to “1” mL, ensuring that you’ll always charge for the entire 1 mL syringe.
Give your custom NDC this Cost ID: 00054329450.
Do NOT click Copy Cost.


Critical	Do not click Copy Cost in your custom NDC record. Don't do it. 
Enter "0.109" in the Cost to use for billing field and select Cost is per mL. Close your NDC to save your changes.

Beyond the Basics	
What about Copy Cost and the Cost ID?

This button pushes information from the current NDC out to any other NDCs that share the same Cost ID.

Utilities that update the costs in commercially available NDCs will also update the costs in any custom NDCs that share a Cost ID. The button is used to manually sync the costs, outside of running a utility. Many organizations will just use a utility to update all costs, including those of your custom NDCs.

Also remember, it pushes Cost Info data from the record you're into all other records with the same Cost ID. So, in the scenario you do want to manually push out the cost information, make sure you are in the right NDC!

Beyond the Basics: Configuring the Implied Unit
The implied unit is the unit Epic uses to communicate with non-Epic systems (such as your ADS cabinet, a dispensing robot, or a non-Epic billing system). When you send a message to one of these systems, with a quantity of “1,” the implied unit tells us “1 what?” It can be:

An entire package
A single package unit (mL, g, or EA)
A single dispense unit (whatever is in the Dispense Unit field in the ERX record)
For most NDCs dispensed in mL, you want the implied unit to be the entire package. For example, if you tell the billing system that you dispensed “1” of a 4-mL cup, it will mean 1 cup (not 1 mL). This is the default behavior for any NDC with a package unit of “mL.”

For bulk bottles (from which you draw custom syringes), this is not desirable. You want “3.5” to mean “3.5 mL” instead of “3.5 bottles.” In a bulk bottle NDC, you’d set the Implied Unit field to “Dispense Unit” instead of leaving it blank.

For information on how to configure the implied unit, refer to the “Implied Unit Build” section of the Willow Inpatient Interfaces Strategy Handbook on Galaxy.

Adding to Med Lists and the Facility List
Example	Your central pharmacy stocks the 120 mL bottle. It also stocks the 4 mL cups and all three custom NDCs. Everything but the 120 mL bottle is a unit-dose package.
Once you’ve configured the simple ERX record and any custom NDCs, add it to the appropriate medication lists:
 

Formulary	Add ERX.
Central Pharmacy Med List	
Add ERX record and all NDCs you stock.

Keep the green dot (so it appears on the Facility List).

Other Pharmacies’ Med Lists	Add ERX and NDCs you stock at the location (ADS cabinets update automatically on load).

When adding NDCs to a dispense location:

Indicate the default package, if more than one have check marks.
Put yellow dots next to any unit-dose packages (so that they are dispensed as entire packages).
Add your trn### furosemide to your central pharmacy med list. You stock:

120 mL Bottle, 0054-3294-50 (make this the default dispense)
the 4 mL Cup, 68094-756-62 (dispense whole package)
the 2 mL Syringe, 9999-99999-02 (dispense whole package)
the 3 mL Syringe, 9999-99999-03 (dispense whole package)
your TRN### 1 mL Syringe (dispense whole package)
Add it to your formulary. Don’t bother choosing NDCs. Close your lists.

Test your work in Hyperspace, as your pharmacist (RX##/train).  Open Buffy’s chart, click +New, and search for your "trn### fur”.

Your med should appear on the Facility List tab.
When you select the order, which NDC is selected by default? Why?
120 mL Bottle, because you made it the default on your central pharmacy med list. 

Choose a dose of “1 mg/kg”.

The calculated dose is 3 mL.
The Package changes to the 3 mL Syringe!
Keep reading to find out why!
Intelligent Package Selection (IPS)
Intelligent Package Selection is the process where Epic selects the best NDC for each dose of a liquid medication. It applies to medications with a Dispense Unit of “mL.” IPS reduces the amount of manual changes that pharmacists need to make while entering or verifying orders.

Exercise 1: Configure IPS for Your Hospital
By default, Intelligent Package Selection behaves a certain way and is enabled for any medication dispensed in mL. Let’s investigate!

Part 1: How Does IPS Pick Packages?
If you aren't already there: log in to Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train) and open Buffy's chart. 
Remove any unsigned orders for Buffy.
Search for and select your trn### furosemide (Lasix) solution 10 mg/mL. In the Order Composer, test each of the following doses, and confirm that they result in the Calculated Dose and Package Selected shown below:
Dose	Calculated Dose	Package Selected
No dose	----	120 mL Bottle (the default NDC)
10 mg	1 mL	1 mL Syringe
20 mg	2 mL	2 mL Syringe
30 mg	3 mL	3 mL Syringe
40 mg	4 mL	4 mL Cup
15 mg	1.5 mL	2 mL Syringe
25 mg	2.5 mL	3 mL Syringe
80 mg	8 mL	120 mL Bottle
True or False: If IPS finds a package that exactly matches the dose, it will select that package. True     
What does IPS do when there isn’t a package that matches the dose exactly?
Use the next largest package.

For the 80 mg (8 mL) dose, which of these would be easier (pick one)?
  a) Dispensing 2 x 4 mL cups
  b) Drawing up a custom syringe from the 120 mL bottle
Answer: A

Which did IPS actually do? Why?
Use the 120 mL Bottle because that's the next largest package.

Part 2: Allow IPS to Choose Multiple Packages
By default, IPS will use a package that matches the dose exactly if there is one. If there is not, it will use the next largest package. You can (and should) configure IPS to allow multiple packages.

You can enable this in individual Pharmacy (PHR) records, or at the hospital level. In general, do this is at the hospital level—it’s more efficient.

In Classic, open your trn### Hospital.
Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin
Go to the Intelligent Package Selection form and configure the following:


In a non-ADS pharmacy (like central, a satellite, or floor stock), IPS can now use as many packages as it needs!
Click Accept to save your changes.
Go back to Hyperspace and Buffy’s chart.
Remove any unsigned orders.
Search for and select your trn### furosemide again. Test each of the following doses, and confirm that the packages shown below are selected. (If not, make sure you CLOSED your Hospital in Classic, and remove/reordered your trn### furosemide).
Dose	Calculated Dose	Package Selected (x __?)
80 mg	8 mL	4 mL Cup x 2
60 mg	6 mL	3 mL Syringe x 2
2 mg/kg	5.9 mL	3 mL Syringe x 2
0.5 mg/kg	1.45 mL	2 mL Syringe x 1
For the 8 mL and 6 mL doses, IPS is dispensing multiple smaller packages that exactly match the dose. Cool.
For the 5.9 mL dose, it’s no longer going to the next largest package (the 120 mL bottle), but rather the next largest multiple of packages. Instead of drawing from a 120 mL bottle, it’s using two of the 3 mL syringes!
Also, notice the 5.9 mL and 1.45 mL doses are using unit-dose packages. The nurse will need to waste some of that, and there’s the chance they might accidentally give too much. You might prefer to draw a custom syringe from the 120 mL bottle for such doses.
Remove the furosemide order.
Part 3: Tweak IPS Rules
You can use that same table in your Hospital to tweak how IPS behaves for certain medications. When you do so, try to be as specific as possible and thus avoid unexpected outcomes.

Go back to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin and open your trn### Hospital again.
Go to the Intelligent Package Selection form and add the following:


You’re now telling IPS to…
Use up to 999 packages if it can get an exact match by doing so, but…
If it can’t find an exact match, jump straight to the biggest package in the pharmacy instead of the next larger package/multiple of packages.
Click Accept to save your changes to trn### Hospital.
Return to Hyperspace and Buffy’s chart.
Remove any unsigned orders. 
Order your trn### furosemide again and select 0.5 mg/kg. Look at the Package field.
Now, instead of the 2 mL syringe, IPS selected the 120 mL bottle.
Because the 120 mL bottle doesn’t have a yellow dot, you won’t dispense all of it—you’ll dispense 1.45 mL from the 120 mL bottle. Nice!
Now search for a new order by ID:  400296.  Pick a dose of 10 mL/kg.
This is a lactated Ringer's bolus (a rapid infusion of an IV fluid)
Compare the Calculated Dose (293 mL) to the Package that was selected (1,000 mL flex container).
Click the Package magnifying glass.
The 500 mL flex container would have been less wasteful. So why did IPS pick the 1,000 mL flex?
Because the 1,000 mL flex container is the absolute largest package in the central pharmacy.  

When you configured IPS to use the “Absolute largest package” when there was a partial match, you didn’t specify which types of medications it should apply to. Thus, that rule is applying to every medication that IPS affects!
Go back to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin and open your trn### Hospital.
Configure the Intelligent Package Selection form to match this:


Critical	
The Med Form, Med Route, and Controlled Substance? columns are evaluating these items in an ERX record, which come from the third party data load:



Beyond the Basics	The Med Grouper column can be used to control IPS behavior for specific groups of ERXs. You can create medication grouper (VCG) records to group certain medications or by pharmaceutical class, subclass, generic medication and more. For information on how to build a medication grouper, see the Groupers Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy.
Click Accept to exit your trn### Hospital and save your changes. 
Return to Hyperspace and Buffy’s chart.
Remove any unsigned orders.
Enter these two orders, and confirm how they’re dispensing:
trn### furosemide, 0.5 mg/kg: dispense 1.45 mL out of the 120 mL bottle
400296 (lactated Ringer’s bolus), 10 mL/kg: dispense 1 x 500 mL flex container
If those orders look right, remove them without signing.
Go on to Part 4.
Part 4: See How IPS Affects Dispense Logic
So far, you’ve been seeing how IPS behaves within a single pharmacy. Now let’s see how it interacts with dispense logic.

Open your TRN### 4 SOUTH UNIT.
Classic >> Rx Admin >> Unit/Department Admin.
This is the unit your Buffy and Caleb patients are admitted to.
On the Dispensing Information form, review the pharmacies serving the unit.
Update the ADS med list to show you’ve loaded a 4 mL cup and 1 mL syringe.
Rx Admin >> Medication List Admin >> your trn### 4 South ADS Med List
Add your trn### furosemide oral solution.
Select these NDCs: 
4 mL cup: 68094-756-62 (check mark, red dot, and yellow dot)
1 mL syringe: your TRN###-999-01 (check mark and yellow dot)
Click Accept and then Close to exit your med list and save your changes.
Close the 4-South unit record, too (click Accept). 
Go back to Hyperspace and Buffy's chart. Remove any unsigned orders. 
Search for and select your trn### furosemide again. The following doses, and confirm they match the dispense location and packages shown. 
Dose	Dispense Location	Package (x __ ?)
No dose	4-South ADS  	4 mL Cup x1
1 mg/kg (3 mL)	4-South ADS  	4 mL Cup x1
10 mg (1 mL)	4-South ADS  	1 mL Syringe x1
20 mg (2 mL)	4-South ADS  	4 mL Cup x1
80 mg (8 mL)	Central Pharmacy (!!!)	4 mL Cup x2
Notice that in the ADS cabinet, you’re back to the default logic! IPS is picking the next largest package instead of using multiple packages or going to the absolute largest package.
Also, check out the 80 mg dose: it’s coming from Central Pharmacy, not your ADS cabinet! Why? Because by default, IPS won’t use more than one package!
Let’s fix that. Go back to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin >> your trn### Hospital >> Intelligent Package Selection form.
You already told IPS to use multiple packages for standard pharmacies, but ADS (and robot) pharmacies are still using the default logic. Make your screen look like this:


Because you probably don’t want nurses taking too many packages from the ADS cabinet, you’ll usually want to set the Max Pkgs for ADS and robot pharmacies to something from 3-5.
Click Accept to exit your hospital and save your work.
Return to Hyperspace and Buffy’s chart. 
Change the dose of your furosemide to 1 mg/kg.
Confirm it’s dispensing 3 x your 1 mL syringe from the ADS.
Change the dose to 80 mg.
Confirm it’s dispensing 2 x the 4 mL cup from the ADS.
Change the dose to 160 mg.
Confirm it’s dispensing the 4 x the 4 mL cup from central.
You configured IPS to allow up 3 packages when dispensing from the ADS cabinet. If a dose requires more packages than that, it will skip the ADS cabinet and go to the next dispense location that has the drug.
Change the dose 0.5 mg/kg.
Confirm that it’s dispensing 2 x your 1 mL syringe.
It’s allowing you to dispense partial matches from the ADS, because you haven’t told it otherwise. (You’ll see how to change that after the exercise.)
If You Have Time: Focus Questions
Your hospital is currently configured like this.



Assume that:

Your 4 South ADS has diphenhydrAMINE injection, with a 1 mL syringe.
Your Central Pharmacy has diphenhydrAMINE injection, with a 1 mL syringe and a 10 mL vial. The 10 mL vial has the red dot next to it.
According to your third-party vendor, diphenhydrAMINE has a form of “solution,” a route of “Injection,” and it is NOT a controlled substance.

Based on those assumptions, answer these questions:

You order diphenhydrAMINE with a dose of 2 mL. Where will it dispense from? Using which package?

4-South ADS, 1 mL syringe x 2

You order diphenhydramine with a dose of 0.2 mL. Where will it dispense from? Using which package?

4-South ADS, 1 mL syringe x 1

Pretend that you unload diphenhydrAMINE injection from the ADS. Where will a 0.2 mL dose come from now? Using which package?

Central Pharmacy, 1 mL syringe x 1

If you want the 0.2 mL dose to come from the 10 mL vial in Central Pharmacy, what changes should you make in the hospital table shown above? (Assume that you’ve already unloaded it from the ADS.)
Add a row to "standard" table (in line 1 or line 2) for "Solution" + "Injection" + "No" with max packages of 999 and "Absolute Largest" in the last column.

Now assume that:

Your 4 South ADS has morphine injection, with a 1 mL syringe.
Your Central Pharmacy also has a 1 mL syringe, and no other packages.
According to your third-party vendor, this morphine injection has a form of “solution,” a route of “Injection,” and it IS a controlled substance.

Based on those assumptions, answer these questions:

You order morphine with a dose of 2 mL. Where will it dispense from? Using which package?

4-South ADS, 1 mL Syringe x 2

You order morphine with a dose of 3.5 mL. Where will it dispense from? Using which package?

Central Pharmacy, 1 mL Syringe x 4

If you want morphine (and other controlled substances) to always come from the ADS cabinet if stocked there, no matter how many packages it takes, what changes should you make in the hospital table? Be specific!
Add row in ADS & Robots table for controlled meds = "Yes" and max packages of "999".  Put that before current row (or, put it 2nd and add a "No" in the controlled med column of the existing row)

Key Takeaways
Intelligent Package Selection (IPS) picks the best package for liquid medications based on the Calculated Dose.

IPS will only work for medications with a Dispense Unit of “mL.”
It does NOT work for bulk products or medications dispensed as tablets/capsules/eaches.
IPS is enabled by default. No special configuration is required for the default behavior.

Beyond the Basics	
In earlier versions of Epic, you needed to populate the Package types to consider for auto-selection field in each Pharmacy (PHR) record that would use IPS.

Now, if that field is blank, IPS works and considers all package types.

The only reason to use this field now is to prioritize certain package types over other (e.g., the system should choose a flex container before a glass container). However, if you list any packages in this field, you must list all package types. If you list just one or two package types, IPS will only consider those package types and never select any other package types.

Default Behavior
IPS works with dispense logic. The system picks the dispense location and then uses IPS to pick the correct package.

By default:

If the dose…	then Epic…
Matches a package exactly	Dispenses that package.
Doesn’t match a package exactly	Dispenses next largest package.
Is larger than the largest package	Goes to the next dispense location.
Is larger than the largest package in the failsafe dispense location (i.e., the hospital’s main pharmacy)	
Dispenses 2+ of largest package.

By default, Epic dispenses more than 1 package from only the failsafe dispense location.
Critical	IPS can NOT pick two different NDCs for the same product in an order. For a 6 mL dose, it could NOT pick a 4 mL cup plus a 2 mL syringe. This isn’t configurable. Each product in an order can have only one NDC.
Allowing IPS to use More than One Package
By default, IPS only dispenses one package (unless there’s absolutely no alternative). This can cause unwanted behavior. Epic strongly recommends increasing the number of packages IPS allows.

Path: Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin >> Intelligent Package Selection form.



Changing IPS Logic for a Subset of Medications
As a rule, don’t attempt to fine-tune IPS until you identify a problem. When you identify a problem, address it as specifically as possible so as to avoid introducing new, unexpected problems.

Use the first four columns in the IPS tables to identify a subset of medications. Then use the subsequent columns to change how IPS behaves for those meds.



Put specific rows above more general rows!

IPS stops on the first row which matches all four properties (form, route, controlled, and med grouper).
The first three of these columns are looking at fields on the Clinical Medication Information screen of the ordered ERX record. They are populated by your third-party med data vendor.
The med grouper column uses a medication grouper (VCG) to define a group of ERXs.
The Med Route column is the implied/assumed route from your med vendor, not the ordered route.
If a column is blank, all medications will match it.
If the first four columns are blank, the settings on that row will apply to any medication (unless it matched on a row higher up in the table).
Beyond the Basics	Curious about other IPS fields? Ctrl + Click a field and view its help text. (You might need to press More >>> to view the help text in a PHR record)
Specifying IPS Logic by Pharmacy
Example	
Throughout your trn### Hospital, controlled meds should always come from an ADS if they are loaded, no matter how many packages it requires.

Now, imagine that your 4-South unit serves pediatric patients. Unit dose packages for oral solutions should only dispense from there if there’s an exact match. Nurses don’t want to waste larger packages or risk giving their patients too much.

Controlled substances are an exception. They should use the hospital-wide settings.  

Other medications should continue to behave as they did at the end of your exercise.

Edit your TRN### Hospital so that for ADS cabinets, the max packages for controlled medications is 999 (and 3 for anything else). 

Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin
In the bottom table, insert this new row (Controlled? = Yes and Max Pkgs = 999) above the current row. 
Notice that there's nothing here that allows you to specify exceptions based on a particular unit or dispense location.   
To change the IPS logic for a specific dispense location, go to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> select a Pharmacy >> Intelligent Package Selection form.

Configure your TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS pharmacy’s IPS logic:

For oral solutions that are not controlled, nurses should be able to use up to 3 packages, but only for exact matches on the dose. (Hint: Use Matches Allowed.)
Other meds should continue to behave as configured in your hospital.
You can make this happen by configuring only one row in your pharmacy's IPS table!


Beyond the Basics	There are multiple ways to configure the IPS table that result in the same outcome. When configuring the IPS table, consider all of the types of orders you'd like specific settings for, what your desired outcome is for those types of orders, and what the actual outcome would be based on your configuration. Also, test those outcomes with actual orders. 
Close both your ADS pharmacy and your hospital. 

Test your work in Hyperspace, as your pharmacist (RX##/train). Order your trn### furosemide for Buffy with a dose of 0.5 mg/kg.

Where’s it dispensing from? Why?
Central pharmacy (from 120 mL bottle). There's no exact match for 1.45 mL in the ADS and central is configured to use the absolute largest package for partial matches.

Order a morphine injection [5170] for Buffy with a dose of 0.2 mg/kg (2.95 mL).

Where’s it dispensing from? Why?
4-South ADS (1 mL syringe x 3). Morphine is controlled, and your hospital allows up to 999 packages and partial matches for controlled meds in ADS cabinets. 

Critical	
Intelligent Package Selection can be set at two levels:

Pharmacy (PHR)
Hospital (EAF)
For each order, Epic checks the Pharmacy (PHR) record first. If none of the rows apply, it uses settings in the Hospital (EAF) record.

Configuring Dispensing
Dispensing for oral syringes and injections is similar to unit dose solids. Assign the ERX record an appropriate dispense code and update label routing.

Overriding Dispense Codes by Volume
The dispense code might need to be different for liquid medications based on whether you’re dispensing a unit-dose package or drawing up a custom dose. To accommodate this, set the default dispense code as "Unit Dose" and then use the override table as shown below (using "Oral syringe" or "Syringe" depending on whether this is an oral liquid or injection):



Configure your TRN### FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML PO SOLN to look like the screenshot above.

Beyond the Basics	Override dispense codes don’t have to be hospital-specific. To leave the Hospital column (and other columns) blank, type “-” in that column to jump to the next column. The "-" will disappear when you tab off the column. 
Configuring Labels for Syringes
You’ve configured label printing for unit-dose medications, but not for oral syringes or syringes.

Oral syringe: for custom-drawn doses of oral liquids; one row per action; don't group (each syringe needs to be labelled)
Syringe: for custom-drawn injections; two rows per action, one for syringe labels (not grouped) and one for production labels (grouped).
Production labels are optional; not all organizations use them.
Both: Include actions for "Dispense (Cart Fill)" in label routing. 
In the Foundation System and training environments, both the "Oral syringe" and "Syringe" dispense codes are mapped to the “Syringe” cart group. In the training environment, this cart group is included in your TRN### IV BATCH.

If you were going to add rows for these actions to your central pharmacy's Label Routing table, they'd look like this:



Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> Label Routing form

Remember:

Production labels are basically "recipe cards." They tell techs how to prepare doses and what ingredients to use. They are often discarded after preparation.
Syringe and oral syringe dose labels include a barcode. This barcode identifies the order ID and specific dispense.


Configuring Charging
Picking a Linked Procedure
Select a linked procedure for an ERX record based on whether CMS has assigned it a HCPCS code and whether it self-administrable.

Linked Procedure	Example
HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/ HCPCS (ALT 636 FOR OP/ED)	Furosemide injections have an assigned code: J1940.
HC RX 637 SELF ADMINISTRABLE DRUGS (ALT 250 FOR MEDICARE IP)	Oral furosemide has no HCPCS code and oral liquids are self-administrable.
Assigning Charge Methods
With unit dose solids, you almost always attach the charge method to the ERX record. However, with oral liquids and injections, the appropriate charge method might change based on the NDC being dispensed.

Example	If you dispense a unit-dose package of furosemide, you want to use the Unit Dose Standard method. But if you dispense a custom syringe out of a 120 mL bottle, you want to use Multidose Standard.
You can attach a charge method at three levels (listed most specific to least):

NDC
NDC Grouper
ERX
If set at multiple levels, the system uses the charge method at the most specific level. For oral liquids and injections:

At the ERX level, enter the charge method that applies to the largest number of different packages.
At the NDC or NDG level, enter the exception.
An NDC grouper is a collection of NDCs that share package attributes, such as 120 mL bottles of furosemide.
Example	Your hospital stocks 4 different sizes of unit-dose packages for furosemide oral liquid, and one 120-mL bottle. Assign the Unit Dose Standard charge method to the ERX record. Assign the Multidose Standard method to an NDC grouper for furosemide 120 mL bottles, rather than the NDC level. If you begin stocking a different 120 mL bottle, you don’t have to update the charge method.
TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor open their central pharmacy's med list and create an NDC Grouper for 120 mL bottles of FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML PO SOLN by right clicking one of the 120mL NDCs. They'll then set the charge method for that NDG to "Multidose Standard". DO NOT DO THIS STEP YOURSELF.

In Hyperspace, order your trn### furosemide for Buffy, and test the following doses:

No dose selected: package = 4 mL Cup x1, charge method = Unit Dose Standard, and dispense code = Unit Dose
0.5 mg/kg (1.45 mL):  package = 120 mL bottle, dispense amount 1.45 mL, charge method = Multidose Standard, dispense code = Oral Syringe
1 mg/kg (3 mL): package = 1 mL Syringe x 3, charge method = Unit Dose Standard, and dispense code = Unit Dose
Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

You’re configuring FENTANYL CITRATE (PF) 50 MCG/ML IJ SOLN (WRAPPED). When you order it for an adult patient (15-years-old or older), you want it to appear like the top screenshot. When you order for a pediatric patient (1 to 14 years old), you want it to appear like the second screenshot.




The top one for adults; the bottom for pediatric patients

Which of the following settings should you make in the BASE record for FENTANYL CITRATE 0.05 MG/ML IJ SOLN? Choose ALL answers that apply.
The Order Composer Configuration
The Suggested Doses for Order Entry
The Default Frequency
The Allowed Order Units
The Allowed and Default Routes
The Frequency Buttons
The Route Buttons
A, C, D, E, and G. You can ONLY define the OCC (answer A) in the base record. The allowed order units (answer D) and the allowed & default routes (answer E) should always be configured in the base record, so that they apply when adding a med to an order set or a preference list (or when the patient falls outside of the overridden contexts). The default frequency (answer C) and the Route buttons (answer G) are the same in both screenshots, so they should be configured in the base as well.

Which of the following settings should you make in the OVERRIDE CONTEXTS for FENTANYL CITRATE (PF) 50 MCG/ML IJ SOLN (WRAPPED)? Choose ALL answers that apply.
The Order Composer Configuration
The Suggested Doses for Order Entry
The Default Frequency
The Allowed Order Units
The Allowed and Default Routes
The Frequency Buttons
The Route Buttons
B and F. These are both visibly different in the two screenshots, so they need to change based on the context.

Assume that the Rx Unit Equivalence screen in the fentanyl record is configured as shown below and that the system level liquid rounding table is configured as described earlier in this chapter. There are no standardized doses.

If you click the 2 mcg/kg dose button for a 33 kg patient, what dose will appear at the end of the Order Name? Choose ONE answer only
.
1.3 mL
1.32 mL
1.35 mL
65 mcg
66 mcg
67.5 mcg
2 mcg/kg
D, 65 mcg. The dose that appears at the end of the Order Name is the calculated dose, in the Medication Unit (mcg in this case). A is also the calculated dose, but it uses the Administer Unit, and we want the Medication Unit.

The ordered dose (2 mcg/kg) simplifies to 66 mcg. That is converted into the administration unit (66 mcg x 1 mL/50mcg = 1.32 mL). Because the Administration Rnd Factor field is blank, the system rounds the calculated dose using the system level liquid rounding table. For doses between 1 mL and 3 mL, it rounds to the nearest 0.05 mL. 1.32 mL is closer to 1.3 mL than 1.35 mL, so 1.3 mL it is. The calculated dose in mcg is then calculated by converting 1.3 mL back into mcg (1.3 mL x 50 mcg/1 mL = 65 mcg).

 

Continue with the scenario from question 3. The Medication List for the ADS cabinet on the patient’s unit has a 0.5 mL and a 2 mL syringe for this ERX. Both NDCs have a yellow dot next to them. The 0.5 mL syringe is marked as the default.

Nothing is configured in the Intelligent Package Selection table in any pharmacy or hospital records. Default IPS logic applies.

What will the system choose to dispense? Choose ONE answer only.
 
The 0.5 mL syringe x 3, for a dispense amount of 1.5 mL
The 0.5 mL syringe, with a dispense amount of 1.3 mL
The 2 mL syringe x1, for a dispense amount of 2 mL
The 2 mL syringe, with a dispense amount of 1.3 mL
None of the above; it will skip this dispense location Continue with the scenario from question 4. Your central pharmacy’s Med List has the 0.5 mL and 2 mL syringes, plus a 1 mL syringe and a 5 mL vial. The syringes each have a yellow dot. The 5 mL vial has no yellow dot, but is marked as the default.
C, the 2 mL syringe x 1, for a dispense amount of 2 mL.

Why? IPS is enabled and this is a liquid med, so the system looks for package that matches the calculated dose exactly. The calculated dose is 1.3 mL; there’s no exact match. The default behavior of IPS is to use the next largest package (as opposed to, say, dispensing 3 x 0.5 mL syringes). That means it uses the 2 mL syringe. And because the 2 mL vial has a yellow dot next to it on the Med List, the system dispenses the entire package.

Continue with the scenario from question 4. Your central pharmacy’s Med List has 0.5 mL, 1 mL, and 2 mL syringes, plus a 5 mL vial. The syringes each have a yellow dot. The 5 mL vial has no yellow dot, but is marked as the default.  

The patient's ADS has only the 0.5 mL and 2 mL syringes, both with the yellow dots. The 0.5 mL syringe is marked as the default. 

Now you configure the Intelligent Package Selection table for your hospital as shown in the screenshot below. You enter a dose of 225 mcg (4.5 mL).

There are no other Pharmacy (PHR) records serving the patient. What will the system choose to dispense? Choose ONE answer only.
The 0.5 mL syringe x 9, for a dispense amount of 4.5 mL, from the ADS
The 0.5 mL syringe x 9, for a dispense amount of 4.5 mL, from Central
The 1 mL syringe x 5, with a dispense amount of 5 mL, from Central
The 2 mL syringe x 3, for a dispense amount of 6 mL, from the ADS
The 5 mL vial x1, for a dispense amount of 5 mL, from Central
The 5 mL vial, with a dispense amount of 4.5 mL, from Central
B, the 0.5 mL syringe x 9, for a dispense amount of 4.5 mL, from Central.

Why? The ADS cabinet is now limited to 2 packages. That rules out answers A and D; they both require more than 2 packages. Epic will skip the ADS cabinet as a dispense location.

In the Central Pharmacy, you can use up to 25 packages based on the IPS defaults for standard pharmacies. IPS can get an exact match by dispensing 9 x 0.5 mL syringes, and 9 packages is fewer than the 25-package limit.

If you wanted IPS to dispense out of the 5 mL vial, you’d need to enter a value (such as “4”) in the Larger Pkg After column of the IPS table for standard pharmacies.

 

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

Oral liquid

Injection

Calculated dose

System-level rounding table

Allowed dosage deviation percentage

Standardized dose

Prepacking

Intelligent Package Selection (IPS)

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Given an ordered dose and the Rx Unit Equivalence screen, predict the calculated dose values

Configure standardized doses for an ERX record

Create a custom NDC to represent a prepacked syringe

Designate whether an entire package should be dispensed from a pharmacy, or part of that package

Predict what package will be dispensed for a liquid medication in any given circumstance

Configure IPS logic for all the ADS cabinets in a hospital

Configure IPS logic for all “standard” pharmacies in a hospital

Configure IPS logic for a particular dispense location

Configure an ERX record to have a different dispense code when dispensing a partial package

Configure label routing to print both a production label and dose labels for a particular dispense code

Configure charging for an oral liquid or injection

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

How the order display name and order name of injections and oral liquids vary from other simple ERX records

The difference between the ordered dose and the calculated dose

How Epic calculates the calculated dose (in the Medication Unit and Administration Unit), and dispense amount

When and how Epic refers to the system level liquid rounding table

How the allowed dosage deviation percentage affects the displayed ordered dose

How standardized dosing affects the simplification of a complex dose

That standardized dosing only affects complex doses

How a custom NDC for a prepacked syringe is different from a custom NDC for a repackaged split tablet

Which Medication Lists should include any given ERX or NDC for an oral solution or injection

Why the yellow dot under next to an NDC on a Medication List can be so important

What happens (by default) if a single dose of a liquid medication is larger than the largest package in a dispense location

Why Intelligent Package Selection is important

How Intelligent Package Selection picks a package

How the Intelligent Package Selection tables in a Pharmacy (PHR) record and the Hospital (EAF) record interact

How the Intelligent Package Selection tables in a Pharmacy (PHR) or Hospital (EAF) record affect IPS’s choice of packages and dispense locations

Why you might need to configure dispense code overrides for an oral solid or injection

How printing a production label impacts the label routing setup for a particular dispense code

Why you might assign a different charge method to the ERX record that represents an oral liquid or injection and one of its NDCs or NDC Groupers.

How the system picks a charge method if an order’s NDC, NDC Grouper, and/or ERX record are assigned different methods.

5. Main Ingredient Mixtures
Introduction
So far, we have been configuring simple ERX records. Remember, a simple ERX is defined by the drug, plus the form, plus the strength. They are one drug, or one ingredient.

However, many medications are ordered via a mixture ERX record. These records contain at least two ingredients.

When clinicians in the pharmacy (or other clinicians) combine multiple simple ERX records together to create a specific dose for a specific patient, that is represented by a mixture ERX.
The mixture ERX represents the recipe; what simple ERXs will be used as ingredients, how much of each ingredient to use, and how they will be combined.
These mixture ERXs do NOT come from third-party data, as they’re not commercially available. The Foundation System includes a large number of them, but you’ll sometimes need to customize them or create new ones.
One of the most common types of mixture ERXs is the main ingredient mixture.

Most main ingredient mixtures are IV piggybacks: a drug (the main ingredient) is diluted into a base (like D5W or NS), administered intravenously, given once or intermittently (e.g., Q6h or Q12H, etc.), where each dose is administered over a discrete period of time (usually 30-60 minutes).
Some common examples include antibiotics, steroids, and many chemo infusions.
Example	
CeFAZolin (Ancef) is an antibiotic that is often administered intravenously. It’s used to treat common infections, and often given prior to surgery to help prevent infection.

Pharmacy might prepare ceFAZolin in the IV room. When it does so for adult patients, doses of up to 1 g are prepared in 50 mL of either dextrose 5 % or sodium chloride 0.9 %. Doses of 1 g or more can be prepared in 100 mL.

Each of those combinations would be represented by a different main ingredient mixture ERX record.

Critical	Not all IV piggybacks are main ingredient mixtures; but when an IV piggyback needs to be prepared by Pharmacy (or nursing on the floor) for a specific patient, then that's a main ingredient mixture.  We'll discuss other types of IV piggybacks in chapter 7.
By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Configure a main ingredient mixture
 Appropriately add main ingredient mixtures, and their ingredients to the needed med lists
Configure labels for main ingredient mixtures
 

Configuring Main Ingredient Mixtures
A main ingredient mixture is a mixture ERX record that has a single, primary ingredient—the main ingredient. The majority of main ingredient mixtures are IV piggybacks.

For adult patients, the amount of base used is standardized based on the main ingredient and the amount thereof. For example, when preparing a ceFAZolin IVPB, doses of up to 1 g are prepared in 50 mL of either dextrose 5 % or sodium chloride 0.9 % IV solution. Doses greater than 1 g are prepared in 100 mL. These guidelines will be different for each main ingredient.

For any given medication, create a separate main ingredient mixture ERX record for each volume of an IVPB you prepare. So, for ceFAZolin, you’d need two main-ingredient mixture ERXs (one for 50 mL of base, one for 100 mL of base).  

Identify and Confirm Setup of the Ingredients
Before configuring a mixture, the ingredients (simple ERX records) need to be configured. As a rule, these ingredients should be configured like any other simple ERX record of the appropriate type.

Example	
The ingredients used for the cefazolin IVPB are:

CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL)
SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN
DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN
All three of these simple ERX records are already configured in the Foundation System. You reviewed the records and didn’t find any problems, so you can use them as-is.

The most important settings that come from the simple ERX records are:

Medication Short Name	Contributes to mixture order name.
Medication Brand Name	Contributes to mixture order name.
Rx Unit Equivalence Screen	Controls and calculates the appropriate Calculated Dose and Dispense Amount for each ingredient.
Linked Procedure	Creates charge sent to billing.
Default Charge Method	Determines charge table and thus the charge amount for the ingredient.
In addition, a lot of third-party data (such as drug-drug, drug-allergy, dose warnings, pharmaceutical classes, etc.) is based on the simple ERX records used in a mixture. You don’t have to configure those warnings for the mixture; the system will base those warnings on the ingredients.

 

Create the Mixture ERX Record
Mixtures are ERX records with a Template Type of "Mixture". The Foundation System includes hundreds of common mixture ERXs, but your organization might customize them and make new ones.  Mixture ERXs are NOT part of your third-party medication data. 

Configure naming for a mixture ERX much like you do for a simple ERX. The key differences are:

You create the record name. It’s doesn’t come from your third-party data vendor.
The Order Name is a combination of naming fields from the simple ERXs, their doses, and the mixture ERX.
Create a New Mixture Record

To create a new mixture ERX record:

Go to Text >> Clinical Administration >> Meds, Allergens, Imm, etc. >> Medications (ERX).
At the Medication: prompt, type "*" (an asterisk, SHIFT+8) and press ENTER.
Press Enter to let the system assign an ID.
Enter a name for your mixture.
Press Enter to accept the contact date.
On the first screen of your new ERX record, enter a Template type of "Mixture".
This changes the screens available as you page down through the record. 
 



Create a new mixture record named TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).

HINT: Make sure to use the right "Template type".
Configure Ancef in the synonyms field. 

Define the Mixture's Ingredients and Recipe
The most important thing you need to configure in a mixture ERX is the recipe: the simple ERXs that are used to prepare the mixture, their amounts, and their relationship to each other. This is done on the Mixture Setup 2 screen (page down 9 times from the first screen). 

Configure your mixture's recipe to match the screen shot below. Use these simple ERXs in the Drug column:

CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4301445]
DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]
SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN [27838]
 



A mixture Medication (ERX) record >> Mixture Setup 2 screen 

Drug	
Simple ERX records used to prepare the mixture.

Order listed determines the order they appear in the Products to Dispense section of Verify orders.

Dose & Units	
Default amount of each ingredient to use per dispense.

For main ingredient mixtures: 

Leave blank for the main ingredient (more on that later) 
For the base(s), enter the volume of base to be used for this mixture
Type	This field lets you distinguish between the base of the mixture and the medications or additives.
Sel	
Whether an ingredient is selected by default or not. Use:

“Main Ingredient” for the principal ingredient. This ingredient will always be selected, and its dose will be tied to the Dose field in the order composer.
"Always" (or leave blank) if an ingredient should always be selected (for example, if it's the only base available)
"Yes" if an ingredient should be selected by default, but users can deselect it (for example, to choose a different base)
"No" if an ingredient should be available to select, but not selected by default (for example, an alternative base)

The other option ("Concentration Dosed") is used when configuring drips. See the Medication Drips chapter.

Beyond the Basics	
Beyond the Basics: Wet Vials

Many main ingredient mixtures are made using freeze-dried powders that must be reconstituted ("wetted") with a diluent, before then being further diluted into the base.

 

As of the November 2022 version of Epic, the Foundation system includes two simple ERX records to represent each of these powdered vials:

One for the "wet vial," which represents the vial being reconstituted with an appropriate diluent to a specific concentration. Wet vials contribute to the total volume of a mixture.
One for the "dry vial," which represents the powder prior to reconstitution and does NOT contribute to a mixture's volume. Dry vials are used only in specific circumstances, such as when the powder:
Is reconstituted at a different concentration (like for an IM injection)
Is added to a mixture as-is (like with a Mini-Bag Plus).
Is used in workflows that don't use the Dispense Preparation activity (like when a nurse mixes a dose on the floor, or a mixture is prepared in Willow Ambulatory).
 

As of the November 2022 edition of the Foundation System, Epic recommends using wet vials as the main ingredient in pharmacy-prepared mixtures whenever possible. Doing so results in more accurate calculation of volume and infusion rates, and it provides technicians guidance on how to reconstitute the vial when preparing a mixture in Dispense Preparation.

 

For more information, see:

* Galaxy.epic.com >> Medications Setup and Support Guide >> Configure Powder and Wet Vial Medications for Reconstitution

* Nova.epic.com >>Guide Pharmacy Staff Through Reconstituting Powder Medications (Release Note 832390)

Once the recipe is defined on the Mixture Setup 2 screen, page down twice to the Mixture Order Composer Items screen. For main ingredient mixtures:

Disallow custom doses for each base.
Do NOT provide dose buttons for alternative base amounts. 
Configure the Mixture Order Composer Items screen on your mixture like so:

 



A mixture Medication (ERX) record >> Mixture Order Composer Items screen

If your mixture includes a choice between two or more bases, use the Order Composer Section Setup screen to require that a base be selected, and limit users to selecting only one base. Otherwise, users could order the mixture without a base, or with both bases selected. 

Page down 2 times to the Order Composer Section Setup screen. Configure it like this: 



A mixture Medication (ERX) record >> Order Composer Section Setup screen 

SHIFT+F7 to exit your mixture record. 

Test your work. Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train) and open Caleb's chart. Enter a new order for your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W. Find it on the Database tab.

Notice that the name on the Database tab is ALL CAPS and ugly. What field in your mixture ERX should you configure to make it look better?  Order Display Name 
Accept your mixture. The Order Composer opens automatically. We've obviously still got work to do, but let's explore a little. 
Enter a Dose of "500 mg". 

Enter a Route of "IV" (intravenous) and Frequency of "Q8H".

Find the Base section. Confirm that:

Dextrose 5 % is selected by default, but sodium chloride 0.9 % is not.
You must select a base, and you can't select both at once.
For both bases, the default dose is 50 mL and you CAN’T enter a custom dose (the field is grayed out).
Select the sodium chloride 0.9 % base.

Notice that the dextrose 5 % base is unselected when you do.
If you click the button for the sodium chloride 0.9 % again (unselecting it) you get a stop sign because users need to choose a base.
Select the dextrose 5 % base, accept the order, and click Sign & Verify (choose an order mode, and indicate Sam Stethoscope as the Ordering and Authorizing provider)

Look at the “Order Dose” for your cefazolin ingredient in the “Products to Dispense”. The order dose for the Cefazolin (the main ingredient) matches the dose we entered, 500 mg. What setting did you make on the Mixture Setup 2 screen to tell the system that?  Sel = Main Ingredient
Notice the dispense amount for the cefazolin ingredient is 5 mL. This is because it is a wet vial, reconstituted to 100 mg/mL.
Under the clinical details, notice the “Volume” of the mixture has been calculated at 55 mL. This is because the wet vials contribute to volume (50 mL base + 5 mL main ingredient)
Beyond the Basics	
The cefazolin wet vial ingredient is configured to contribute to the total volume of mixtures, on the Rx Unit Equivalence screen of the simple ERX record:  



Ingredients with a Type of “Base” always contribute to volume, regardless of whether the simple ERX says to do so.

Configure Naming for the Mixture
Order Display Name

As with simple ERX records, you should configure an order display name for mixture ERXs. This will appear on search results (on the Preference List, Facility List, and Database tabs). It should be formatted so that users understand what, exactly, they're selecting. 

In Text, open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML mixture.

Careful! Using “ = ” may take you to the last ingredient you entered instead of the mixture!
Page down 8 times to the Mixture Setup 1 screen. Configure the Order Disp Name (the order display name) like so:  trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 50 mL D5W

Order Name and Naming Extensions

Once you select a medication in Orders, you see the order name. The order name appears in the orders sidebar, at the top of the order composer, in Verify Orders, on labels, and on the MAR.  Currently in Verify Orders, your mixture's order name appears like so:



Notice that:

It's just the short name and brand name fields from the ceFAZolin ingredient followed by the dose entered in the order composer.
There’s a lot missing: the base, the volume of the base, and any indication that this is an IV piggyback.
The system dynamically generates the order name for mixtures, because end users may change the ingredients (and doses of those ingredients) while entering or verifying such an order.

Unless configured to do otherwise, the order name for a main-ingredient mixture will be:

<short name*> (<brand name*>) <mixture suffix>

*of the main ingredient (simple ERX record)
The correct format for this mixture would be:

<short name*> (<brand name*>) <dose> in <base ingredient short name + strength> <base volume> (<mixture concentration>) <mixture suffix>

*of the main ingredient (simple ERX record)
To get the correct format, go to the Inpatient Medication Order Name Options screen of your mixture, and configure it like so:

 



From the Mixture Setup 1, page down 12 times to the Inpatient Medication Order Name Options screen. Configure it as shown above.

In the Order Entry and After Ordering fields, you are entering naming extensions. An Extension (LPP) record is a little piece of programming (often customizable via parameters). The Extension (LPP) records you enter here determine which bits of information appear in an order name. There is a system default naming extension; you only need to populate a naming extension in an ERX record when the system default doesn't meet your needs. 

There are a number of Epic-released naming extensions, plus some that are built in the Foundation System. Similar to Order Composer Configuration (OCC) records, you rarely need to create or edit these extensions. Rather you should know which ones to use for which types of medications.

For main ingredient mixtures like these, use "IP RXNAME STANDARD (MAIN INGREDIENT WITH BASE DISPLAYED AND BASE QUANTITY)" [34917]. This will display the selected base and the volume of that base (NOT the total volume of the mixture).

Do not forget to add the suffix in the mixture record! That is one part of the Order Name that will not be pulled from the ingredients. 

Beyond the Basics	If you want the order name to reflect to total volume of the mixture--including the volume contributed by the main ingredient--then use "IP RXNAME MIXTURE W/ TOTAL VOLUME (USE FOR QS BASE) [408134921]. In the Foundation System, this extension is typically used for chemotherapy infusions and for ratio-based mixtures (see chapter 7).
Technically, the Order Entry extension controls the Order Name when you are entering an order, and the After Ordering extension controls the order name in Verify Orders, on the MAR, on labels, etc.
Epic recommends always making them match.
Close your mixture record.

In Hyperspace, in Caleb's chart, remove any unsigned orders.

Discontinue all of Caleb's current orders.

Search for “trn### cefazolin” again. 

On the Database tab, it should appear as: trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 50 mL D5W
After you accept your mixture, the order name should be: ceFAZolin (Ancef) in dextrose 5 % 50 mL IVPB
Enter a dose of “500 mg”.  Confirm that dose appears in the order name.
Change the base to sodium chloride 0.9 %. Confirm the order name changes to match.
Configure the Order Composer
When fully configured, you want the order composer to look like this:



Allowed values, buttons, and defaults

In Text, re-open “TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W” and page down 8 times to Mixture Setup 1.

In the Calculate rate given volume and admin duration? field, enter “Yes”.
This will use the total volume, including the volume of the main ingredient and not just the volume of the base.
Setting this field to “Yes” gives the nurse an accurate rate to enter into the infusion pump.
Enter a default Frequency of “Every 8 hours” [200521]
Enter a default Admin Duration of “30” and Units of “minutes”.
Remember that IVPBs are administered over a relatively short period of time. Here we are configuring the default amount of time this mixture will be administered over.
Warning! If you forget to enter a unit, the default and buttons for admin duration will be ignored!
Enter the following Suggested Doses for Order Entry: 250 mg, 500 mg, and 1 g.  Make 1 g selected by default.
As with a simple ERX, these will be Dose buttons. 
Page down 3 times to Mixture Order Composer Items and configure the following.

Enter a Route Button of “Intravenous” (hint: type "IV" for the route, rather than spelling out "Intravenous").
Enter the following Frequency Buttons (hint: use the DOWN ARROW and UP ARROW keys to move between values, not TAB).
Once [200902]
Every 6 hours [200040]
Every 8 hours [200521]
Every 12 hours [200523]
Add Admin Duration Buttons for 30 and 60 minutes.
HINT: You don’t need to include units. Use a semi‐colon “;” to separate each button.
Page down 17 times to the Calculation Configuration screen. In the Allowed Units & Routes section configure the following.

Remember! If you don’t define allowed units and routes, any unit or route can be selected.
 



Add Order-Specific Questions

Page down 17 times to the Order Specific Questions section. Right now, the suspected indication question is coming from the ceFAZolin ingredient ERX. We want it to come from the mixture ERX.

Under the Inpatient Questions add RX ANTIMICROBIAL BACTERIAL INDICATION [120620]
What does this do?


The Indications item in the Order Composer is actually a Question (LQL) record. We use LQL records to create custom fields for certain medications. In the Foundation System, most antibacterial ERX records include this Question (LQL) record: 120620-RX ANTIMICROBIAL BACTERIAL INDICATION.

Attach Question (LQL) records to a medication on the Order Specific Questions page. Enter them in the Inpatient Questions field at the bottom of the screen, in the order they should appear to users.

Questions appear to users in the Order Composer, just before the Admin Instructions field. Whether a question is required or not is configured in the Question (LQL) record.

Beyond the Basics	For information on how to create or edit order-specific Question (LQL) records, see Let Clinicians Answer Questions Related to Their Order in the Order Entry and Order Composer Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy.
Order Composer Configuration

Page down 3 times to the Order Composer Configuration screen. Add a context of “Inpatient” and this OCC:  RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE [4080200014] 

This OCC removes the Rate field, adds the Admin Duration field, makes Dose required, and moves the Base section to a more appropriate section (rather than having it appear smashed at the end, between Priority and Product).
Exit your record.

Return to Hyperspace and Caleb’s chart. Remove any unsigned orders. Order your trn### ceFAZolin in 50 mL D5W again. Confirm that the Order Composer looks like this:

 



Adding Your Mixture to Med Lists & Preference Lists
For each hospital where this mixture is dispensed, add the ingredients and mixture to the...

Formulary                                to mark it as approved.
Central Pharmacy Med List     to indicate it’s in stock.
When you add records to medication lists, any linked preference list is updated automatically. Remember, editing the Central Pharmacy Med List updates the Facility List automatically!

 



In Classic, open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST and:

Add your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W
Leave the green dot next to it.
Critical	In general, only put a green dot next to a mixture ERX record that you want and expect clinicians to order directly. If the mixture will be a dispensable for an IMS orderable (see chapter 7, "IV Piggybacks"), then you would clear the green dot from the mixture. 
 

For now, we're leaving the green dot on this mixture for demonstration purposes. We'll remove it in chapter 7.

Confirm that the following are already on the med list:

CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4301445]
 DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]
SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN [27838] 
Repeat those steps for your TRN### HOSPITAL FORMULARY.

The mixture ERX must be on the formulary, or whenever the mixture is ordered it will have a non-formulary flag.
The ingredients should be on the formulary so that they do not have a non-formulary flag when they are ordered on their own.
Close both lists to save your changes. 

Go to Hyperspace. In the Orders activity for Caleb, discontinue any active orders and clear any unsigned orders.

Click +New and search for “trn### cefaz”. Confirm:

Only one match appears on the Facility List tab
The match should appear as “trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 50 mL D5W”
Select your IVPB for Caleb and click Sign & Verify (The defaults are fine. Pick an order mode and provider).

In Verify Orders, confirm there is no non-formulary flag. Also, notice that the ingredients you added to your mixture ERX record appear at the bottom of the screen. Leave the order unverified.

Dispensing Main Ingredient Mixtures
Limiting Which Pharmacies Can Dispense a Mixture

Example	Your unit’s ADS cabinet includes bags of D5W (for use as an IV fluid) and wet vials of cefazolin (for use as an injection). If you order your cefazolin IVPB, Epic could choose to dispense the mixture from the ADS cabinet – asking the nurse to mix it up on the floor! That’s not what you want.
Notice that the dispense location for your current order in Verify Orders is TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS.

In Classic, open your TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS MED LIST.

Is your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W on this list? No!     
What is on this list that seems to allow the mixture to dispense from the ADS? The ingredients (cefazolin vial and D5W)
TRAINER DEMO: Watch your trainer remove the cefazolin ingredient from their TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS med list and add the mixture. When they refresh the cefazolin mixture's dispense detains in Verify Orders, does it still dispense from the ADS? No; it is now dispensing from the central pharmacy.

Based on what you just saw, answer these questions:

Questions for Review
1. Which of the following must be on a pharmacy’s med list for Epic to dispense a mixture from there? (Choose ONE answer.)

A. The mixture ERX record AND all ingredient ERX records

B. The mixture ERX record

C. Any ingredient ERX records

D. ALL ingredient ERX records

Answer: D

2. Why did you put the mixture ERX on the Central pharmacy’s med list?

You want the mixture to show up on the Facility List so that people can order it.

Critical	Epic does not care if the mixture record is on the medication list. We only added the mixture to the Central Pharmacy Med List so that it would appear on the Facility List (and so that IMS dispensable mapping will consider it an acceptable dispensable, see chapter 7).
Close your med list. Should this order dispense from the ADS? No; this mixture requires preparation, and nurses won't be able to do that on the floor.

To prevent Epic from dispensing mixtures from ADS cabinets or floor stock when the ingredients should be stocked there for individual use:

Enter the mixture’s preparation requirements.
In the mixture ERX record, assign a Prep Type of “IV Admixture” (1st screen)
Configure pharmacies that support mixture preparation.
Classic >> Rx Admin >> open pharmacy record >> Dispensing Information >> Supported preparation types field.
In Text, give your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W a prep type of “IV Admixture” and close the record.

In Classic, indicate that your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY supports all three prep types: IV admixture, Compound, and Chemo.

Close your record to save your changes!
This is already configured for TRN### 4 SOUTH SATELLITE pharmacy.
In Hyperspace, back in Caleb’s chart, refresh Dispense Details (). The dispense location should change to your central pharmacy.

Critical	
Epic picks a pharmacy as a dispense location for a mixture if:

The ingredients of the mixture (as selected for the order) are on the pharmacy’s Medication List (EFY) record
-and-
The Pharmacy (PHR) record supports the Prep Type of the mixture ERX record.
Epic does not care if the mixture record is on the medication list. We only added the mixture to the Central Pharmacy Med List so that it would appear on the Facility List. 

Printing Labels for Main Ingredient Mixtures
Write in Workbook	
Review: Label Printing

Look at your order. What type of label will print for it? Why?

A unit dose label because the dispense code is unit dose.

Why would a unit dose label be inappropriate for a medication order that requires preparation?

It does not include a Production label. We want a "recipe card" to print in addition to the label that will be affixed to the cefazolin bag.

Label considerations:

Dispense code: IVPB Mixture
Labels should print for any first dose, cart fill dose, or redispense.
Print two labels per action.
RX LABEL - PIGGYBACK PRODUCTION (only one of these should print regardless of the number of doses being dispensed)
RX LABEL - PIGGYBACK MIXTURE (one of these should print per dose)
 

You need to update your central pharmacy’s Label Routing to account for the “IVPB Mixture” dispense code.

Path: Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> Label Routing

 



In Classic, add the first two rows and the last two rows from the screenshot to your TRN### Central Pharmacy’s label routing table (the rows for Dispense (First Dose) and Redispense). Close your TRN### Central Pharmacy.

In the real world, you would add all the pictured rows. We are just adding these four in class so we have what we need but can save some time. 
In your mixture ERX record (in text), page down 29 times to Dispense Code Configuration. Set Default dispense code to “IVPB Mixture”

Preparation Instructions and Label Comments

For mixtures, configure:

Preparation instructions to guide technicians (or nurses) through preparing the mixture. These appear on production labels and in the Dispense Preparation activity.
Label comments that you want to appear on dispense labels (the “PIGGYBACK MIXTURE” labels that get affixed to the individual IV piggybacks. These also appear in the Dispense Preparation activity.
Page down 10 times to the Admin Instructions screen.

Add this Preparation Instructions SmartText:  RX PREP INSTRUCTIONS GENERIC NO MID PREP STEP RECONSTITUTED VIALS [24600].
SmartText = reusable block of text
TRAINER DEMO:  Back in Caleb’s chart, your trainer will discontinue (or reject) the current order for TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W, then place a new order for their trn### cefazolin mixture in the orders activity, and click Sign & Verify (choose an order mode and provider).

The Dispense code field should change.
Prep Instructions appear under the Dispense Details.
TRAINER DEMO: Your trainer will click Label Preview. Confirm we see the correct labels.

Configuring Administration
Nurses need to accurately document the patient’s fluid intake with IVPBs. Task templates add flowsheet rows for each IVPB order.

Use HOME + F9 to fast forward to the Task Template field (or, if your record is still open, you can page down 31 times). In that field, add “IP PIGGYBACK IV (DOSE AND VOLUME)” [3040000065].

This adds rows for orders to the nurses’ Intake/Output flowsheet.
All IVPB mixtures and premixes can use the same generic task template.
Close your record.

TRAINER DEMO: Back in hyperspace, your trainer will remove their current order and place a new one, then Verify that order. They will open the "I/O" flowsheet from the more options menu, and find the row that looks like this:



Configuring Charging for Mixtures
Epic will generate a separate charge for each ingredient in a mixture. It uses the charge method, linked procedure, and cost of each ingredient. There is no special configuration required to charge for a mixture.

Beyond the Basics: Mixture Build Wizard
The Build Wizard is a tool that guides builders to implement new features or create new records using a “spell”, or question-and-answer workflow. One of the Willow spells is the Mixture Medication Builder.

The Mixture Medication Builder was designed to assist with creating new (non-TPN) mixtures. This question-and-answer format is especially useful for people who are less familiar navigating Clinical Administration, but who understand the terminology needed to configure a mixture.

To learn more about the Build Wizard, see the Build Wizard Setup and Support Guide at galaxy.epic.com.

In Class Exercises
Exercise: Configure a Version in 100 mL of base
Example	
Throughout this chapter, you’ve been configuring a main ingredient mixture for ceFAZolin in 50 mL of base. That’s appropriate for adult patients when the dose of ceFAZolin is 1 g or less.

When a patient needs 1 g or more of ceFAZolin, it should be prepared in 100 mL of base. Because this represents a different volume of base, you will need a second main ingredient mixture ERX.

Part 1: Create the Mixture
 

Discontinue any active orders for ceFAZolin for Caleb.
In text, create a new record: “TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML D5W” (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).
On the first screen, configure the following fields:
Configured?: Yes
Template type: Mixture
Synonyms: Ancef
Prep Type: IV admixture
Match the fields with their function:
Field	Function
Template Type B	A. Prevents system from dispensing mixture from ADS or Floor Stock even if the ingredients are available.
Synonyms C	B. Tells system it’s a mixture, composed of multiple ingredients.
Prep Type A	C. Helps users find record when ordering.
Page down to the Mixture Setup 1 screen.
Set Order Disp Name: “trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 100 mL D5W”
Where will the users see this?
a) On search results, like the Database tab or the Facility List
b) The Order Name in the Orders activity, on the MAR, etc.
Answer: A (Note: If you use this mixture as a dispensable for an IMS orderable, the mixture's order display name will also appear in Verify Orders. See chapter 7. IMS for IVs for details)

Epic should Calculate rate given volume and admin duration.
Set Frequency to “Every 8 hours” [200521].
Set Admin Duration to “60 minutes”.
HINT: Don’t forget to fill in the Units field.
Configure Suggested Doses for Order Entry: 1g, 1.5 g and 2 g (default).
Which of the fields above will (by themselves) cause buttons to appear in the Order Composer?
a) Frequency
b) Admin Duration & Units
c) Suggested Doses for Order Entry - Dose & Units
Answer: C

True or False: Users will be able to manually enter doses other than 1 g, 1.5 g, and 2 g. True
Page down to the Mixture Setup 2 screen.
Configure the fields at the bottom like so:
Drug	Dose	Units	Type	Sel
CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4301445]	 	 	Medication	Main Ingredient
DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]	100	mL	Base	Yes
SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN
[27838]	100	mL	Base	No
Why do you think you can leave the Dose and Units column blank for the CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 10 G IJ SUSR?
Because cefazolin is the Main Ingredient. The dose of the cefazolin is controlled by the Suggested Doses for Order Entry.

Page down to the Mixture Order Composer Items screen. Configure the following fields:
Route Buttons: Intravenous
Frequency Buttons: Once [200902], Every 6 hours [200040], Every 8 hours [200521], and Every 12 hours [200523]
Admin Duration Buttons: 30;60
Do not allow custom doses of the two bases.
Answer the following questions:
What does “30;60” mean in the Admin Duration Buttons field?
Two buttons: "30 minutes" and "60 minutes"

What units will the Admin Duration buttons use? Where is the system getting that?
"Minutes" from the Admin Duration Unit field on Mixture Setup 1

What could happen if you left the Allow Custom Dose? column blank for the D5W and NS?
Users could change the volume to something other than 100 mL.

Page down to the Order Composer Section Setup screen. Configure it like this:
 



If you forgot this step, what are some bad things an end-user could do?
They could select BOTH bases, or NOT select any base.

Page down to the Inpatient Medication Order Name Options screen. Enter the following configuration:
Order Name Suffix: IVPB
Extensions Order Entry… and After Ordering…: 34917-IP RXNAME STANDARD (MAIN INGREDIENT WITH BASE DISPLAYED AND BASE QUANTITY)
Answer the following questions (check with your instructor if you aren’t sure of your answers):
Circle the Order Name Suffix in the Order Name, below:

What would the Order Name look like if you forgot to put 34917 in the Order Entry and After Ordering extension fields? (Choose ONE only. If you’re not sure, remove the extension and test it on Caleb.)
a) ceFAZolin (Ancef) 2 g
b) ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB 2 g
c) dextrose 5 % 50 mL with ceFAZolin (Ancef) 2 g IVPB
d) trn4## ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 100 mL
Answer: B

Page down to the Calculation Configuration screen and configure:
Allowed Order Units: g, mg
Allowed Route: Intravenous (Default), Intraosseous
Answer the following questions:
What would happen if you left the Allowed Order Units field blank? (Choose ONE only.)
a) Any unit would be available in the Dose field
b) No units would be available in the Dose field
c) The Allowed Order Units would come from the CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL (the main ingredient’s ERX record)
Answer: A

What would happen if you left the allowed routes field blank? (Choose ALL that apply.)
a) Any route would be available
b) No routes would be available
c) No route would be selected by default
d) The allowed routes would come from the CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL (the main ingredient’s ERX record)
Answer: A, C

Page down once. Enter a Default dispense code of “IVPB Mixture”.
Page down to the Default Administration Instructions screen. Add the Preparation Instructions Smart Text: RX PREP INSTRUCTIONS GENERIC NO MID PREP STEP RECONSTITUTED VIALS [24600]
Add the Label Comment Short Text: “Refrigerate before use.”
Answer the following questions:
On which label(s) will the Preparation Instruction Short Text appear? (Choose ONE or BOTH answers.)
a) Production label
b) Dispense label

Answer: A

On which label(s) will the Default Label Comments Short Text appear? (Choose ONE or BOTH answers.)
a) Production label
b) Dispense label
Answer: B

Page down to the Order Specific Questions screen. Add RX ANTIMICROBIAL BACTERIAL INDICATION [120620] under Inpatient Questions
What are we adding to the order composer with this configuration?
We are adding the "Suspected Indication" question to the mixture ERX instead of relying on it coming from the ingredient ERX.

Page down to the Order Composer Configuration screen. Add this OCC: “4080200014-RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE”
If you used RX SIMPLE MED for the OCC instead of the one above, what Display Item(s) wouldn’t appear in the Order Composer?
Admin Duration. ("Base" would actually appear at the very end, right above the Dispense section, because you made selecting a base required. But it's not technically a display item in Rx Simple Med.)

Use HOME F9 to fast forward to the Task Templates & Administration Group screen. Add the Task Template: “IP PIGGYBACK IV (DOSE AND VOLUME)” [3040000065]
What does this Task Template do? (Choose ONE only)
a) It puts tasks on the nurse’s Brain
b) It adds flowsheet rows for this order to the Intake/Output flowsheet
c) It embeds flowsheets in the MAR administration form
d) It allows nurses to scan the order ID barcode for this mixture
Answer: B

Close the record.
Part 2: Add Your Mixture to Your Lists
In Classic, add your mixture record to your central pharmacy med list.
Your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML D5W
Leave the green dot! We will come back to this in chapter 7.
In the previous exercise, you already confirmed that the ingredients for this mixture were on the central pharmacy med list.
Add your mixture record to your formulary med list. 
Close your central pharmacy and formulary medication list.
Part 3: Test Your Work
Go to Hyperspace and log in as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Open Caleb’s chart and discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Order your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML D5W for Caleb.
Open the Order Composer. It should look like this:
 



Change it to an Admin Duration of 30 minutes.
Change the Base to sodium chloride 0.9 %.
​​​​​​​The order name should reflect this change in base.
Accept the Order Composer and click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider. 
It should look like this:


 

Click Verify.
Go to Flowsheets and select the I/O tab. There should be a group for “ceFAZolin (Ancef) 2 g in dextrose 5 % 100 mL IVPB,” like so:
​​​​​​​​​​​​​​

If You Have Time: Further Dispensing Options
 

Beyond the Basics	This exercise is beyond the basics. You might find it interesting or useful, but aren’t expected to know it for the project or exam.
While we are talking about mixtures, let's take a deeper look at the dispense tools we have to help us with preparation.

 

Part 1: Exploring Dispense Preparation
In Hyperspace, go to Medications >> Order Hx for Caleb’s ceFAZolin (Ancef) 2 g in dextrose 5 % 100 mL IVPB order.
If you see at least one Dispense (First Dose) action, move on to step 2.
If you see a Dispense (pending) action, dispense one of your queued dispenses.
Click Queued Dispenses, select a dose, and click Print Selected
Go to main toolbar >> Pharmacy >> Dispense Preparation.
Here, you document prepping mixtures and drawing up syringes. In the real world, you’d use it with a touchscreen and barcode scanner.
In the training environment, you’re automatically signed in.
Next, you’d scan the barcode on the dose label. To mock that up in class, we will use Barcodifier. click Pharmacy >> Simulate Barcode Scanners, select your Caleb's cefazolin IV and click Send Barcode. If prompted, select a dose to prepare.
You should see the following:


The system identified the dose that you’re preparing and is showing you the ingredients. On the right, you can see the Preparation Instructions and Label Comments.
Notice there are no checkboxes next to the steps in the top right. There doesn't seem to be anything prompting users to complete each step before moving on to finalizing. More to come on this!
The next step is to scan the ingredients. Let’s start with the NS. Back in Barcodifier (unless you closed it just switch back to the window!), click the NS 100 mL barcode then click Send Barcode.
How can you tell it’s been "scanned"?
The "sodium chloride 0.9 % infusion (IV)" bubble turns green and shows the NDC you "scanned".

Now, let’s try "scanning" the ceFAZolin. Back in Barcodifier click the Cefazolin 1 g vial label and then click Send Barcode. 
In the pop-up window we will need to "scan" in our diluent. Back in Barcodifier, click the barcode for Sterile water for injection and then click Send Barcode.
Note that the amount needed is 9.5 mL. That is configured in the WET VIAL ERX record.
Click Accept to confirm the reconstitution.
Click Finalize and receive a warning.
It’s telling you that you haven’t scanned enough ceFAZolin to make this mixture.
A similar warning can appear when you scan too many packages (or too large of a package). The buttons are configurable.
Click Cancel for the warning and "scan" the next vial. Back in Barcodifier select the barcode for Cefazolin 10 g vial and then click Send Barcode.
This is a 10 g vial. Pretend it's already been reconstituted earlier, but has only has 1 g (10 mL) left.
In the first pop-up, confirm that you're using only 10 mL from the 2nd vial.
Then click Already Reconstituted in the second popup, and indicate it was reconstituted in SWFI.
The cefazolin ingredient is now green and has a check mark next to it.
Below the ingredients, you’ll see the each of the NDCs you scanned as well.
To confirm your work, click Finalize at the bottom of the screen.
Under Recently Completed Preparations, you see the preparation you just completed.
If you had a barcode scanner and an ID badge, you could have scanned that instead!
Close the Dispense Preparation activity. This dose is prepared!
Part 2: Checking the Dispense
You just pretended to be a technician preparing a dispense. Now pretend you’re the pharmacist checking that it’s been prepared correctly.

In Hyperspace, go to main toolbar >> Pharmacy >> Dispense Checking.
You would normally scan the barcode label to start checking the dose. In class we'll once again use Barcodifier. Back in Barcodifier, select the barcode for your Caleb's cefazolin IV then click Send Barcode.
Look over the report that appears.
You can see the work you just did in the Dispense Preparation activity, including the warnings you saw and the NDCs you used for the ceFAZolin.
Uh oh! You spot something wrong. Reject this dispense and choose whatever reason you like. Tell the system to generate a new label.
On the main toolbar, click Order Hx. Enter the Order # (see last section).
You see that the Dispense (First Dose) you were working with is canceled. There are new actions for Return (because you charged on dispense) and Redispense (to replace the ruined dose).
Part 3: Configuring the Dispense Prep Workflow
When you prepped the ceFAZolin mixture in part 1 you noticed that there seemed to be no requirement to complete all steps of the preparation like you saw back in RX100. Let's take a moment to see how we can configure our location to prompt users to complete steps like taking pictures to complete the preparation.

Back in Classic, open you hospital record Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin >> trn### Hospital (replacing trn### with your trn###).
Open the Workflow Configuration section.
This is where we can set a default workflow configuration for Dispense prep, as well as establish overrides for medications with certain dispense codes or meeting certain rules.
By Default, we want our users to take pictures for each ingredient used as well as the final product, but we don't want every preparation to require mid-prep review. In the Default workflow configuration field, enter "Rx Prep Steps Without Mid-Prep Review" then click Accept to close the hospital record and save your changes. 
This will give users a warning if they have not completed the steps of scanning the ingredients and taking pictures.
If we wanted to override this workflow we could use the Workflow Configuration Overrides table. For class, we are just going to set the default.
If you are interested in the configuration of this workflow, check out the beyond the basics box at the end of the Key Takeaways section.
Back in Hyperspace, if you don't have it open already, go to Medications >> Order Hx for Caleb’s ceFAZolin (Ancef) 2 g in dextrose 5 % 100 mL IVPB order.
If the most recent dispense action is "Dispense (Pending)", click Queued Dispenses and print the "Redispense" action. 
Open Dispense Preparation again (Pharmacy >> Dispense Preparation) and "scan" Caleb's ceFAZolin order.
You can use Barcodifier, and send Caleb's Cefazolin IV barcode.
You can also record the order number, select Manually Enter Order and enter the number you recorded.
Notice the checkbox steps on the right side of your screen. Use Barcodifier to scan in the ingredients (refer to part 1 for the exact steps if needed)
Click Finalize. You get a warning telling you that you have incomplete steps. In this case, the warning tells us we need to take some pictures.
You can override the warning for class (unless you have a camera connected and want to try it out!)
Part 4: Updating Your Labels
If your organization is using the Dispense Queue to manage labels in real time, you might want to print an expiration date & time on the labels based on the stability of the mixture and when they are printed from the Dispense Queue.

The first step is to add a stability to your mixture records. In Text, open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W mixture record in text.
Page to the Mixture Setup 1 screen.
In the Stability field, enter “14”. Tab over to the Units field and enter “Days”. Press SHIFT+F7.
Open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML and repeat the previous step.
Go to Classic. Go to Classic >> search (Ctrl+Space) >> "SmartText".
Open TRN### RX LABEL – PIGGYBACK MIXTURE (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).
When asked to pick a version click Accept.
You’ll see the SmartText for the label, like so. The Editor may only be displaying about half of the label. While there is no scroll bar, if you click into the window that contains the label, you can scroll down to see the entire label.
Each of the @...@ items is a SmartLink (or a variable) on the label.


Right-click the current cell for Expire date and choose Delete Rows.
Right-click on the @FSRXLABELCOMMENTS@ row and choose Insert Rows. Enter “1” in the Number of rows field and click Accept.
In the blank row you inserted, type “Expires: @RXEXPDATE@” (this is the SmartLink for the expiration date and time), like so:

Click Accept to save your work.
Now you need your central pharmacy to use this label for your label routing. Go to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin and open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY.
Change the RX LABEL - PIGGYBACK MIXTURE labels to your revised label (with the dynamic expiration date and time).
Earlier we added the rows for "Dispense (First Dose)" and "Redispense" actions. Use your custom dispense label for the dispense label (you can use the standard production label).


Pharmacy Admin, Label Routing form: using your label with expiration date

Close your pharmacy record.
Return to Hyperspace. Discontinue any active orders for Caleb. Pick an order mode and provider.
Order your trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB in 50 mL D5W.
Click Sign (to auto-verify the order). Pick an order mode and provider.
Go to the Medications activity.
Redispense your active ceFAZolin order (from your central pharmacy).
Now click Order Hx. You’ll see a Dispense (Pending) action for your redispense because it’s in the Dispense Queue.
Click Queued Dispenses (it might be under the More button).
Select the queued label for the Redispense and click Print Selected.
Let’s see that label! Click Label Hx (it might be under the More button).
Select the row for the Redispense that has your TRN### RX LABEL – PIGGYBACK MIXTURE and click Reprint/Preview Labels. If you don't see the label, click Show Preview.
In the label preview that appears, you can see the expiration date and time. Notice that it’s 14 days from right now. The label calculates the expiration date & time based on when you actually print the label. Since you’re about to reprint it, that’s right now.
Key Takeaways: Configuring Main Ingredient Mixtures
Configuring Ingredients
Give your new record a Template type of “Mixture” (first screen) to access mixture setup screens. Then:



Do not allow custom doses for the base (via the Mixture Order Composer Items screen), and require that users select one and only one base.

 



 



Configuring Naming
 

Order Disp Name	
<generic medication> (<Brand name>) IVPB in <base volume> <base>

Visible in Dispensable field in Verify Orders.
Include D5W or NS at the end, whichever is selected by default
Order Name	
By default: <short name of main ingredient> (<Brand name of main ingredient>) <dose> <suffix of mixture>.

Order Name Suffix: IVPB
Add Order Entry and After Ordering extension: 34917 - IP RXNAME STANDARD (MAIN INGREDIENT WITH BASE DISPLAYED AND BASE QUANTITY)
Adds base name and volume.
Configuring the Order Composer
Configure buttons and defaults as you normally would but include these additional settings:





Order Specific Questions	When appropriate, add LQL records to Inpatient Questions field. This will add an Order Specific Question to the order composer.
OCC	
“RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE” [4080200014]

Includes Admin Duration, and the Base section.
Use the Order Composer Section Setup screen to create sections in the order composer so that users can choose between ingredients.



Section Type	
If there is only one base ingredient, you do not need to configure this screen.

If there are multiple base ingredients, enter a section type of “Base.”

Select One Only?	Set this to “Yes.” This prevents users from selecting both bases.
Selection Required?	
Set this to “Yes.” This prevents users from accidentally clearing the selected base.

This will also cause the Bases section to appear in the order composer without making any changes to the OCC.

Dosing Units
Allowed Order Unit	Limit the allowed order units for the main ingredient by listing them on the Allowed Units & Routes page in the mixture ERX record.
Adding to Med & Preference Lists
Formulary	Add the mixture ERX record and all ingredient ERX records.
Central Pharmacy	
Add the mixture ERX record and all ingredient ERX records.

Keep the green dot on the mixture (should be on Facility List), unless it’s part of an IMS IVPB (see chapter 7).
Remove green dot from each ingredient, unless it is ordered on its own.
Other dispense locations	
Add ingredient ERXs and NDCs you stock at the location (ADS cabinets update automatically on load).

Mixture ERX records don’t need to be added
Configuring Dispensing
Prep Type	
IV Admixture

Can only be dispensed from Pharmacy (PHR) records that support this prep type.
Dispense Code	IVPB Mixture
Preparation Instructions	
SmartText or Short Text

Appears in Dispense Prep and on production labels
Label Comments	
SmartText or Short Text

Appears on dose labels
Label Routing
(in Pharmacy record)	
Two rows per action (one for dose label, one for production label)

Actions: Dispense (First Dose), Dispense (Cart Fill) and Redispense
Production Labels are grouped and use SmartText: “RX LABEL – PIGGYBACK PRODUCTION.”
Dose Labels are NOT grouped and use SmartText: “RX LABEL – PIGGYBACK MIXTURE.”


Pharmacy Admin, Label Routing: printing labels for IV piggyback mixtures

Beyond the Basics	
Within the hospital record, you can also configure which steps user are prompted to complete and when during the dispense preparation process they should complete them. Rx Admin >> Hospital Admin >> Hospital Record >> Workflow Configuration

With no workflow record set, the preparation instructions will be the same list of instructions you might see in verification. In the exercise you got the chance to see what it looks like when you use a workflow record. The prep steps became more of a checklist, and users are warned if the list isn't complete. As the steps are completed they get checked off, much like the ingredients.



You can set a default workflow for all preparations at a hospital. You can also use the "Workflow Configuration Overrides" table to override that behavior for medications with certain dispense codes or that meet a certain rule. Foundations System will come with a number of workflow ready to go to account for things like mid-prep review, reconstitution, and more. Many organizations will use these as a base and edit them to meet there needs, or build new ones.

For more information on workflow records check out the Dispensing Setup and Support Guide, specifically: Guide Pharmacy Staff Through Dispensing Medications

Configuring Administration
Task Template	
IP PIGGYBACK IV (DOSE AND VOLUME)

Use this for each IVPB.
Same task template used in most IVPBs
Configuring Charging for Mixtures
Epic will generate a separate charge for each ingredient in a mixture. It uses the charge method, linked procedure, and cost of each ingredient. There is no special configuration required to charge for a mixture.

Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

You’ve been asked to create a mixture ERX record for a cefoxitin IVPB in 100 mL of base. It will be made with CEFOXITIN SODIUM 2 G/20ML and 100 mL of DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOL by default, with an option for 100 mL of SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV.

On the first screen of the ERX record, in which field would you indicate that this record is a mixture? (Choose ONE only.)
Name
Template type
Prep type
Orderable type
B) Template type. Set this field to “Mixture.”

In what setting do you designate an ingredient as the “main ingredient” of a mixture?
In the “Sel” column on the Mixture Setup 2 screen.

Fill in the Mixture Setup 2 screenshot below appropriately for this mixture:

 



Which OCC record is most appropriate for a main ingredient mixture with multiple base options? (Choose ONE only.)
RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE
RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE NO BASE - NO ADMIN OVER
RX SIMPLE MED
This is a trick question; you don’t need to attach an OCC to a concentration-based mixture.
The correct answer is a) RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE. RX SIMPLE MED does not have the Admin Duration field and since we have a choice of bases, we will want them to show in the order composer.

 

Are all IVPBs main ingredient mixtures?
No. IVPBs can also come in premixes (simple ERX records).

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

IV piggyback (IVPB)

Mixture ERX record

Prep Type

Main Ingredient mixture

Admin Duration

Preparation Instructions

Label Comments

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Define the ingredients of a main ingredient mixture (configure the Mixture Setup 2) screen.

Configure the Order Composer of a mixture (including OCC, buttons, default values, order specific questions, and allowed options)

Add a main ingredient mixture (and all it’s appropriate records) to the formulary

Add a main ingredient mixture (and all it’s appropriate records) to the central pharmacy’s medication list

Prevent a mixture from dispensing from inappropriate locations such as an ADS cabinet or floor stock

Cause specific continuous medications to have its dispenses automatically scheduled

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

What constitutes an IVPB

That not all IVPBs are mixtures

Why a mixture record must be created in the system

The impact of designating a “Main Ingredient” in a mixture ERX record

That you should create a separate main ingredient mixture for each combination of a main ingredient and the volume of the base

How the Order Name of a main ingredient mixture is generated

How Epic picks products to dispense 

6. Day 2 Lab
Introduction
This lab presents you with unguided challenges. They reinforce and apply what you’ve learned already and test your understanding of that knowledge. Work through these exercises on your own. Get as far as you can in the time you have. If you get stuck, ask your instructor for assistance.

Critical	
The lab assumes that you have configured the following records as shown below. If you’ve been following along in class, you have!

When doing this lab at home, configure these records before you start:

Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin >> your TRN### Hospital >>



Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> your TRN### 4 South ADS >>



 

 

Add Promethazine to Your Hospital
Beyond the Basics	
Use the blank spaces below each configuration requirement to write down what you plan to do in the system. Research shows that writing out complex plans helps your brain to retain learning long term.

If you view this training companion in Galaxy with the answers visible, the solutions to each problem will appear in those blank spaces.

Your hospital has decided to start carrying promethazine (Phenergan) 25 mg/mL injection. Someone else has configured the ERX record, but you’ve been asked to handle the Medication List (EFY) records and the NDCs.

Add Promethazine to Your Med Lists
Configure your TRN### medication lists to reflect the following:

TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN has been approved for use by your organization’s P&T committee.
Your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY stocks TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN. It should also appear on the Facility List tab. Central Pharmacy carries this NDC:
0641-0928-21 (1 mL unit-dose vial; dispense the entire package; dispense this package by default)
 

Create a Prepack Syringe for Promethazine
Your hospital is prepacking 0.5 mL syringes of promethazine in bulk, and labeling them for dispensing as unit-dose syringes.

Create a new package for these 0.5 mL syringes. Use NDC TRN###-777-77 (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet). Link it to your TRN### promethazine ERX. Make sure it has the right package size and description.
Package size: 0.5; Units: mL; Package description: Syringe

When you use this NDC, charges sent to the billing system should appear as if NDC 0641-0928-21 (the commercially available vial) was used. Add the Cost to use for billing and Cost ID from that NDC and to your custom NDC.
To do this, you'll need to open NDC 0641-0928-21 and find that information on the Cost Info form.

Ensure that you will always charge for the entire 0.5 mL syringe, even if a nurse only administers part of it.
Add this NDC to your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST. Dispense the entire package.
Add TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN to your TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS MED LIST. Your ADS only stocks your prepacked custom NDC. Dispense the entire package and make it the default dispense.
Identify Problems with the Promethazine ERX Record
Whoever set up your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN missed a few important things. Let’s identify some problems.

Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Go to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Click +New near the Place new order field and search for “prometh”.
CHECK: Your trn### promethazine should appear on the Facility List tab. (If it does not, consider this a PROBLEM that needs to be fixed.)
CHECK: Your promethazine appears like so: 
trn### promethazine (Phenergan) 25 mg/mL injection
PROBLEM:  On search results, the "25 mg/mL" should come after "injection".
You need to fix the Order Display Name in your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN. The strength should appear at the end.

After that, you need to update your Facility List (the med is already on the central pharmacy med list, and changing the Order Display Name doesn't dynamically update that as well).  To fix:
1) Open your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List.
2) Remove the green dot from your promethazine.
3) Click Read-Only to save your changes.
4) Click Edit and put the green dot back by your promethazine.
5) Close the med list.

Select your trn### promethazine and look at the order composer:
PROBLEM: the order name says “solution” instead of “injection”
Fix the Inpatient order name suffix in your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN.

PROBLEM: the order name includes the strength and it shouldn't
Set Include Strength in Order Name to No

PROBLEM: the default dose is 12.5 mg. It should be 25 mg for an adult.
Change the default dose in the Adult context override. 

PROBLEM: Change the dose to 25 mg. The Calculated Dose is 625 mL for a 25 mg dose. That’s not right. It should be 1 mL.
Fix the Equiv Qty and Unit table in your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN.

PROBLEM: The dispense amount is “0.5 mL,” and it stays 0.5 mL no matter what dose you select. That’s not right.
Hint: clear the Dispense package checkbox and note that the Dispense amount field is now blank. The dispense amount should calculate automatically, and then drive IPS to pick the correct package. 
There is no Dispense Unit in your TRN### PROMETHAZINE record. As a result, IPS doesn't work on it.  The system is ALWAYS choosing the dispense the default package you selected.  Because there's a yellow dot next to the 0.5 mL syringe, the dispense amount becomes 0.5 mL.

PROBLEM: The default Route is “Intramuscular.” It should be “Intravenous” for all patients. 
The Allowed Routes table is blank in the base version of the record, but configured in the Adult context override with IM as the default. You can fix this one particular problem by changing the default in the Adult context override. A better approach would be to delete the Allowed Routes from the context override and enter them into the base record instead.

PROBLEM: Neither of the PRN reasons are selected. Both should be selected by default.
Fix this on the Inpatient PRN Settings screen of your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN.

PROBLEM: The dispense code is “Syringe,” but you always dispense this as Unit Dose syringes. The dispense code should be “Unit Dose.”
Change the Default dispense code in your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN.

Remove this order & close Caleb’s chart.
Open the Orders activity for your Buffy patient.
Search for and select your TRN### promethazine again. In addition to the problems above, also note these problems:
PROBLEM: There are dose buttons for 0.25, 0.5, and 0.75 mg/kg. For patients like Buffy, there should ALSO be a button for 1 mg/kg (none of them should be selected by default).
Add the 1 mg/kg button to the Pediatric contextual override of your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN.

PROBLEM: There are frequency buttons for q4h PRN and q6h PRN. For patients like Buffy, you ALSO want a button for Once [200902].
You need to list all three frequency buttons in the Pediatric contextual override for your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN. If you're being thorough, you should also remove the frequency buttons from the base version of the record and add Q4H PRN and Q6H PRN buttons to the Adult contextual override.

Click Cancel.
Click the star icon. Try to set the default dose to 1 mg/kg.
PROBLEM: “mg/kg” isn’t an allowed dose unit on this screen. Only “mg” and “mL” appear to be allowed. The options should be “mg” and “mg/kg”.
You need to enter "mg" and "mg/kg" in the Allowed Order Units field in the BASE version of your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN. Right now, the allowed units are only set in the override contexts. You are only seeing "mg" and "mL" as options because those are the choices listed on the Rx Unit Equivalence screen.

Click the magnifying glass for Route.
PROBLEM: All routes are available here. Only "Intravenous" and "Intramuscular" should appear as options.
You need to enter these as the Allowed Routes on the Rx Order Setup screen of the BASE version of your TRN### PROMETHAZINE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN record. Right now, the allowed units are set only in the override contexts. When you are adding a medication to a Preference List (including a user's favorites) or a SmartSet, the order composer reflects only the settings in the base version of the record.  

Click Cancel so that you don’t add this to your personal preference list.
Fix the Problems
Now fix the problems you just identified. Then test your injection (see below).

Test Your Injection
Follow these steps and evaluate each “CHECK” statement to see if you have met the requirements above.

In Hyperspace, close both Caleb’s and Buffy’s charts before testing.
Go to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Click the +New button and search for your trn###.
CHECK: On the Facility List tab, your order appears like so (with the "25 mg/mL" strength at the end):
trn### promethazine (Phenergan) injection 25 mg/mL
HINT: If you fixed the problem in your ERX record but you still see the strength, open the medication list linked to the preference list, click Edit, click Link Pref List, and then click Rebuild Preference List to force it to update (yes, you're sure).
Select and accept your promethazine order for Caleb.
CHECK: the Order Composer does NOT open by default.
CHECK: the Order Name appears like so (with “injection” instead of “solution”):

Open the order composer for your trn### promethazine.
CHECK: The Calculated Dose is 1 mL.
CHECK: The default route is “Intravenous” (not “Intramuscular”)
CHECK: There should be no search field for route, only the two buttons. 
CHECK: both PRN reasons (nausea and vomiting) are selected by default
CHECK: the dispense location is your TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS.
CHECK: the system is dispensing your 0.5 mL Syringe. The Dispense amount should be 1 mL and Dispense package x 2 should be selected.
CHECK: the dispense code is “Unit Dose”
Change the dose to 50 mg. (Ignore the dose warning.)
CHECK: The Calculated Dose changes to 2 mL
CHECK: The dispense location changes to your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY and the package changes to the 1 mL vial (dispense package x 2).
Click Cancel and remove the order. Close Caleb’s chart.
Go to the Orders activity for Buffy.
Search for “trn### prom”. The Order Composer should open automatically.
CHECK: There are four dose buttons: 0.25 mg/kg, 0.5 mg/kg, 0.75 mg/kg, and 1 mg/kg.
CHECK: The default route is “Intravenous” (not “Intramuscular”)
CHECK: There should be no search field for route, only the two buttons.
CHECK: There are three frequency buttons: q4h PRN, q6h PRN, and Once (we didn’t specify in which order they should appear)
CHECK: both PRN reasons (nausea and vomiting) are selected by default.
Click Cancel.
Click the star icon. Try to enter a default dose of 1 mg/kg.
CHECK: The unit options should be “mg” and “mg/kg”.
CHECK: There should be no search field for route, only the two buttons.
Click Cancel so that you don’t add this to your personal preference list.
If You Have Time: Configure an Injection
You’ve been asked to configure the ERX record for your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE HCL 0.3 MG/ML IJ SOLN. This is a C-III controlled medication used for treating acute pain. The record is currently completely unconfigured, like it would be when it was first loaded from Medi-Span. Only one strength is commercially available.

Review the Needs
Critical	Read the following needs and complete the section on Plan Your Build before you start building anything in text or Hyperspace.
You want users to be able search for this record by either of the following:

Buprenex
300 mcg/mL
On the Database tab and your Facility List tab, it should appear as "trn### buprenorphine (Buprenex) injection" (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet). 

Buprenex for Adults

When you order this medication for an adult patient (ages 15+, like Caleb), the Order Composer should appear mostly like this by default (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet):



How your buprenorphine should appear for adults

Buprenex for Peds

When you order it for a pediatric patient (age 1-14 years, like Buffy), it should appear like so by default:



How your buprenorphine should appear for pediatric patients

You’ll be stocking packages that contain 0.3 mg (300 mcg), 0.15 mg (150 mcg), and 0.075 mg (75 mcg) and want those to be standardized doses. If a complex dose ends up anywhere within 10% of one of those three doses, it should use the standardized dose for the simplified dose. For example, if you order this med for Buffy and choose 5 mcg/kg, you should see this:



What a 5 mcg/kg dose should look like for Buffy

Buprenex on a Preference List

If you add this medication to a preference list, the Add to Preference List window should look like this (Note: The default dose may vary based on which patient chart you are in):



How your buprenorphine should appear while adding it to a preference list

Allowed Units & Routes

In all three situations (adults, pediatrics, and in the preference list):

The allowed dosing units should be: mg and mcg/kg
The allowed routes should be the ones shown as buttons (Intravenous and Intramuscular)
Med Lists & Packages

Your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE HCL 0.3 MG/ML IJ SOLN is approved for use by your P&T committee. It’s also available in your central pharmacy.

You stock the commercially available 1 mL syringes from Hospira (0409-2012-32). You also prepack two unit-dose syringes:

A 0.5 mL syringe (use TRN###-777-05 for its NDC)
A 0.25 mL syringe (use TRN###-777-25 for its NDC)
When you dispense either of the prepacked NDCs, any charges sent to billing should show the commercially available NDC that you stock (0409-2012-32) and should use the same Cost ID and Cost to Use For Billing. Also, ensure that you charge for the entire package, even if nurses administer only part of one.

Because this is a controlled medication, you always want to dispense it from an ADS cabinet. If it isn’t currently loaded to your 4-South unit’s ADS cabinet, it should be loaded via the “Load to ADS” workflow.

Currently, the 0.25 mL prepack syringe and the 1 mL syringe (0409-2012-32) are loaded in your 4-South ADS. Make sure your med list reflects that.

You always dispense the entire package of any of these syringes. You never dispense a custom dose. The dispense code should be Unit Dose by default. 

Pain Row on the MAR

When nurses document an administration of this med, the Flowsheet row R PAIN SCORE [3040104280] should appear in the administration form.

Charging

Calculate charges for this medication as if it was a standard unit dose medication. It has a HCPCS code, so it should go to the billing system using code HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/ HCPCS (ALT 636 FOR OP/ED).

Plan Your Build
Before you actually build anything, review the needs above and make a plan.

Use the following boxes to indicate what settings you’d make in each place.
Be thorough! Try to account for ALL of the settings you’d need to make to meet the needs above.
It’s OK to be general (for example “Frequency buttons: q4h PRN, q6h PRN, q8h PRN” or “Central Med List: add 1 mL, 0.5 mL, and 0.25 mL syringes”) rather than naming specific fields.
Settings in Your TRN### Buprenorphine *PEDIATRIC* Context




Dose buttons: 2, 3, 4, and 6 mcg/kg (all with Default = No)
Frequency buttons: Q4H PRN, Q6H PRN, Q8H PRN

Settings in Your TRN### Buprenorphine *ADULT* Context




Dose buttons: 0.3 mg (default)
Frequency buttons: Q6H PRN, Q8H PRN

Settings in Your TRN### Buprenorphine *BASE* Record

Synonyms: Buprenex & 300 mcg/mL
Linked Procedure: HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/HCPCS
Order Display Name: trn### buprenorphine (Buprenex) injection
Default charge method: Unit Dose Standard
Default frequency: Q6H PRN
Suggested doses for Order Entry: leave blank (set only in override contexts)
Short name: trn### buprenorphine
Brand name: Buprenex
Suffix: injection
Include strength in order name? Yes
Include form in order name? No
Medication Unit: mg
Other medication unit: mcg
Administration & Dispense Units:  mL
Equiv Qty & Unit:  300 mcg : 1 mL
Allowed order units: mg, mcg/kg
Allowed Routes: Intravenous (default), Intramuscular
Standardized doses: 0.075 mg, 0.15 mg, and 0.3 mg (10% deviation)
Default dispense code: Unit Dose (or leave blank, system default)
PRN reasons: moderate pain & severe pain (selected)
OCC: Rx Simple Med
Frequency buttons: leave blank (set only in override contexts)
Route buttons: Intravenous, Intramuscular (in that order)
MAR Flowsheet, Flowsheet Rows: pain row [3555]

NDCs You’ll Need to Create & Settings in Each
TRN###-777-05:  Package size: 0.5 mL
TRN###-777-25:  Package size: 0.25 mL
In both: 
Link to medication: TRN### BUPRENORPHINE...
Description: Syringe
NDC to send to billing: 0409-2012-32
Cost ID is 00409201232, and cost to use for billing 11.949 per mL (copied from NDC 0409-2012-32)  

Medication Lists You’ll Need to Edit (and How)
TRN### HOSPITAL FORMULARY:  
Add your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE... ERX record (NDCs don't matter).

TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST:  
Add your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE... ERX record.  
Select NDC 0409-2012-32, TRN###-777-05, and TRN###-777-25.  
Yellow dots next to each.  
Pick one as a default.

TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS MED LIST:  
Add your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE... ERX record.  
Select NDC 0409-2012-32 and TRN###-777-25 (but not your other NDC).  
Both get yellow dots.  
Pick one as the default.

TRN### LOAD TO ADS MED LIST:
Add your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE... ERX record (NDCs don't matter). 

 
Build!
Now that you’ve planned your work, actually build it! Log into text and configure your TRN### BUPRENORPHINE HCL 0.3 MG/ML IJ SOLN record to meet the needs above.

Test Your Work
Log in to Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Open Caleb's chart. Search for your "trn###".
CHECK: Confirm that it appears on your Facility List tab like so: 
trn### buprenorphine (Buprenex) injection
Select the order and check the Order Composer.
CHECK: It should match the "Buprenex for Adults" screen shot earlier in the exercise.
CHECK: The Calculated Dose should be "1 mL" and the dose at the end of the order name should be "0.3 mg".
CHECK: Click the magnifying glass for Dose. Only "mg" and "mcg/kg" should be available.
CHECK: There should be no field for Route, only the buttons for Intravenous and Intramuscular.
Click Cancel.
Click the star icon to add it to your preference list.
CHECK: It should match the "Buprenex on a Preference List" screen shot earlier in the exercise.
CHECK: Click the magnifying glass for Dose. Only "mg" and "mcg/kg" should be available.
CHECK: There should be no field for Route, only the buttons for Intravenous and Intramuscular. 
CHECK: You should see NO buttons for Dose or Frequency.  
Click Cancel. Remove the order and go to Buffy’s chart.
Order Buprenex for Buffy.
CHECK: The Order Composer should match the "Buprenex for Peds" screen shot earlier in the exercise.
Enter a 5 mcg/kg dose.
CHECK: The Calculated Dose should be 150 mcg (not 0.15 mg or 146.5 mcg).
Hint: if the Calculated Dose appears are "0.15 mg," you need to enter "mcg" as the Other Medication Unit on the Rx Unit Equivalence screen. 
CHECK: Click the magnifying glass for Dose. Only "mg" and "mcg/kg" should be available.
CHECK: There should be no field for Route, only the buttons for Intravenous and Intramuscular. 
Look at the Dispense section. The dispense location should be your TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS. The package should be the 0.25 mL Syringe. Dispense package x2 should be selected.
Click the Package selection button. The 1 mL and 0.25 mL Syringes should both be available.
Change the Dispense from field to your TRN### LOAD TO ADS.
Click the Package drop-down arrow. The .25, .5, and 1 mL syringes should all be available.
Change both the Dispense from field and the First doses from fields to your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY.
Click the Package drop-down arrow. The 1 mL, 0.5 mL, and 0.25 mL Syringes should all be available.
Pick a package (doesn’t matter which one) and click Sign. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Go to the Medications activity. Select your buprenorphine and go to Order Hx.
CHECK: There’s should be at least one dispense, with a + under indicating that a charge was triggered.
Go to the MAR.
Find your trn### buprenorphine order and click in the current time column to document a new administration. When prompted to link a line, click Skip.
CHECK: You should see a flowsheet row for “Pain Screening” near the bottom right.
Cancel and log out. You’re done!
7. IV Piggybacks
Introduction
In chapter 5, you learned to create main ingredient mixtures to represent IV piggybacks that are prepared and dispensed by pharmacy from simple ERX records. Recall that an IV piggyback is…

An intravenous medication diluted in a base (usually NS, D5W, or sterile water) with…
An intermittent or one‐time frequency (such as “Q8H” or “Once”), that…
Is infused over a relatively short period of time (usually 15‐60 minutes, though sometimes over a few hours).
 

While an IV piggyback can be dispensed as a main ingredient mixture, that's not the only way they can be administered.  They might also be dispensed as:

Premixes (simple ERXs)
Mini-Bag Plus or similar mixtures prepared by nursing
A ratio-based mixture for pediatric patients
Example	
In chapter 5, you created two main ingredient mixtures to represent ceFAZolin IV piggybacks: one in 50 mL (for doses up to 1 g) and one in 100 mL (for doses of 1 g and above).

However, your organization might also dispense ceFAZolin IVs as:

A premix (a simple ERX record) for doses of exactly 1 g.
A Mini-Bag Plus mixture (which nurses can prepare on the floor) also for doses of exactly 1 g.
A 20 mg/mL mixture for pediatric patients, using a variable amount of base.
The way you dispense an IV piggyback is based on the patient, the dose, and what’s available. End users shouldn’t have to make that decision, so we use IMS for mixtures to streamline the process.


By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Configure a simple ERX record for an IV piggyback premix
Configure an ERX record for a Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixture
Configure a ratio-based mixture ERX record for a pediatric IVPB
Configure IMS for mixtures
An Overview of IMS for Mixtures
Why is IMS for Mixtures Necessary?
When writing paper orders, physicians indicate the medication, dose, route, and frequency. They don’t usually care how the medication is administered or dispensed; that’s Pharmacy’s job. IMS for mixtures makes the ordering workflow similar to writing a paper order.




 

Configuring IMS for Mixtures
Create and configure all simple and mixture ERX records for an IVPB.
These are your “dispensable” records.
Add them to the appropriate medication lists to indicate that they are available and on formulary.
Do not include dispensables or ingredients on preference lists (no green dots), unless they are ingredients of a mixture that might be ordered on their own.
Create an orderable ERX record.
This is the record your clinicians interact with.
Assign the appropriate OCC, default values and buttons, standardized dosing, and contextual overrides.
Map the orderable ERX record to your “dispensable” records.
List the dispensables in the order of preference, from top to bottom.
For each dispensable, indicate when it can be used, based on patient age, patient weight, and/or the ordered dose.
Choose one dispensable to be the failsafe (in case IMS fails)
Add the orderable record to:
The formulary and the central pharmacy med list (include the green dot so it appears on the Facility List).
Profile preference lists for physicians, nurses, etc.
Order Sets, panels, etc.
 



 

How IMS Selects a Product
First, the system determines which dispensables are acceptable. To be acceptable:

The dispensable must be on the central pharmacy’s medication list.
AND

Any criteria specified for the dispensable (such as patient age and/or dose) must be met.
IMS will only consider dispensing acceptable dispensables. An unacceptable dispensable is never even considered; it’s effectively removed from the process.

Epic then goes through dispense logic. For each dispense location, it asks which dispensables are available in that location?

Only 1: IMS selects that dispensable.
More than 1: IMS uses the first listed dispensable.
None: Epic moves on to the next dispense location.
If no dispensables can be found, IMS uses a “failsafe” dispensable set in the orderable record.

 

Assume that the ceFAZolin IV orderable in the diagram above is mapped to the dispensables (the mixture ERX and simple ERX records) as shown.

Also assume that:

All the mixture ERXs and simple ERXs shown are on the central pharmacy’s medication list.
The ADS cabinet has the ceFAZolin IVPB 1 g Mini-Bag in 50 mL, and can dispense it. It doesn’t have any of the other dispensables.
The satellite pharmacy and Load to ADS pharmacy don’t have any of the dispensables.
Given that, answer the following:

If order ceFAZolin IV orderable…	…then these are the acceptable dispensable…	…and IMS will choose this dispensable (from this pharmacy):
…with a dose of 370 mg on a 9 year old patient…	
cefazolin IV syringe 20 mg/mL (PED)

cefazolin IVPB in 50 mL

cefazolin IV syringe 20 mg/mL (PED) (Central Pharmacy)

…with a dose of 1,250 mg on a 9 year old patient…	
cefazolin IVPB in 100 mL

cefazolin IVPB in 100 mL (Central Pharmacy)

…with a dose of 500 mg on a 40 year old patient…	
cefazolin IVPB in 50 mL 

cefazolin IVPB in 50 mL (Central Pharmacy)

…with a dose of 1 g on a 40 year old patient…	
cefazolin IVPB 1 g (premix)

cefazolin IVPB 1 g Mini-Bag in 50 mL

cefazolin IVPB in 50 mL

cefazolin IVPB in 100 mL

cefazolin IVPB 1 g Mini-Bag in 50 mL (ADS cabinet)

Configuring Premix IVPBs
Premix IVPBs are simple ERX records; they should be configured for ordering.

Example	CEFAZOLIN SODIUM-DEXTROSE 1-4 GM/50ML-% IV SOLN is the simple ERX record for a 1 g premix of ceFAZolin. Because you’ll use IMS for mixtures for ceFAZolin, this premix record won’t be on the Facility List or anyone’s Preference List tab. But if a pharmacist accidentally orders it off the Database tab, you want the premix to work!
A properly configured premix IVPB appears like so in the Orders activity:



In Hyperspace, order your trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB 1 g in 50 mL (premix) for Caleb. You will need to find this on the Database tab (you are not looking for either of the main ingredient mixtures you made in chapter 5, which will show up on the Facility List tab)

Compare what you see in Hyperspace (which isn’t quite right) to the screenshot above (which is properly configured). Circle the differences

The Dose is not editable. There is an Admin Duration field. There is a Prod. Admin. Inst. There is a section for Suspected Indication.

 

Configuring an IV piggyback premix is similar to configuring an injection, with a few differences:

Indicate “Premix”	Include “premix” in the Order Display Name, Product-Specific Admin Instructions, and Label Comments.
Order Composer	
Age-based contexts typically not used.

Dose field matches dose of premix. Not editable.

Admin Duration field & buttons. Requires a new OCC.

Order-Specific Questions to capture the indication for the antibiotic, as with a main ingredient mixture.

Labels	Dispense code: “IVPB Premix”. No production labels.
Med Lists / Preference Lists	
Add to central pharmacy and formulary med lists.

Do not add to preference lists (no green dot) when using IMS.

Task Template	Adds infusion group to I/O Flowsheets. Use same task template that you use for main ingredient mixtures: IP PIGGYBACK IV (DOSE AND VOLUME).
Beyond the Basics	
Some hospitals make their own premixes, or buy premixes prepared in bulk by a specialized compounding agency. These premixes aren’t commercially available, so your third-party med data vendor won’t create a Medication (ERX) or Package (NDC) record for them.

For these, make custom simple ERX records, similar to repackaged partial tablets. In addition to the configuration below, you’ll need to:

Give them appropriate proxy medications (usually the ingredients used to create the premix).
Give them an appropriate GPI/GMI (work with your Epic rep).
Create custom NDCs for them, with an appropriate package size and type (for example, 250 mL flex container).
If you compound these premixes in-house, you might also create a compounding ERX record for use in the Compounding & Repackaging activity. See the Compounding and Repackaging Medications Setup and Support Guide.

 

Configuring Naming for Premixes
Configure the Order Name following the standard convention:

Short name: generic name of drug, lowercase or TALLman
Brand name: common brand name(s), Title Case, no parentheses
Suffix: “IVPB”
Include strength in order name? No
Include form in order name? No
In the Order Display Name, indicate it’s a premix. Of course, this record won’t be ordered directly. It will be ordered via an orderable… so why configure this field? The Order Display Name does still appear on the Database tab. Also, it appears in Verify Orders, allowing the pharmacist to tell which dispensable was selected.



Configuring the Order Composer for Premixes
Configure the Order Composer for a premix much like you would any simple ERX record, with the appropriate defaults, buttons, and options. The main differences are:

The only possible dose should be the exact dose of the premix.
There should be a default Admin Duration and appropriate buttons.
The system should automatically calculate the rate based on the Admin Duration and the total volume of the premix.
Include a Product-Specific Admin Instruction and Label Comment to indicate that this is a premix.
To get the Admin Duration field to appear, you’ll need to assign the premix a different OCC than RX SIMPLE MED.
The first three bullets are configured on the Inpatient Order Defaults screen:


Configure your TRN### CEFAZOLIN SODIUM-DEXTROSE 1-4 GM/50ML-% IV SOLN to match the screenshot above.

Add a Product-Specific Admin Instruction and Label Comment.

Label Comments are on the same screen as Administration Instructions.
Use the SmartText field for each, using “RX PREMIX”.
This SmartText says “premix bag”.
You’ll use this same SmartText in every premix, making it easy to change the text for all premixes.
Add RX ANTIMICROBIAL BACTERIAL INDICATION [120620] under Inpatient Question.

Change the OCC to RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE NO COMPONENT DISPLAY [4080200015].

This has the appropriate Display Items (including Admin Duration), even though you’re not working with a mixture.
Back in Hyperspace, remove any unsigned orders for Caleb. Place a new order for your trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB 1 g in 50 mL (premix) and confirm:

The dose is 1 g, and you can’t change it.
You see the Admin Duration field. It has a default and two buttons.
The Suspected Indication question is there.
The Prod. Admin. Inst. are “premix bag”.
In the sidebar on the right, in the summary sentence, confirm that you see "at 100 mL/hr".
This appears because you said "Yes" to Calc rate given volume and admin duration.
Configuring Dosing Units for Premixes


Adding to Med Lists and Preference Lists
Once you’ve configured your premix IVPB, add it to the appropriate lists:

Formulary	Add ERX record.
Central Pharmacy	
Add ERX record and all NDCs you stock.

Dispense entire packages (yellow dot).
Remove green dot (should NOT be on the Facility List; users should select the orderable instead).

Other Dispense Locations	
Add ERX and NDCs you stock at the location (ADS cabinets update automatically on load).

Dispense entire packages (yellow dot).
Critical	
The table above assumes the premix is part of an IMS orderable. However, if a premix is the only available form of a medication, it won’t be part of an IMS orderable and should go on preference lists (green dot).

Example: moxifloxacin (Avelox) is only available as a 400 mg IV piggyback premix. It’s not available in concentrated vials for preparation, so you can’t make mixtures of it. You configure the Avelox premix and let users order it directly.

In Classic, add your trn### cefazolin premix to your central pharmacy med list.

There’s only one NDC available (but you still need a check mark!); dispense the entire package.
Don’t add it to the linked Facility List.
If we were done making changes, we would close the med list to save our changes. However, we aren't quite done here!
In the real world, you would also add it to your formulary. In class, we’ll skip that step to save time.
 
Configuring Dispensing for Premixes
Dispense Code	IVPB Premix
Actions	
For staffed pharmacies, include at least the following actions for Label Routing:

Dispense (First Dose)
Dispense (Cart Fill)
Redispense
Order SmartText	
RX LABEL – PIGGYBACK PREMIX

The barcode is for pharmacy tracking purposes only. Nurses scan manufacturer’s barcode to administer.
Don’t include a production label. There’s nothing to produce.

Configuring Premixes for Administration
Nurses need to accurately document the patient’s fluid intake with IVPBs. Task templates add flowsheet rows for each IVPB order.

Task Template:	
IP PIGGYBACK IV (DOSE AND VOLUME)

Use this for each IVPB dispensable (premixes and mixtures).
Same task template used in most IVPBs


If needed, you can also embed flowsheet rows in the MAR as you saw in the lesson on configuring IMS Solids.

Configuring Charging for Premixes
Configure charging for premix IVPBs the same way you would for any simple ERX record: make sure the NDC has a cost, and assign a charge method and a linked procedure to the ERX record.

Charge Method	IV
Linked Procedure	
Most IV medications are not considered self-administrable and almost all have assigned HCPCS code.

With HCPCS: HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/ HCPCS
Without HCPCS: HC RX GENERAL PHARMACY 250 W/O HCPCS
Configuring Main Ingredient Mixtures
In chapter 5, you learned all about configuring main ingredient mixtures. These are one way that IV piggyback can be dispensed as part of an orderable record.

Let’s use some focus questions to review the key concepts behind main ingredient mixtures and consider if we need to return to anything we did with those mixtures.

1. What setting on which screen designates an ERX record as a mixture?	
Template type = Mixture on the General Medication Information screen (i.e. first screen of the record)

2.   What setting on which screen did you configure to get the dose buttons of 1 g, 1.5 g, and 2 g?



Mixture Setup 1 >> Suggested Doses for Order Entry

3. When a user changes the Dose of this mixture, they're indicating how much of which ingredient they want? What setting on which screen makes it work that way?	
The ceFAZolin. Mixture Setup 2 >> set Sel to "Main Ingredient."

4. What setting on which screen tells the system that dextrose 5% should appear in the Base section?	
On Mixture Setup 2 screen, the Type column ("Base").

5. Suppose you wanted sodium chloride 0.9% to be selected by default. On which screen would you do this? With which field(s)?	
On Mixture Setup 2 screen, set the Sel column to "Yes" for the sodium chloride and change the Sel column to "No" for the dextrose 5%. (Warning: don't leave this column blank! Default value for Sel column is "Always" and not "No").

6. How did you limit the base ingredients so that only doses of 50 mL were allowed? On which screen did you do this? With which field?	
On Mixture Order Composer Items screen, for dextrose 5% and sodium chloride 0.9% enter "No" under Allow Custom Dose? column.

7. For each part of the Order Name (on the right), identify where it’s coming from (e.g. the mixture’s suffix, the ingredient’s short name, or the dose of the ingredient).	


Short name of the main ingredient = ceFAZolin; brand name of the main ingredient = Ancef; dose of the main ingredient = 1,000 mg; short name of base = dextrose 5 %; dose of base= 50 mL; suffix of mixture = IVPB.  The "in" appears (along with the base and volume) because of naming extension 34917 in the mixture. 

8. What setting on which screen allowed a section to be created in the Flowsheets activity for cefazolin?	
The task template on the Task Templates & Administration Group screen ("IV Piggyback IV")

9. Right now, both of your mixtures are appearing on the Facility List tab. But when we're done, only the IMS orderable should be on the Facility List. How should we remove these mixtures from the Facility List?	
On the central pharmacy med list, remove the green dots from the mixtures.

 

We need to take those green dots off our main ingredient mixtures on our central pharmacy med list for our orderable to work as intended!

On your trn### central pharmacy med list, find your trn### cefazolin main ingredient mixtures, and remove the green dot from both the one in 50 mL and the one in 100 mL.

Make sure you close your med list when you are done to save your changes!
Configuring Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage Mixtures
“Mini-Bag Plus” and “ADD-Vantage” are two special types of IV piggyback packaging that allow nurses to prepare a mixture on the floor, without a sterile IV room.

A Mini-Bag Plus is a special D5W or NS flex container. It has a connector on it that can accept commonly-sized vials of powdered medication.
ADD-Vantage mixtures use a special type of packaging for both the main ingredient and the base. ADD-Vantage vials can only be used with ADD-Vantage bags.
These are often stored in ADS cabinets. You can store the ingredients:

Separately. Each ingredient is in a different pocket.
Together. Pharmacy connects the ingredients in advance.
Regardless of how the components are stocked, the nurse scans each component separately for administration.

In Epic, each component of a Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixture is a simple ERX record. Each combination of these ingredients is a main ingredient mixture ERX with a few differences:

Prep type	Leave blank. Nurses prepare these mixtures on the floor.
Prod. Admin. Inst.	
Use the RX ADMIN INSTRUCTIONS MINI-BAG PLUS or RX ADD-VANTAGE SmartTexts.

Indicates that pharmacy isn’t preparing the mixture, tells nurse what to look for and/or how to prepare the IV.
Specific Ingredients & Packages	
For both Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage mixtures: use the "dry" vial ERX for the main ingredient.

For Mini-Bag Plus mixtures: use a specific ERX record and NDC for the base.

For ADD-Vantage mixtures: use a specific ERX record and NDC for the base, and potentially specific NDC for the main ingredient.

Lock Ingredients	
Users should not change ingredients or doses.

Important for dispense logic and interfacing with ADS systems.

Dispense Components	Set to “Yes” on Mixture Setup 2; allows nurses to scan each ingredient for administration.
Dispense Code	IVPB Premix
 

Adding to Formulary & Central Pharmacy
Mixture ERX	Add to formulary and central pharmacy. For IMS, remove the green dot on the central pharmacy med list.
Ingredient ERXs	
Add ingredients to formulary and central pharmacy. Make sure you add the specific Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage ERXs and NDCs to the list.

Remove the green dot on the central pharmacy med list (unless it’s orderable on its own, such as ceFAZolin for injections).
 

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor go to Classic and open their central pharmacy med list. Confirm the following are already there:

CEFAZOLIN IVPB 1 G MINI-BAG PLUS IN D5W (without the green dot; it should be ordered via the IMS orderable record).
CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G IJ SOLR (without the green dot; this is the dry vial for use with the mini-bags)
DEXTROSE 5 % IVPB SOLN [400515] (with no green dot; this ERX represents Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage packages, which are never ordered on their own).
TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor open the details for DEXTROSE 5 % IVPB SOLN and show only NDCs on the med list.  

Confirm only ADD-VANTAGE and MINI-BAG PLUS NDCs are selected.
HINT: Look at the Modifier(s) column (right side).
Use Specific Ingredients and Packages
Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixtures use specific NDCs and ERXs for their ingredients.

For the main ingredients that come from the manufacturer as powders, use the "dry" vial (which does not contribute to the total volume of the mixture), rather than the "wet" vial.

For the base, the specifics vary by third-party vendor:

FDB creates a special ERX record for the Mini-Bag Plus & ADD-Vantage bags of NS and D5W.
Medi-Span lumps the Mini-Bag Plus & ADD-Vantage bags of NS and D5W under the standard ERX record used for IV fluids.
Epic recommends duplicating the base ERX record (for example, DEXTROSE 5 % IVPB SOLN) for Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage mixture ERXs.
Both Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage NDCs are associated with the same ERX record. To prevent IPS from picking a Mini-Bag Plus when it’s supposed to use an ADD-Vantage bag, use the Default NDC field.

Example	For a ceFAZolin 1 g Mini-Bag Plus mixture, you can use any 1 g vial of ceFAZolin powder. But you must use the 50 mL Mini-Bag Plus bag of D5W. You can’t make a Mini-Bag mixture with an ADD-Vantage bag!


Critical	When you designate a Default NDC for an ingredient in a mixture, Epic only dispenses the mixture from a Pharmacy (PHR) record that has that specific NDC on its Medication List (EFY).The mixture above could only be dispensed from an ADS cabinet if NDC 0338-0551-11 (and any 1 g vial of cefazolin) was loaded.
For ADD-Vantage products, the ADD-Vantage version of the main ingredient is usually represented as a different ERX record. Be sure to use that specific ERX as the main ingredient of the mixture.

Lock Down the Doses and the Ingredients
If you will ever store the mixture in a single pocket of an ADS cabinet, then set Components and doses locked to "Yes". 



This has three effects:

Prevents users from changing doses or ingredients, even in Verify Orders. (Components locked in verification is automatically set to “yes”).
Epic sends an order’s mixture ID to the ADS profile instead of just the ingredients’ IDs.
Makes 1 line-item on the ADS profile.
Otherwise, each ingredient in mixture would be added to ADS profile.
Epic dispenses orders for this mixture from any Pharmacy that has the mixture ERX OR both of the specific ingredients on its medication list.
You can stock the components in separate pockets or pre-assembled in one pocket.
Critical	This is an exception to the rule! Normally, Epic checks for only the ingredients on the med list (and whether the pharmacy supports the mixture’s prep type). By setting Components and doses locked in verification to “yes,” you tell Epic to check for either the mixture or the ingredients.
Loading in an ADS
Load/Unload messages update your ADS’s medication list. How you store your mixture determines which records appear on the med list:

Separate Pockets for Each Ingredient: Ingredient ERXs (and NDCs) appear on med list.
Pre-assembled Ingredients in One Pocket: Mixture ERX (only) appears on med list.
TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor open their TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS MED LIST.

How is the ceFAZolin mini-bag mixture stored in this ADS? How do you know?
Combined; in one pocket. Only the mixture ERX is on the med list. The ingredient ERXs are not there. There is a cefazolin ingredient, but it is the wet vial, not the dry vial needed for the mini-bag.

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor go to Hyperspace and order ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB 1 g in 50 mL D5W (Mini-Bag Plus) [430015] for Caleb.

In the Order Composer, notice that the dose field is disabled; you can't even deselect the button!
Notice the Prod. Admin. Inst., telling the nurse how to prepare a dose. 
They'll click Sign & Verify. Confirm that it will be dispensed from the ADS.
To use the “Load to ADS” workflow, add the mixture ERX to the Load to ADS medication list. This avoids triggering the “load” workflow for orders for an individual component, while making sure the mixture gets loaded if ordered.

Allowing Nurses to Scan Each Ingredient
When a nurse scans an NDC barcode on the MAR, the system ignores the ingredients of mixtures by default. For example, when a nurse scans a bag of sodium chloride 0.9 % IV soln to administer as a continuous IV fluid, we don't want the MAR to prompt the nurse to choose between the patient's order for the NS infusion and their order for an ampicillin IV in NS. To administer the ampicillin IV, the nurse should scan the order-specific barcode on the dispense label. 

For Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage mixtures, though, there is no dispense label and thus no order-specific barcode to scan! Nurses should scan the ingredient (NDC) barcodes. To allow this, set Dispense components to "Yes" in the mixture ERX.  



TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor verify the order for the ceFAZolin Mini-Bag Plus mixture.

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor go to the MAR and type the following to mimic scanning the bag of D5W:
\0338-0551-11\

They'll be prompted to link the order to a line, and then the MAR administration form opens.
Note that the dextrose 5% solution shows a green check mark, indicating it's been scanned.
Also note that the Dose field is empty, because the ceFAZolin ingredient (the main ingredient) has not been scanned. 
TRAINER DEMO: Watch your instructor type the following, to mimic scanning the ceFAZolin vial:
\0143-9924-90\

The Dose field populates, and the ceFAZolin 1 g reconstituted solution shows a green check mark.
Notice that we are scanning the ceFAZolin dry vial, and not the wet vial. The dry vial is only in the ADS as part of the mini-bag mixture.
Configuring Ratio-Based Mixtures
A ratio-based mixture is a main ingredient mixture that is diluted in a base at a fixed concentration. Most ratio-based mixtures are used for pediatric patients and have weight-based doses. The system simplifies the dose and uses a ratio to determine how much base is needed. This results in much smaller volumes than those used in standard IVPBs. 

Example	
As an example, for a 29.3 kg patient:

A dose of 50 mg/kg/day q8h would be 480 mg per dose, dispensed in 24 mL.

A dose of 75 mg/kg/day q12h would be 1,100 mg, dispensed in 55 mL.

Compare this to adult preparations of ceFAZolin, where doses of up to 1 g are all prepared in 50 mL of base and larger doses are in 100 mL.

 

Exercise 1: Explore a Ratio-Based Mixture
Ratio-based mixtures are very similar to other main ingredient mixtures. Rather than configure one from scratch, this exercise will have you order one and explore how it’s configured.

Part 1: Add a Ratio-Based Mixture to Your Med List
Log into Classic as your administrator (ADM##/train).
Open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST.
Add “TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV SYRINGE 20 MG/ML IN D5W (PED)”
You’ll get a message that “No NDCs exist for selected medication.” That’s fine.
Click Accept.
Clear the green dot from your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV SYRINGE 20 MG/ML IN D5W (PED).
It’s part of an IMS orderable; you don’t want it on the Facility List.
Close your medication list.
In the real world, you’d also add it to your formulary. We’re skipping that step in class to save time.
Part 2: See Your Ratio-Based Mixture in Hyperspace
Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Open Buffy's chart (NOT Caleb's). Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Order your trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IV syringe 20 mg/mL in D5W (pediatric) for Buffy.
Click the 75 mg/kg/day dose button. Change the frequency to Q12H.
In the screenshot below, fill in the values that you see on your screen:
Hint: Hover over the i icon to see the calculations.
 



Answers (in order, top to bottom): 1,100 mg, 55 mL, 20 mg/mL, 20 mg/mL, 44 mL

Look at the volume of the base, and the total volume in the order name.
Are they equal? No__
Where is this mismatch between the volume and the base coming from? Let's find out!
Click Accept and then click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Look at the Products to dispense in the bottom of the screen. How much D5W will you use for this dose? 44     mL. How much ceFAZolin? 11   mL.
Find the total Volume for your mixture (hint: look under the clinical details)
How does that compare to the screenshot above? Where do you see that number?
It's the same as the Calculated Dose. You also see it in the Order Name.

Look at the Admin dose of the ceFAZolin ingredient.
What is the ratio of ceFAZolin to the total volume of the mixture? 20     mg : 1     mL
Click  to discontinue this order. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Part 3: Explore Your Ratio-Based Mixture in Text
In Text, at the Medication: prompt, open “TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV SYRINGE 20 MG/ML IN D5W (PED)”
What Template type does this record have?
Mixture

Does this record require a Prep type? Which one? 
Yes, IV Admixture

Page down to the Mixture Setup 1 screen.
Notice the Order Display Name. How is it different than the Order Display Name you used for your main ingredient mixtures for ceFAZolin (the ones in 50 mL and 100 mL of base)?
It shows the concentration (20 mg/mL) rather than the amount of base. Also, it says "IV syringe" instead of "IVPB" and indicates "(pediatric)" at the end. 

In what unit are all the suggested doses? mg/kg/day     
Page down to the Mixture Setup 2 screen. Fill in the blanks on the screenshot below to match what you see:


Ratio based mixture = Yes;
Dose = 20 mg, 0.8 mL, 0.8mL;
Sel = Main I*, Yes, No

Answer the following questions based on what you’ve seen so far:
The dose buttons you saw on the previous screen were all in “mg/kg/day,” but “mg’ of which ingredient?
CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) (the main ingredient)

Think back to what you saw in Verify Orders. Did the system just use 0.8 mL of D5W? No     
Look back at the Order Composer screenshots earlier in the exercise.
What was the concentration of this mixture (as shown in the dosing calculations)?
20     mg / 1      mL
How are the Dose and Units columns behaving for this mixture? Are they indicating a specific amount of each ingredient? Or a ratio?
They are defining a ratio between the two ingredients. The dose entered in the Order Composer will indicate the specific amount of ceFAZolin (because it's the main ingredient, and the system will calculate the amount of base using this ratio.

What is the ratio between the ceFAZolin wet vial ingredient and the D5W on mixture setup 2?
20   mg ceFAZolin / 0.8   mL D5W
Why is this? Because the volume of the main ingredient is contributing to the total volume!
The ratio we want is 20 mg of ceFAZolin for every 1 mL of total volume, not every 1 mL of base.
Think about the ingredient: CEFAZOLIN SODIUM 1 G/10ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL).
Each vial is 1,000 mg of ceFAZolin reconstituted to 10 mL of solution.
So, every 20 mg of ceFAZolin represents 0.2 mL.
If you want a final ratio of 20 mg of ceFAZolin to 1 mL of total volume, you need to account for that 0.2 mL.  You’ll add 0.8 mL of either D5W or NS to every 0.2 mL of reconstituted ceFAZolin.
If You Have Time: Additional Differences
You’ve just seen the core differences between a ratio-based mixture and normal main-ingredient mixtures. If you have time, explore some additional, less crucial differences.

In Hyperspace, order trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IV syringe 20 mg/mL in D5W (pediatric) for Buffy.
Give it a dose of 50 mg/kg/day. (keep the frequency as Q8H)
Does this order name show the amount of base being used (19.2 mL) or the total volume of the mixture (24 mL)? Total volume of the mixture (24 mL)  
Look at the end of the order name (“IV syringe”) and the Calculated Dose (24 mL). Would you want to use the same label for this mixture that you used for your other IVPB mixtures? No   
Review which fields appear in the Order Composer. They're the same fields you saw for the main ingredient mixture(s) you created for adults. Do you need a different OCC than they used? No, the fields are the same, so the OCC can be the same.
Cancel and remove this order.
In Text, open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV SYRINGE 20 MG/ML IN D5W (PED) record.
Press HOME + F9. Enter “I” (for item number) and then enter “3090” (the item number for the Order Name Suffix field).
In your main ingredient mixtures, the naming extension you used was 34917-IP RXNAME STANDARD (MAIN INGREDIENT WITH BASE DISPLAYED AND BASE QUANTITY).
What’s different about this one? (HINT: Look at your answer to the first bullet under step 2. Use Shift + F3 to see the full name.)
This one is 408134921, it includes the total volume of the mixture, not just the base. It is there to “(USE FOR QS BASE)”.

Press HOME + F9. Enter “I” and then enter “7215”.
What dispense code is this mixture using? Does that make sense?
"Syringe;" makes sense because this will be dispensed in a syringe.

Press HOME + F9. Enter “I” (for item number) and then enter “24210”.
What OCC is this mixture using? (Hint: Use Shift + F3 to see the full name.)
Rx Main Ingredient Mixture Displaying Base

Press SHIFT+F7 to exit this record. You’re done.
Key Takeaways: Ratio-Based Mixtures
You configure a ratio-based mixture like a main ingredient mixture, with a few additional settings:

 



Critical	
Remember, we set the ratio on Mixture Setup 2 as 20 mg of main ingredient to 0.8 mL of base, because we want 20 mg of the main ingredient per 1 mL of total volume, not per 1 mL of base. The wet vial contributes to that total volume, at a concentration of 1000 mg/10 mL.  That means every 20 mg of the wet vial ingredient contributes 0.2 mL to the total volume, and you need only 0.8 mL of base to get a final concentration of 20 mg/mL.

 

What would happen if we entered a ratio of 20 mg of ceFAZolin to 1 mL of base? Because every 20 mg of ceFAZolin contributes 0.2 mL of volume, you’d end up with a concentration of 20 mg/1.2 mL (instead of 20 mg/mL). For a dose of 75 mg/kg/day Q8H on Buffy, that would result in a total volume of 44 mL instead of 37 mL.



Be sure to account for the volume of the main ingredient when configuring ratio-based mixtures!

Order Display Name	
<generic medication> (<Brand name>) IV syringe <concentration> in <base> (<population>)

If there’s a choice between bases, use the default one.
For <population>, substitute “pediatric,” “neonate,” etc. If not meant for a specific population, omit.
Naming Extension	
408134921-IP RXNAME MIXTURE W/ TOTAL VOLUME (USE FOR QS BASE)

Includes the base in Order Name, but displays the total volume of the mixture rather than just the amount of base.
Dispense Code	Syringe
Order Composer Configuration	
Either:

RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE [4080200014]
If there’s a choice between bases
RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE NO COMPONENT DISPLAY [4080200015]
If only one option for base
Configuring Orderable Mapping Records
Once you’ve configured all the dispensable records for a medication, create an IMS orderable mapping record that users will select in the Orders activity with settings similar to a simple ERX record, like allowed and default values, and buttons. Then in Classic, map that IMS orderable record to the dispensables, and add the IMS orderable record to the appropriate Medication Lists and Preference Lists.

Exercise 2: Create an IMS Orderable
This exercise will walk you through setting up an IMS orderable for ceFAZolin IVPB, and mapping it to the dispensables you have seen and built already.

Critical	
This exercise assumes that you have completed the following steps from chapter 5:

Created your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W mixture.
Configured your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY to support the “IV Admixture” preparation type.
Created your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML D5W mixture.
If you have not done any of the above, please do so before continuing. Let your trainer know if you need assistance!

Part 1: Create the “Base” Version of Your IMS Orderable
Because IMS Orderables can have override contexts, the first step is to make the “base” version of the record. The “base” record should include the settings that are the same for all patients, including all of the allowed units and routes.

In Text, at the Medication: prompt, enter "*" and create a new record named “TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE”
Replace ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet.
Give it a synonym of “Ancef”.
Tab to the Orderable Type field. Enter “Orderable mapping” [1].
This makes the record an IMS orderable.
Orderables have the same screens and fields as simple ERX records, but many of the fields don’t matter; their values come from the dispensable that IMS chooses.
Page down to the Inpatient Order Defaults screen.
Enter an Order Display Name of “trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IV”
Users will see this when searching, because this record goes on your Facility List.
Don’t mention the dose, concentration or form. That’s determined by how you map the dispensables.
Leave everything else on the screen blank.
The doses and frequencies will change based on patient context, so leave them blank in the “base” version of this record.
The default Admin Duration can come from the dispensable or the orderable. By default, it comes from the dispensable. So leave the Admin Duration blank for now.
Page down to the Medication Order Name Text screen. Enter the following:
Medication Short Name: ceFAZolin
Medication Brand Name: Ancef
Inpatient Order Name Suffix: IV
The Order Name is driven by the dispensable, but when this orderable record is added to a SmartGroup, the values from this screen are used.
Page down to the Rx Unit Equivalence screen.
Enter a Medication Unit of “mg” and an Other Medication Unit of “g”.
For the most part, the dosing units of an order will be driven by the dispensables. But since users enter the dose on the IMS orderable, the system needs to know what unit to simplify the dose to. That’s what these fields are doing.
Critical	If you leave the Medication Unit blank in an IMS orderable record, you won’t be able to map it to your dispensables!
Page down to the Rx Order Setup screen.
Allow these order units:
mg
mg/kg
mg/kg/day
g
“Intravenous” should be the default route. "Intraosseous" should also be available. 
Page down to the Inpatient Minimum and Maximum Doses screen.
Configure the Rx Standardized Dosing table at the bottom like so (actually type the “-“ in the first two rows; it will vanish when you TAB off the field):

Recall that standardized dosing applies to complex, weight-based doses. When the system simplifies a weight-based dose, it consults this table to determine how it should round that simplified dose.
The first two rows simply tell it how precisely to round the simplified dose. So for a 29.3 kg patient (like Buffy):
Dose	Simplified Dose	Rounded Simplified Dose
25 mg/kg/day, Q8H	244.1667	244.2 (nearest 0.1 mg)
50 mg/kg/day, Q8H	488.3333	490 (nearest multiple of 5 mg)
100 mg/kg/day, Q8H	976.6667 mg	1,000 mg (standardized dose)
Page down to the Order Specific Questions screen. Under Inpatient Questions, add 120620-RX ANTIMICROBIAL BACTERIAL INDICATION.
Page down to the Order Composer Configuration screen.
For the Context of "Inpatient," set the OCC to RX SIMPLE MED [4080200001].
IMS makes ordering IVs as simple as possible. Users just need to enter the dose, route, and frequency and the system figures out the rest.
Even if you used an OCC like RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE, the base section would be hidden. The base used comes from the default within the dispensable record and cannot be edited by the user when entering orders.
Additionally, the Admin Duration and Rate fields are not editable by default when using an orderable because they are determined by the dispensable. Later, you’ll see how to change this behavior if desired.
Page down once. In the IP report generating extension field, enter “18817” (Creatinine Clearance Medication Report).
This will display the patient’s current CrCl at the top of the order composer.
In the IP lab component field, enter “CREATININE:3:30”.
This will display up to the past three Serum Creatinine results within the past 30 days.
Page down to the Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections screen. Add an “Intravenous” Route button.
Close the record.
Part 2: Add Contextual Overrides to Your IMS Orderable
For your ceFAZolin, you’ll create overrides for three contexts: pediatric, adult, and adult with CrCl <= 30.

In Text, reopen your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE record.
Page down once to the Medication Override Contexts screen.
Create an Adult [4] context.
Configure the following values in the context (you need to page down a few times for the frequency buttons):
Default frequency: Every 8 hours [200521]
Suggested Doses: 250 mg, 500 mg, 1 g (the default), 1.5 g, and 2 g
Frequency Buttons (for Inpatient): Once [200902], Every 6 hours [200040], Every 8 hours [200521], and Every 12 hours [200523]
Tip: to add frequency buttons, page down to the Inpatient Clinician Order Entry Button Selections screen within the context. 
Press SHIFT+F7 to exit the context and return to the “base” record.
Create a Pediatric [3] Context.
Configure the following values in the context:
Default frequency: Every 8 hours [200521]
Suggested Doses: 50 mg/kg/day, 75 mg/kg/day, and 100 mg/kg/day (none selected by default)
Frequency Buttons (for Inpatient): Once [200902], Every 6 hours [200040], Every 8 hours [200521], and Every 12 hours [200523]
Press SHIFT+F7 to exit the context and return to the “base” record.
Create an Adult CrCl <= 30 [28] Context.
HINT: Type the ID number to get the right context!
Configure the following values in the context:
Default frequency: Every 12 hours [200523]
Suggested Doses: 250 mg, 500 mg (the default), 750 mg, and 1 g
Frequency Buttons (for Inpatient): Once [200902], Every 8 hours [200521], Every 12 hours [200523], Every 18 hours [200929]
Press SHIFT+F7 to exit the context and return to the “base” record.
Make sure that your override contexts are in the right order.
HINT: List the most specific override context first.
Use F7 or F8 to rearrange the contexts if necessary.
Press SHIFT+F7 again to exit your IMS orderable.
Part 3: Add Your IMS Orderable to Your Lists
In Classic, open your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List.
Add your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE to your Central Pharmacy med list.
It should have a green dot. That adds it to your Facility List.
Confirm that the records on the following screenshot are also on this Medication List with the green dots marked as shown. If any are missing, add them now.


Close your med list.
In the real world, you’d also add the orderable to your formulary. We’re skipping this step in the interest of time!
Part 4: Configure Dispensable Mapping
Now that you’ve configured your IMS orderable record for how it will appear in the Orders activity, and added it (and the dispensables) to your med lists, you need to map the orderable to its possible dispensable records.

In Classic, go Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin.
Open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE record.
This is the same ERX record you just created in Text.
In the Dispensable drug table at the top, enter the following in this order (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet):
1)   TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV SYRINGE 20 MG/ML IN D5W (PED) 

This is your pediatric ratio-based mixture.
In the Patient age field that appears below the ERX record name, leave the first set of fields blank and enter “14 years” in the to fields.
In the Order dose fields, leave the first field blank and enter “1000” mg in the to field.
2)   TRN### CEFAZOLIN SODIUM-DEXTROSE 1-4 GM/50ML-% IV SOLN

This is your premix.
For Order dose, enter “1000” mg in both the fields. This means it can only use this dispensable if the dose is exactly 1000 mg.
3)   CEFAZOLIN IVPB 1 G MINI-BAG PLUS IN D5W [430015]

This is a Mini-Bag Plus mixture made with D5W.
For Order dose, enter “1000” mg in both the fields.
4)    TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W

This is your main ingredient mixture, for doses up to 1 g.
For Order dose, leave the first field blank and enter “1000” mg in the to field. This means it will use this dispensable for doses up to 1 g.
5)   TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 100 ML D5W

This is your main ingredient mixture, for doses above 1000 mg.
For Order dose, enter “1000” mg in the first field and leave the to field blank. This means it will use this dispensable for doses of 1 g and above.
Confirm that your table looks like this:
 

Finally, in the Failsafe dispensable drug field at the bottom, enter your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IVPB IN 50 ML D5W.
The system will use this dispensable for any order that doesn’t meet the criteria above.
When you’re done, click Accept.
Before you test your work, make sure that your central pharmacy supports IV admixtures! 
Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin
Open your TRN4## Central Pharmacy
On the Dispensing Information form, make sure that the Supported preparation types field includes at least "IV admixture".
You should have configured this in chapter 5. Concentration-Based Mixtures. If the field is empty, add "IV admixture" now.
Close your pharmacy. 
Test Your Work on Caleb (an Adult)
In Hyperspace, open Caleb's chart. Discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Click the +New button next to the search field. Search for your “trn### cef iv”.
On the Facility List tab, you should see one choice: “trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IV”
Accept your trn### ceFAZolin (Ancef) IV. Open the Order Composer. It should look like this:
 



Look back at your dispensable mapping instructions. Shouldn’t IMS be dispensing the premix instead of the Mini-Bag Plus mixture? Why would it be using the Mini-Bag? (If you aren’t sure, keep going!)
Because the Mini-Bag Plus mixture is an acceptable dispensable (it's on the Central Pharmacy Med List and it matches the dispensable criteria), and it's the only dispensable available in the ADS serving the patient.

Click the 500 mg dose button. The Order Name should change to:
ceFAZolin (Ancef) 500 mg in dextrose 5% 50 mL IVPB
The admin instructions should no longer indicate “Mini-Bag Plus”.
Click the 1.5 g dose button. The Order Name should change to this:
ceFAZolin (Ancef) 1.5 g in dextrose 5% 100 mL IVPB
Change the dose back to 1 g and then click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Look at the Dispense Details. Where is this order being dispensed from?
4 South ADS

This is why it used the Mini-Bag, not the premix. The Mini-Bag is in the ADS, which is closer to the patient than the premix in Central.
Click  to reject the order. Pick an order mode and provider. Close Caleb’s chart.
If You Have Time: Test Your Work on Buffy (Pediatric)
In Hyperspace, open Buffy’s chart. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Order your “trn### cef IV” for Buffy.
Select a dose of 75 mg/kg/day.
What is the system dispensing? 
The IV syringe (i.e. the ratio-based mixture)

HINT: Look at the order name.

Why is it dispensing that? 
It's the first acceptable dispensable: the dose is under 1 g, and the patient is under 14

Click the 100 mg/kg/day dose button.
What is the system dispensing? 
The Mini-Bag Plus mixture.

HINT: Look at the Prod Admin Inst

Rest your mouse over the i icon next to the calculated dose. Notice that the simplified dose was 976.6667 mg and that the system changed that to the standard dose 1,000 mg (which you configured in the IMS orderable record).
IMS is choosing to dispense a 1 g dose from the ADS cabinet rather than the pediatric syringe from the central pharmacy.
Click Sign & Verify for this order. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Under the Clinical Details heading, notice the Dispensable field shows: ceFAZolin (Ancef) IVPB 1 g in 50 mL D5W (Mini-Bag Plus).
Let’s see all of the dispensable options. Click the pencil icon next to Clinical Details and the magnifying glass next to the Dispensable field.
This is why configuring the Order Display Name was important in each of those dispensables! That’s what you see here.
Reject the order (pick an order mode and provider) and close Buffy’s chart.
If You Have Time: Troubleshooting Dispensable Mapping
You might find yourself wondering why IMS chose the Mini-Bag Plus mixture for Buffy instead of the 20 mg/mL IV syringe. Let’s investigate!

Go to Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin for your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE.
Click the Test Mapping button. Enter the following:
Order dose: 1000 mg
Patient weight: 29.3 kg
Evaluate by: Department
Department: your TRN### 4 SOUTH
Patient age: 9 years
Click Test. Scroll through the report and find the following info:
Orderable to dispensable mapping for TRN###...:
A summary of the dispensable mapping table you configured.
Acceptable medications based on selection criteria
The dispensables which could potentially work for this order: all of them!
Dispense logic trace for unit TRN### 4 SOUTH UNIT
Shows why the system decided to dispense the Mini-Bag for Buffy:

Now, let’s see what effect the central pharmacy’s med list has. Click Close. 
Leave your dispensable mapping screen open, but open your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List.
Remove CEFAZOLIN IVPB 1 G MINI-BAG PLUS IN 50 ML D5W from your central pharmacy med list. Click Close.
Back in your dispensable mapping, click Test Mapping again.
The Selected dispensable drug is now your 20 mg/mL IV syringe.
At the bottom of the floating window, select Show main pharmacy med list filtering.
Scroll through the report and find this new section:
Dispensables filtered for not being on main pharmacy’s med list
CEFAZOLIN IVPB 1 G MINI-BAG PLUS IN 50 ML D5W.
Scroll down to the Dispense logic trace section of the report.
The system doesn’t even consider dispensing the Mini-Bag Plus (even though it’s still in the ADS), because it filters out any item not on the central pharmacy med list (it is not acceptable because of this)
This might seem odd, but it allows you to have a single orderable that works for every hospital in your organization. IMS will rule out any dispensables that aren’t used in that particular hospital.
If You Have Time: Enable Editing of Admin Duration and Rate
Due to technical limitations, IMS orderables do not allow the user to edit certain details about an order from the Order Composer. For example, the base of a mixture cannot be changed within an orderable. Administrators can, however, allow users to change the Admin Duration and rate during order entry.


You should still be in Classic, looking at the dispensable mapping for your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE.
If not: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin
At the bottom, configure Edit rate, administration duration, and label comments when placing orders so that the user can edit these values, but the defaults come from the dispensable.
Accept your dispensable mapping.
In Text, open your TRN### CEFAZOLIN IV ORDERABLE.
Page down to the Inpatient Order Defaults screen.
On the Inpatient Order Defaults screen, add Admin Duration Buttons for 30 and 60 minutes.
HINT: use a semicolon for the buttons, and don’t forget the Unit.
Leave the Default Admin Duration blank, because you configured the record to get the default values from whichever dispensable is selected.
Your buttons won’t appear unless we change the OCC! Page down to the Order Composer Configuration screen.
Your orderable currently uses RX SIMPLE MED.
Change the OCC to RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE NO COMPONENT DISPLAY [4080200015]
This is the OCC we used for our premix. It includes Admin Duration as a display item.
SHIFT+F7 to close your record.
Go to Hyperspace and open Caleb’s chart. Remove any unsigned orders.
Enter a new order for your trn## ceFAZolin IV. Open the Order Composer. 
Confirm that the Prod Admin Inst indicate that you're dispensing the premix. 
Confirm that the Admin Duration field appears with two buttons, and is editable. That's because of the changes you made in your orderable ERX. 
Confirm that the default Admin Duration is 30 minutes, because that’s the default value in the 1 g premix.
Change the dose to 2 g.
The order name now indicates this is in the 100 mL mixture.
The Admin Duration changes to 60 minutes, because that’s the default in the dispensable (the 100 mL mixture).
Manually change the Admin Duration to 120 minutes.
You can change it, because in the dispensable mapping screen, you enabled the editing of rate, duration, and label comments.
Change the dose back to 1 g.
The Admin Duration changes back to 30 minutes.
It changes back because you chose “Enable editing – default from dispensable.” When the dispensable changes, the Admin Duration changes with it.
If you wanted to always “keep” whatever value the user selected, you’d need to change the Edit rate, duration, and label comments when placing orders field to “Enable editing – default from orderable.” You’d also need to add a default Admin Duration time to the orderable record.
Remove the order.
If You Still Have Time: Test Your Work on Malachi (Adult CrCl <= 30)
You created a contextual override for adults with a CrCl <= 30. Let’s test that out.

In Hyperspace, open your Malachi patient's chart. Discontinue any active orders.
Order your trn### ceFAZolin IV orderable for him.
Open the Order Composer. Confirm that:
He has no creatinine clearance results found.
Dose is 1 g, with buttons for 250 mg through 2 g.
Frequency is q8h, with buttons for Once, q6h, q8h and q12h.
Remove this order. 
Go to the  on your activity toolbar and choose Enter/Edit Results.
Add a result for serum creatinine:
Click Ext Result.
Expand Chemistry and select CREATININE, SERUM [LAB383]
Click Create Results.
Collection date: t
Value: 2.6
Status: Final result
Click Accept.
Order your trn### ceFAZolin IV orderable again and open the Order Composer. Confirm that:
You see a creatinine clearance of 22.7 mL/min.
Dose is 500 mg, with buttons from 250 mg to 1 g. There are no buttons for 1.5 or 2 g.
Frequency is q12h, with buttons for Once, q8h, q12h, and q18h.
Remove the order. You’re done!
Key Takeaways – Configuring IMS Orderables
IMS for IVs simplifies the ordering process for your clinicians. Rather than sorting through all the ways pharmacy prepares and dispenses an IV, the clinician selects and interacts with the orderable record.

Set Orderable type to “Orderable mapping” (on the first screen in the ERX record) to create an orderable record. In the orderable record you create age-based contexts, assign default values, buttons, and set the OCC.

Naming
Order Disp Name	
<generic medication> (<Brand name>) IV

This is how the orderable will appear on preference lists.
Order Name	
The order name (at the top of the order composer, on MAR, etc.) will be determined by the dispensable chosen by IMS.

Does NOT come from orderable ERX’s short name, brand name, or suffix.
Short Name, Brand Name, Suffix	
Still need to configure these; they control the display name when the orderable is added to SmartGroups (for Order Sets or panels).

Short name: <generic medication>
Brand name: <Brand name>
Suffix: “IV”
Order Composer
Configure default values, buttons, and allowed choices for dose, route, and frequency the same way you would in any other ERX record. You can (and often will) configure contextual overrides for your orderable.

With the Admin Duration field, you can determine whether:

It’s editable during order entry.
The default value comes from the orderable record or dispensable record.
This is configured in the Dispensable Mapping Admin: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin.



If Edit rate, administration duration, and label comments when placing orders field is blank, editing of the Admin Duration time is disabled and the value always comes from the dispensable’s default Admin Duration.

Which OCC you use depends on whether Admin Duration can be edited:



Critical	When placing orders through an IMS orderable, users cannot select a base. The system selects the default base in the mixture ERX record. However, during Verify Orders, pharmacists can switch bases if the dispensable is a mixture.
Dosing Units


Critical	If you leave the Medication Unit blank in an IMS orderable record, you won’t be able to map it to your dispensables!
Standardized Dosing
Standardized dosing applies before dispensable mapping happens, and it can affect which dispensable is selected.

Because IVPBs often involve larger doses than injections or oral liquids, you’ll often use ranges rather than a maximum deviation percentage.



The ranges are lower-bound inclusive. For example, a 750 mg dose would use row 3 (750 – 1250 mg) in the table above.

Adding to Med Lists & Preference Lists
As a rule, every ERX record related to an IMS orderable should be included on the central pharmacy and formulary med lists. This includes:

The orderable mapping record itself, with a green dot (it should appear on the Facility List).
Any dispensable ERX records linked to the orderable mapping record, including both simple ERXs and mixtures. These should not have green dots (you don't want users to order them directly; they should not be on the Facility List).
Any simple ERXs that are ingredients used in the dispensable mixtures.
If the ingredient can be ordered directly, on itself, then it should have a green dot and thus appear on the Facility List. 
If the ingredient is never ordered directly, then remove the green dot. 
Critical	If a dispensable ERX is not on the central pharmacy’s medication list, IMS will never choose that dispensable! (See the next topic.)
Mapping Dispensables
After you’ve configured the orderable record in text, you’ll map your dispensables in Hyperspace.

Path: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin

List dispensables in the order you want them considered with criteria such as patient age, patient weight and ordered dose. In the Failsafe dispensable drug field, enter the dispensable you want to use if none of the other criteria are met or are available.

When evaluating dispensables for an order, Epic checks for the following:

The dispensable must be on the central pharmacy’s medication list.
AND

Any criteria specified for the dispensable (such as patient age and/or dose) must be met.
IMS will only consider dispensing acceptable dispensables. An unacceptable dispensable is never even considered; it’s effectively removed from the process.

Epic then goes through dispense logic. For each dispense location, it asks which dispensables are available in that location?

Only 1: IMS selects that dispensable.
More than 1: IMS uses the first listed dispensable.
None: Epic moves on to the next dispense location.
If no dispensables can be found, IMS uses the failsafe dispensable set in the orderable record.

Testing Dispensable Mapping
It can be tricky to determine why IMS for mixtures is choosing a particular dispensable. To help troubleshoot:

Go to Dispensable Mapping for your orderable record.
Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin.
Click Test Mapping.
Enter as much information as you have. Be sure to select the department and/or care area in which your patient is located.
Select Show main pharmacy med list filtering.
Click Test.
The report provides a detailed walkthrough on how IMS is choosing the dispensable.

 

Using Rules to Make Dispensable Mapping Smarter
Patient rules can be used as criteria in dispensable mapping. Patient rules are CER records (with a context of “Patient”) that can evaluate almost any discrete piece of information about a patient.

By using patient rules in your dispensable mapping, you can make IMS for mixtures much more intelligent.

Example	Many hospitals mix ceFAZolin in D5W by default, but use NS for patients in a Neuro service or who are on a ketogenic diet. Your build currently requires pharmacists to manually change the dispensable and/or the base while verifying orders. But with a bit of work, IMS can do that for them!
To implement the scenario above, you would need to:

Create two versions of each dispensable mixture: one with D5W selected by default, and the other with NS selected by default.
You can duplicate mixtures in Chronicles and change the default base.
Be sure to update the Order Display Name to reflect the default base!
Create a CER rule (context: “Patient”) that identifies patients for whom D5W is acceptable. Depending on your hospital policies, this rule might:
Exclude patients admitted in a service of “Neurology,” “Neuro ICU,” or “Neurosurgery”.
Exclude patients with a ketogenic diet order.
Exclude patients with a diagnosis of diabetes.
Exclude patient with an active order for “All IVs in NS” (or similar).
Update your dispensable mapping.
If a dispensable includes a rule in the Patient rule column, that dispensable is only considered “acceptable” if the patient satisfies that rule’s conditions (as well as the Patient age, Patient weight, Dose, and Route columns).

Open (but do not edit!) the cefazolin orderable in Classic to see how this is configured. It will be read only for most.

Hint: Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping >> “cefazolin IV/IM orderable”
Beyond the Basics	For more about building patient rules, go to welearning.epic.com and watch GEN640 Making CER Rules. Also, see the Rule Editor Setup and Support Guide in Galaxy.
Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record
When configuring IMS for IVs, some settings come from the orderable record while others come from the dispensables record. The lists below recap which settings come from which record.

Dispensable Record
The following settings come from whichever dispensable ERX record that the system has currently selected. 

Whether it’s a simple ERX or a mixture
For mixtures:
Which ingredients (and how much of each) are included
Which bases can be chosen in the Product field in Verify Orders
Default stability
Order Name
Order Display Name that appears in Verify Orders, in the Dispensable field. 
Whether rate should be calculated from the volume & Admin Duration
Default Admin Duration and rate (by default, or if you tell the system to allow editing and use defaults from the dispensable; see the section on the Order Composer from these key takeaways)
For simple ERXs:
Administration Unit and Rnd Factor 
Dispense Unit and Rnd Factor
Equiv Unit & Qty table (i.e. the strength/concentration of the ERX)
Default dispense code
Prep type
Product-Specific Administration Instructions
Preparation instructions or label comments
Task template
Charging (cost, charge method, and linked procedure)
Orderable Record
The following settings come from the orderable ERX record, or one of its override contexts.

Synonyms
Order Display Name (how order appears on preference lists and the Facility List)
Default display name on SmartSets (panels & order sets), via the Short Name, Brand Name, and Suffix fields
Default & allowed frequencies, plus frequency buttons*
Suggested doses*
Allowed order units*
Medication and Other Medication Units
Standardized dosing
Allowed & default route, plus route buttons*
Available PRN reasons
Patient-specific Administration Instructions*
Order Composer Configuration
Admin Duration buttons*
Default Admin Duration and rate, and calculate rate from volume and Admin Duration (ONLY if you tell the system to allow editing and use defaults from the orderable).
*Can also be set in contextual overrides in the orderable record.

Beyond the Basics: Add Your IVPBs to the Infusion Grouper
The Center for Medicare/Medicaid Services (CMS) requires that charges for IV infusions include both the start time and the stop time. IV piggybacks should use an action of “New Bag” instead of “Given,” and have available actions like “Paused,” “Resumed,” and “Stopped.” These actions automatically appear for orders with a “Continuous” frequency, but not for IV piggybacks which have intermittent frequencies (q8h, q12h, etc.).

To get your IV piggyback orders to appear with the correct set of “infusion” actions:

Classic >> search (Ctrl+Space) >> “Grouper Editor”.
Open “ERX GENERAL RUNNING INFUSIONS”
Scroll down to the bottom, and add your IVPB
Add the dispensable records.
Don’t add the ingredients.


MAR activity >> administration form: your IVPB with the “infusion” actions

Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

You’re verifying an order for an IV piggyback. After clicking the pencil icon next to Clinical Details, you see the following under the Dispensable drop-down.
The full Order Name
The Order Display Name
The record name
The Short Name
Where in each dispensable’s record is this name coming from? (Choose ONE only.)
B, the Order Display Name of each dispensable.

You have been working on the ERX record for a ratio-based mixture, TOBRAMYCIN IV SYRINGE 10 MG/ML.

Right now, the Order Name looks like this: 
  

You want it to look like this: 


If user changes the base from D5W to NS, the order name should reflect that. How would you solve this problem? (Choose only ONE answer)
Edit the Order Disp Name of the mixture
Edit the Order Disp Name of the base
Edit the Order Name Suffix of the mixture
In the Order Entry and After Ordering naming extensions of the mixture, enter 408134921
In the Order Entry and After Ordering naming extensions of the mixture, enter 34917 
D. In the Order Entry and After Ordering naming extensions of the mixture, enter 408134921
 - The Order Name (at the top of the Order Composer, on the MAR, on labels) is NOT controlled by the Order Display Name field. The Order Display Name is how the ERX appears on search results (Preference List, Facility List, and Database tabs) and how a dispensable appears in Verify Orders (see question 1).
 - You could change the Order Name Suffix to "in dextrose 5 % IV syringe," which would ALMOST result in a name that matches the screen shot. But the "74 mg" would still be appearing at the end of the Order Name and when you changed the base to NS, the Order Name would still say "in dextrose 5 %".
 - What you need to do is give your mixture a naming extension, which controls which pieces of information appear in the Order Name. 408134921 is the appropriate choice for this mixture, because that includes the name of the base and the total volume of the mixture.  34917 would include the name of the base and the volume of just the base (you'd use that for an adult IVPB in a standard volume, like "50 mL" or "100 mL").

You select the TOBRAMYCIN PEDIATRIC IV SYRINGE from the Database tab, open the Order Composer, and fill it in as shown below. Which Order Composer Configuration was most likely used for this ERX record? (Choose ONE only.)
Rx Concentration Dose Mixture
Rx Main Ingredient Mixture No Component Display
Rx Main Ingredient Mixture Displaying Base
Rx Simple Med
C) Rx Main Ingredient Mixture Displaying Base. You can tell because of the choice between dextrose 5% and sodium chloride 0.9% at the bottom. That “Base” section is appearing there because of the OCC.

Instead of using the Database tab this time, you select “tobramycin (NEBCIN) IV orderable” from the Facility List. When you open the order composer, you see an Admin Duration field (just below the Frequency), with buttons, and it is editable, as you see in the screenshot.

Name at least two settings to make this happen.

In the tobramycin orderable record in text, use RX MAIN INGREDIENT MIXTURE NO COMPONENT DISPLAY for the OCC, which displays the Admin Duration field. Also set an Admin Duration unit and button values, so that buttons appear correctly. In the tobramycin orderable record in Classic, enable editing for rate, administration duration and label comments; tell the system to look at either the dispensable or the orderable for the default. You would also make sure the default is set in the corresponding record(s).

When configuring IMS for Mixtures, which of the following records should be on your hospital’s formulary? (Choose ALL that apply)
The IMS orderable mapping record
Any single ERX premix IVs that might be dispensed
Any mixtures that might be dispensed
Any of the ingredient simple ERX records used in the mixtures
The bases (like D5W or NS) used to prepare the mixtures
All of the above. All of those records would be approved for use, so they should all be on the formulary.

Assuming your central pharmacy med list is linked to your Facility List, which of the ERX records in the previous question should have a green dot next to them when you add them to the central pharmacy med list?
Just A. The “green dots” indicate which meds should appear on the linked preference list. The facility preference list (and any MD or RN profile preference lists) should have only the IMS orderable record and any ingredients that can be ordered on their own (such as cefazolin for injection).

 

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

IV piggyback (IVPB)

Simple ERX record

Mixture ERX record

IMS for mixtures

IMS orderable (or “orderable mapping”) ERX record

Dispensable record

Dispensable mapping

Admin Duration

Premix IV piggyback

Main ingredient mixture

Preparation Instructions

Label Comments

Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixture

Ratio-based mixture

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Configure a premix IV piggyback

Configure a main ingredient mixture

Configure a Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixture

Configure a ratio-based mixture

Configure an IMS orderable mapping record

Configure dispensable mapping for an IMS orderable

Test dispensable mapping for an IMS orderable

Enable editing of the Admin Duration field in an orderable, and control where the default Admin Duration value will come from

Add the appropriate medication (ERX) and package (NDC) records to the appropriate medication and preference lists for a group of IV piggybacks

Attach the appropriate Task Template record for IV piggybacks

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

How configuring a premix IV piggyback is different than configuring other simple ERX records

Why you should not allow custom doses on a premix IV piggyback

Why you should add “Premix” as a Product Admin Instruction and Label Comment

That a main ingredient mixture can have multiple base options

How the Order Name of a main ingredient mixture is generated

Why you should use a naming Extension for a main ingredient mixture and ratio-based mixture (and which Extension you should use for each)

Where the allowed units for the Dose field in a main ingredient mixture comes from

How Epic picks the dispense location for a mixture record

Why you should give most main ingredient mixtures a Prep Type

Where Label Comments and Preparation Instructions appear to end-users

The differences between a normal main ingredient mixture and a Mini-Bag Plus or ADD-Vantage mixture

How setting the Components and doses locked field to “yes” affects a mixture in the Orders activity and Verify Orders.

How setting the Components and doses locked field to “yes” affects the way Epic picks a dispense location for the mixture.

Why Mini-Bag Plus and ADD-Vantage mixtures should have Dispense components? set to “Yes.”

The difference between a ratio-based mixture and most main ingredient mixtures

In a ratio-based mixture, how the doses of the ingredients on the Mixture Setup 2 screen relate to each other, and how they related to the Dose of the order 

Why an IMS orderable record might need override contexts

Why an IMS orderable record might need standardized doses

8. Medication Drips
 

Introduction
A medication drip is a medication that:

Is continuously infused ﴾it has a frequency of “Continuous” and typically has a route of “Intravenous”﴿, and…
Is dosed with a rate‐based, over‐time unit ﴾such as mg/min or mcg/kg/min﴿.
Some medication drips are available as premixes, making them simple ERX records. But many drips need to be compounded specifically for each patient, usually because the drip is only stable for a few hours or days. These drips must be ordered and dispensed as concentration‐based mixtures.

To make matters more complicated, some hospitals will prepare and dispense concentration‐based mixtures even though there is a commercial premix on the market ﴾because of shortages, costs, etc.﴿. But the ordering user doesn’t care how it gets dispensed; they just want to choose a dose and a concentration. To enable this behavior, we use IMS for drips much like we use IMS for mixtures.

Beyond the Basics	
Many medication drips are titrated, meaning they are ordered with a ranged dose and nurses are instructed to adjust the dose/infusion rate as needed to achieve a desired result. These titrated medication drips are sometimes called "titrations" or "titratable" drips. 

Not every medication drip is a titration, but all titrations are medication drips. 

By the End of This Lesson, You Will Be Able to…

Configure a concentration-based mixture
Identify the key features of a premix (simple ERX) medication drip
Configure IMS for Drips
Configuring Concentration-Based Mixtures
Concentration‐based mixtures are medication drips that must be prepared by your pharmacy specifically for each patient. If a medication drip is a prepared as a mixture, it's a concentration-based mixture. 

Concentration‐based mixtures have a concentration‐dosed ingredient. This is similar to a main ingredient ﴾see chapter 5﴿, except that:

You can specify one or more concentrations when building the mixture, which controls how much concentration‐based ingredient is included in each bag.
The dose is rate‐based ﴾e.g. “mcg/kg/min”﴿, indicating how much of the concentration‐dosed ingredient the patient should get over time. The system then calculates an overall infusion rate based on the dose and the concentration.
Beyond the Basics	
Norepinephrine ﴾Levophed﴿ is a drug used to treat shock. It comes in 1 mg/mL vials, which gets diluted into 250 mL of either D5W or NS. "Standard" concentration for adult patients is 16 mcg/mL (or 4,000 mcg in a 250 mL), but it can also be prepared at "Double" strength (32 mcg/mL, or 8,000 mcg per 250 mL).

These infusions are usually titrated. The dose typically starts at 0.05 mcg/kg/min, which indicates how much norepinephrine the patient should get per minute. Nurses will start the drip at and that dose and increase the dose until the desired result is achieved. 

Trainer Demo: Watch as your instructor orders their trn401 norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion for their Caleb patient. 

 



If you prepare concentration-based mixtures with different volumes (250 mL vs. 500 mL vs. 1,000 mL, etc.), then you should create a different mixture ERX per volume (just like you do with main ingredient mixtures). You can then link the mixtures together with an IMS Orderable Drip; you'll see that later in this lesson.

Exercise 1: Configure a Concentration-Based Mixture
In this exercise, you'll configure a norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion as a concentration-based mixture. The build is very similar to a main ingredient mixture, with a few key differences. 

Part 1: Create the Mixture
In text, navigate to the Medication master file prompt.
Create a new record: “TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN D5W” (replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet).
Hint: type an * at the Medication: prompt to create a new record. 
On the first screen:
Give it a Template type of “Mixture”.
Give it a Synonym of "Levophed".
Give it a Prep type of “IV Admixture”.
Page down to Mixture Setup 1.
Give it an Order Disp Name of “trn### norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion in D5W”.
Give it a default Frequency of “Continuous”.
Configure the Suggested Doses for Order Entry like so (these will appear as dose buttons):

These doses are ranges. Nurses will have to enter a specific dose (within this range) each time they chart on the MAR. 
Page down to the Mixture Setup 2 screen.
Add these three ingredients, configured as shown:
Drug	Dose	Units	Type	Vol	Sel
NOREPINEPHRINE BITARTRATE 1 MG/ML IV SOLN [128328]	 	mcg/mL	Medication	No	Concentration Dosed Ingredient
DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]	250	mL	Base	 	Yes
SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN [27838]	250	mL	Base	 	No
Selecting “Concentration Dosed Ingredient” for the norepinephrine tells the system that this mixture is a medication drip.
It ties this ingredient to the Dose field in the order composer. 
It also enables the Concentration Options screen, which will determine how much of the norepinephrine ingredient is used per bag.
Finally, it ties the dose (2.5 – 10 mcg/kg/min) to this ingredient. The “mcg” in that dose refers to “mcg of this ingredient.”
Entering "No" in the Vol column prevents the system from adding the dispense amount of this ingredient to the total volume of the mixture.
In practice, technicians will just add the concentration dosed ingredient to the base. The concentration is technically a little less than expected, but if the volume of concentration dosed ingredient is insignificant (~3 % or less of the base's volume), you'll probably just ignore it.  
If the volume of the concentration dosed ingredient is significant (more than ~3 % of the base's volume), you should build this mixture with a QS base. See "Beyond the Basics: Med Drips with QS Bases" later in this chapter for details. 
Page down to the Mixture Order Composer Items screen.
Make “Intravenous” a route button and “Continuous” a frequency button.
Set Allow Custom Dose? to No for both base ingredients, to prevent clinicians from choosing non-standard amounts of base.
Page down once to the Concentration Options screen. Configure the table there as follows:
Name	Amount	Unit	Default?
Standard	16	mcg/mL	Yes
Double	32	mcg/mL	 
This table controls which concentrations options are available (Standard, Double, etc.), and for each option, how much of the Concentration Dosed Ingredient (norepinephrine) will be used.
In the Concentration Buttons field, list both choices: “Standard” and “Double”
Page down to the Order Composer Section Setup screen.
Enter a Type of "Base".  Then enter "Yes" under both Select One Only? and Selection Required? 
This ensures users must select one and only one base.
Page down to the Inpatient Medication Order Name Options screen.
Give the mixture an Order Name Suffix of “infusion”.
In the Order Entry and After Ordering extension fields, enter "4083492101" for IP RXNAME DOSE WITH BASE, STRENGTH, AND TOTAL VOLUME”.
This causes the order name to include the total amount of each ingredient, plus the final concentration. Like this:
​​​​​
Page down to the Calculation Configuration screen.
Allowed ordering units: mcg/kg/min
Allowed routes: Intravenous and Intraosseous
Make “Intravenous” the default route.
Page down to the Dispense Code Configuration screen.
Default Dispense Code: Titratable Mixture
The dispense code "Continuous Mixture" is also used for medication drips.
If you expect nurses to titrate, or adjust the rate, choose Titratable Mixture. If not, choose Continuous Mixture.
Page down to the Triggered Fills Configuration screen
Default to Triggered Fills list: Yes. 
This prevents the system from calculating a dispense interval based on volume and rate. Dispensing will be done automatically (based on the MAR) or on-demand. 
This is recommended for titratable medications, because the rate is variable. 
Page down to the Default Administration Instructions screen. 
In the first SmartText field (for Default Administration Instructions), enter: RX NOREPINEPHRINE TITRATION INSTRUCTIONS.
This is a pre-configured block of text that will instruct nurses how to titrate this medication. 
In the Preparation Instructions SmartText field, enter: RX PREP INSTRUCTIONS GENERIC NO MID PREP STEP
This is the same SmartText you used for prep instructions in your main ingredient mixture. 
Page down to the Order Specific Questions screen.
At the BOTTOM of the screen, enter the following Inpatient Questions:
RX TITRATABLE INFUSION INITIAL DOSE (MCG/KG/MIN) [149158]
RX TARGET BLOOD PRESSURE FOR PRESSORS [131495].
These are Question (LQL) records, like the one you used to ask for indications on your ceFAZolin IVs. They will display before the administration instructions in the order composer. Whether or not they are required is based on settings in the LQL records themselves. 
Page down to the Order Composer Configuration screen.
Context: Inpatient
Configuration: RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE [4080200009]
This makes Dose required, hides the Rate field, causes the Concentration field to appear, and puts the Base section in the right place.
If this mixture always used the same base, you'd use RX CONCENTRATION DOSE MIXTURE [4080200012] instead.  
Page down to the Allowed Inpatient Frequencies screen.
Make “Continuous” [200905] the only option.
Page down to the Task Templates & Administration Groups screen.
Task Template of “IP NOREPINEPHRINE” [3040000053].  
This Task Template adds a norepinephrine-specific Flowsheet Group to the patient’s Intake/Output flowsheet.
Administration Group of “Norepinephrine.”
The Administration Group links orders for this mixture (or any other ERX with the same Administration Group) to the norepinephrine-specific Flowsheet Group. This means that multiple orders for norepinephrine drips will appear in the same Flowsheet rows.
At your organization, the Clinical Documentation team will tell you the appropriate Task Template and Administration Group.
That’s it! SHIFT+F7.
Part 2: Add Your Mixture to Your Lists
In Classic, open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST
Add your TRN4## NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN D5W.
This is your mixture. You're adding it so that it gets added to your Facility List.
This also makes it an acceptable dispensable for IMS for Drips, which we'll discuss later. 
While you're here, confirm that NOREPINEPHRINE BITARTRATE 1 MG/ML IV SOLN [128328] is already on your central pharmacy med list. 
This is the concentration dosed ingredient you used in the mixture.
This product is never ordered on its own, so it should not have a green dot (and should not appear on the Facility List). 
Confirm that NDC 0703-1153-03 (a 4 mL vial) is selected for this medication, and will be dispensed as a whole package. 
Close your central pharmacy medication list.
In the real world, you would also add these items to your TRN### Hospital Formulary. We’re skipping that step in class to save time.
Part 3: Test Your Work
Go to Hyperspace and log in as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Open Caleb's chart. Remove any unsigned orders. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Search for your "trn###" in the new orders field. Select your trn### norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion in D5W from the Facility List.
The order composer should look like this:




Notice that the frequency is not selectable. When there is only one allowed frequency, it displays like this.
Even though you made "Continuous" a frequency button, it doesn't appear it's the only choice allowed.
Change the Concentration to “Double.”
Confirm that the Order Name now shows “…8,000 mcg in dextrose 5 % 250 ml (32 mg/mL)…”
Enter an Initial Dose (mcg/kg/min) of "0.05" and select a Target Blood Pressure of "SBP 90 or above". 
Note that the first question is not required, but the second one is required. This is configured in the individual Question (LQL) records. 
The Admin Instructions indicate what the nurse should use as an initial dose if the first question is left blank. 
Accept your changes. Click Sign & Verify. Choose an order mode and provider.
Your order appears like so:


Note that the calculated volume of the mixture is not including the 8 mL from the norepinephrine bitartrate 1 mg/mL IV soln. That's because you entered "No" for that ingredient under the Vol column on Mixture Setup 2. 
Also, note the "Automatic dispensing" and "Triggered fill" options in the Dispense Details. They appear because you set Default to Triggered Fills list to "Yes." We'll discuss why this is important later. 
Click Label Preview. 
There are no labels. You haven’t configured label routing for Titratable Mixtures yet!
Leave the order unverified. Go to Flowsheets (under the  button at the top right). 
Select the I/O tab. Confirm that you have a group for Norepinephrine Drip, like so:

If You Have Time: Make a Version with NS Selected by Default
Your mixture uses D5W by default. If you want IMS to be able to select NS for specific patients, you’ll need a different version with NS selected by default. You don’t have to create it from scratch; you can duplicate your mixture and tweak it.

Go to Text >> Chronicles (NOT Clinical Administration) >> ERX >> Enter Data >> Duplicate Medication.
If you were already logged in to Text, page up until you reach the Training Application Access menu. Choose Chronicles from there.
At the Database initials prompt, enter "ERX". 
Enter your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN D5W.
At the New Med ID#(.1): field, enter an asterisk (“*”) and press ENTER.
This tells the system to assign an ID automatically.
Yes, you want to give it a new name.
Give it a New Name of “TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN NS” (replacing ### with your TRN###).
Yes, continue.
No, you do not want to clear out the simple generic medication.
Page up twice. Quit Chronicles.
From the Training Application Access menu, go back into Clinical Administration >> Meds >> Medications (ERX).  
Edit your newly made mixture (the one in NS).
Page down to Mixture Setup 1. Change the Order Disp Name to indicate "in NS" instead of "in D5W".
On the Mixture Setup 2 screen, change the Sel column so that dextrose 5 % IV soln is not selected by default, and sodium chloride 0.9 % IV soln is selected by default. 
Exit this record.
In Classic: add your new mixture to your TRN### Central Pharmacy med list.
No need to add the ingredients; they're already there!
In Hyperspace, test your new mixture on Caleb. Confirm that:
It appears on your Facility List, clearly labeled as “in NS”.
The default base is sodium chloride 0.9%, with dextrose 5 % available as an option.
If You STILL Have Time: Make Your Mixture QS Based
Beyond the Basics	Beyond the Basics: You might find the content of this section useful or interesting, but you are not expected to know about QS bases for your project or exam.  
If the volume of a concentration dosed ingredient is negligible (~3% of total volume or less), then common practice is to just add the ingredient to the base without first drawing out any fluid out of the bag. But if the volume of a concentration dosed ingredient is significant (more than ~3% of total volume), then the technician should draw out an equivalent amount of base from the IV bag, replacing it with the concentration dosed ingredient. Instead of the base being a fixed amount (250 mL), the technician uses a "sufficient quantity" of base to achieve the target volume. 

Let's see how this would work with your norepinephrine in NS mixture!

In Text, open your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN NS mixture. 
Page down to the Mixture Setup 1 screen. 
In the Volume (mL) field, enter "250".
This is the final, total volume that this mixture should have.  
Page down to the Mixture Setup 2 screen. Make the following changes:
:
What did you just do? You just indicated that
The norepinephrine ingredient should contribute to the total volume of 250 mL.
The bases are now QS Bases; their dose will be a "quantity sufficient" to get a total volume of 250 mL.
Double check that the Sel column appears as shown above. If not, fix it!
QS Bases are set to "No" by default.  
Page down to the Concentration Options screen. Add a third concentration of "Maximum" that is equal to 128 mcg/mL. Do NOT make it a button.  
This concentration is not common, but it's sometimes appropriate!
With a total volume of 250 mL, 128 mcg/mL would require 32 mL of norepinephrine. That's definitely a significant amount, and we should tell the technician to account for it.  
Page down 3 times to the Order Composer Section Setup screen. 
The system automatically added a row here for QS Base, but you need to remove the "Base" row. 
Hint: Use the F1 key to delete an entire row from a table. 
Make sure that users can select only one QS Base, and that a selection is required. 
Press SHIFT+F7 to exit your record. 
Go to Hyperspace, open Caleb's chart and discontinue any active orders.
Enter a new order for your trn### norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion in NS. 
Look at the order name. Confirm that it shows a total volume of "250 mL (16 mcg/ml)".  
Look at the Order Composer, in the "QS Base" section. How much sodium chloride 0.9 % is being used? 246 mL
Change the Concentration to "Double."
Now how much sodium chloride 0.9 % is being used? 242 mL
Click the magnifying glass next to Concentration and choose "Maximum". 
Now how much sodium chloride 0.9 % is being used? 218 mL
As the concentration increases, and the amount of norepinephrine increases, the amount of QS Base goes down so that the final total volume is 250 mL! 
Key Takeaways: Concentration-Based Mixtures
Defining the Mixture
Give your new record a Template type of “Mixture” ﴾first screen﴿ to access mixture setup screens. Then, on Mixture Setup 2:



In the Sel column, make the primary ingredient a "Concentration Dosed Ingredient". 
Ties the Dose field in the order composer to this ingredient.
Enables the Concentration Options screen (see below).
Tells the system to use this ingredient and the volume of the mixture to determine the mixture's discrete concentration.
In the Vol column, enter "No" for the Concentration Dosed Ingredient. 
Has the system ignore the ingredient's volume when calculating the mixture's total volume.
Prevents unexpected and confusing concentrations. 
Beyond the Basics	
Beyond the Basics: What would Happen if the Concentration Dosed Ingredient DID Contribute to Volume?

The system would first calculate the amount of ingredient needed, based on the concentration and the dose of the base. So if you ordered the norepinephrine mixture with Standard strength (16 mcg/mL), it would think you needed 4,000 mcg of norepinephrine for the 250 mL of base. 

It would add the 4 mL to the volume for the norepinephrine, and think you needed another 16 mcg/mL x 4 mL = 65 mcg, or 0.065 mL. That would be rounded to the nearest 0.1 mL, or 100 mcg. You'd end up with this:



If the Concentration Dosed Ingredient contributes a significant volume to the mixture (more than ~3 % of total volume), and you want technicians to account for that volume when preparing the mixture, then configure this mixture with a QS Base. See "Beyond the Basics: Med Drips with QS Bases" below.

Do not allow custom doses for the base (on the Mixture Order Composer Items screen), and require that users select one and only one base.





Configuring Concentrations
If you want to allow multiple concentrations, configure this screen:



Critical	The choices in the Name column are just labels. The Amount and Unit columns actually control the math. The system won’t prevent mismatches! For example, nothing stops you from entering a concentration with a name of "Quadruple" and indicating that it is 8 mcg/mL. 
 If there’s only one concentration, handle that with Mixture Setup 2:



If this mixture will be part of an IMS orderable drip ﴾see page 24﴿, the Units must be “…/mL” ﴾such as “mcg/mL” or “mg/mL”﴿ instead of just a simplified unit ﴾mcg, mg, etc.﴿.

Configuring Naming
Record Name	
If mixture is for a general population:

<MEDICATION> INFUSION IN <BASE>
If meant for a specific population/use, add that to end:

<MEDICATION> INFUSION IN <BASE> ﴾NEO/PED﴿
Order Display Name	
Typical format:

<generic medication> (<Brand>) infusion in <base>
If meant for a specific population/use, add that to end:

<generic medication> (<Brand>) infusion in <base> (neo/ped)
Order Name	Desired appearance:
<short name of medication> ﴾<Brand name of medication>﴿ <amount of medication> in <short name of base> <amount of base> (<concentration>) infusion
To achieve that appearance:

Order Name Suffix:  infusion
Add Order Entry and After Ordering extension: 4083492101 ‐ IP RXNAME DOSE WITH BASE, STRENGTH, AND TOTAL VOLUME
Includes short name, brand name, and amount of Concentration Dosed Ingredient
Includes base name and volume
Includes concentration (e.g. 1 mg/mL) 
 

Configuring the Order Composer
Dose	
Only use rate‐based units ﴾e.g. mcg/kg/hr, Units/min, etc.﴿. If titrated, dose will be a range ﴾e.g. 0.05‐1 mcg/kg/hr﴿.

Suggested doses for order entry ﴾dose buttons﴿ and default on Mixture Setup 1 screen
Allowed order units on Calculation Configuration screen
Frequencies	
"Continuous" only, possibly with "Continuous PRN" as an allowed option.

Default set on Mixture Setup 1
Button﴾s﴿ on Mixture Order Composer Items screen
Limit choices on Allowed Inpatient Frequencies screen
Route	
"Intravenous," possibly with "Intraosseous" as an allowed option.

Button(s) on Mixture Order Composer Items screen
Allowed & default on Calculation Configuration screen
Administration Instructions	
If there’s a ranged dose, include patient‐specific admin instructions to define titration instructions. Will likely refer to Order Specific Questions (below).

Use SmartText if instructions are same for multiple ERXs.
Use Short Text if instructions are specific to this one ERX.
Order Specific Questions	Use order specific questions to clarify administration instructions and require the ordering provider to provide additional details.
Order Composer Configuration	
If there are multiple available bases: 

RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE [4080200009]
If there is only one base:

RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE [4080200012]
Both display the Concentration field, but only if the Concentration Options screen is configured.

Beyond the Basics	You can create Order Specific Questions to display in order composers. For more information, check out Let Clinicians Answer Questions Related to Their Orders in the Order Entry and Order Composer Setup and Support Guide on Galaxy.
Adding to Med & Preference Lists
Formulary	Add the mixture ERX record and all ingredient ERX records. 
Central Pharmacy Med List	
Add the mixture ERX record and all ingredient ERX records.

Keep the green dot on the mixture ﴾should be on Facility List﴿, unless it’s part of an IMS Orderable Drip.
Remove green dot from each ingredient, unless it is ordered on its own.
Be sure to select appropriate NDCs for each ingredient.
Other Dispense Locations' Med Lists	
Add ingredient ERXs and NDCs you stock at the location (ADS cabinets update automatically on load).

Mixture ERX records do NOT need to be added.
Configuring Dispensing
Prep Type	
IV Admixture

Can only be dispensed from Pharmacy (PHR) records that support this prep type
Dispense Code	Either “Titratable Mixture” (if there’s a ranged dose) or “Continuous Mixture” (for fixed doses). 
Default to Triggered Fills list	
"Yes" for titrations, and possibly for other concentration-based mixtures if desired. 

Creates a Dispense (First Dose) action when verified
Subsequent dispenses are either
Scheduled automatically based on MAR actions (creates "Scheduled Dispense" actions)
Initiated manually at request of nursing (creates "Redispense" actions)
Label Routing	
Two rows per action + dispense code.

Include these actions:

Dispense (First Dose), Dispense (Cart Fill), Redispense, and Scheduled Dispense.
Scheduled Dispense actions come from Automatic Dispensing (discussed later in this chapter).
Dispense Codes:

Titratable Mixture and Continuous Mixture
SmartText:

For Continuous Mixture dispense code:
RX LABEL - CONTINUOUS MIXTURE (not grouped) for dose labels
RX LABEL - CONTINUOUS MIXTURE PRODUCTION (grouped) for production labels.
For Titratable Mixture dispense code:
RX LABEL - TITRATABLE MIXTURE (not grouped) for dose labels
RX LABEL - TITRATABLE MIXTURE PRODUCTION (grouped) for production labels.
 

You'd include a similar set of rows for the "Titratable Mixture" dispense code.  

Configuring Administration
Add a medication‐specific task template and administration group. This links orders for the mixture to rows on nurses’ Intake/Output flowsheets.



By using a medication‐specific infusion group and administration group, the system is able to use the same rows on the flowsheet for multiple orders. This is valuable, because such orders are often discontinued and resumed over time as the patient’s condition changes.

Example	Caleb was started on a standard ﴾16 mcg/mL﴿ concentration norepinephrine drip. He responded well to the drip, so it was stopped. An hour later, his condition deteriorated and a new order was entered for a double‐strength ﴾32 mcg/mL﴿ drip. Both orders appear in the same set of flowsheet rows.
 

Configuring Charging for Mixtures
Epic will generate a separate charge for each ingredient in a mixture. It uses the charge method, linked procedure, and cost of each ingredient. There is no special configuration required to charge for a mixture.

Beyond the Basics: Med Drips with QS Bases
Beyond the Basics	This section on QS Bases is beyond the basics. You might find it useful or interesting, but are not expected to know it for your exam or project.  
If the medication ingredient in a concentration-based mixture would contribute a significant volume (more than ~3 % of the mixture's total volume), then you should probably configure it with QS Base instead of a standard Base ingredients. QS stands for "quantity sufficient." 

To create a concentration-based mixture with a QS base:

Designate the desired total volume of the mixture:

On the Mixture Setup 2 screen:
Make sure that the medication ingredient does contribute to volume.
Give the base ingredient(s) a type of "QS Base" instead of "Base".
Do NOT enter a default Dose for the base ingredients.  
If a choice of QS Bases is allowed, ensure that only one can be selected and that users are required to select one.

With this setup, the system will:

Calculate the amount of medication ingredient to use based on the desired volume (from Mixture Setup 1), the concentration of the mixture.
Calculate the volume that the medication ingredient contributes to the mixture (using the ingredient ERX's Rx Unit Equivalency screen).
Subtract the volume of the medication ingredient from the desired volume of the mixture (from Mixture Setup 1).
 Set the dose of the QS Base to the remaining amount. 


Configuring Premix Medication Drips
Not all medication drips are mixtures. Many are available as premixes, often in multiple concentrations. Each concentration is a different simple ERX record.

Example	
Norepinephrine is available as these simple ERX premixes:

NOREPINEPHRINE-DEXTROSE 4-5 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134544]
aka "norepinephrine infusion 16 mcg/mL in D5W 250 mL"
NOREPINEPHRINE-SODIUM CHLORIDE 4-0.9 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134605]
aka "norepinephrine infusion 16 mcg/mL in NS 250 mL"
NOREPINEPHRINE-DEXTROSE 8-5 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134547]
aka "norepinephrine infusion 32 mcg/mL in D5W 250 mL"
NOREPINEPHRINE-SODIUM CHLORIDE 8-0.9 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134543]
aka "norepinephrine infusion 32 mcg/mL in NS 250 mL"
In the Orders activity, a premix medication drip appears much like a concentration-based mixture, except:

There's no Concentration display item (because the concentration is fixed; it's a premix!).
There's no Base section (it's premixed in either D5W or NS).
Prod. Admin Inst indicate that it is a premix.


In Hyperspace, order "norepinephrine infusion 16 mcg/mL in D5W 250 mL" [134544] for Caleb off the Database tab and look at its order composer.

Configure Naming
As with any simple ERX record, the record name comes from the third-party data vendor. Include the usual synonyms: brand names, abbreviations, and mnemonics.

Order Display Name	
<generic name> (<Brand name>) infusion <concentration>

If it’s part of an IMS orderable drip, consider including “(premix)” or similar in the Order Display Name.

Order Name	
Follow the usual conventions. 

Short name: generic name of drug, lowercase or TALLman, plus "in dextrose 5 %" or "in sodium chloride 0.9 %"
Brand name: common brand name(s), Title Case, no parentheses
Suffix: “infusion”
Include strength in order name? Yes (see below)
Include form in order name? No
You might want to update the Display Strength (on the Clinical Medication Information) screen to something more appropriate than the strength provided by your third-party vendor. For example, the vendor's imported strength might be "4-5 MG/250ML-%" and you'd prefer the strength to appear as "16 mcg/mL."  If you do change the Display Strength, though, set Protect Strength? to "Yes" to protect your change from future third-party updates. 



Configure the Order Composer
This is similar to what you’ve seen in simple ERX records before, but keep a couple things in mind:

You can configure override contexts, but these apply only if you order the premix directly. (If it’s part of an IMS drip, the override contexts in this record won’t matter.)
Doses are rate-based. Suggested doses and allowed order units should reflect this. For titrations, doses are typically ranged. 
Restrict frequency choices. The only choices should be Continuous or Continuous PRN.
Medication drips often have order specific questions and default administration instructions to provide guidance on how to titrate the medication.
Indicate that this is a premix in the Product Admin Instructions and Label Comment.
The appropriate Order Composer Configuration is RX SIMPLE MED.
Configure Dosing Units
Configure the Rx Unit Equivalence screen much like you would for an IV piggyback. The key points are:



Add the Premix to Appropriate Med Lists
Formulary	Add ERXs. Don’t worry about NDCs.
Central Pharmacy	
Add ERXs and NDCs.

Dispense entire package (yellow dot).
If multiple packages available, choose the default (red dot). IPS doesn’t work with rate-based doses.
Remove green dot if it’s part of an IMS orderable drip.
Other dispense locations	
Add ERXs and NDCs you stock at the location (ADS cabinets update automatically on load).

Dispense entire package (yellow dot).
If multiple packages available, choose the default (red dot). IPS doesn’t work with rate-based doses.
Configure Dispensing
Dispense Code	Titratable Premix or Continuous Premix
Label Routing	
Actions: Dispense (First Dose), Dispense (Cart Fill), Redispense, Scheduled Dispense

Label: one for each dispense code

RX LABEL – TITRATABLE PREMIX 
RX LABEL – CONTINUOUS PREMIX
Configure Administration


For medications that are available as both premixes and mixtures, use the same task template and administration group in both types of records.

Remember, the task template causes the correct rows to appear on the I/O flowsheet and helps make infusion pump interfaces work.

Configuring Charging for Premixes
Configure charging for premix IV drips the same way you would for any simple ERX record: assign a cost, a method, and a linked procedure.

In the Foundation System, IV drip premixes are assigned a charge method of “IV.” What method you select will depend on the charging strategy at your organization.
Use linked procedure HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/ HCPCS (ALT 636 FOR OP/ED) for premix drips (unless there’s no HCPCS assigned, in which case you’ll use HC RX 250 GENERAL PHARMACY W/O HCPCS instead).
Configuring When Continuous IVs Are Dispensed
We dispense most orders based on their scheduled due times. But for concentration-based mixtures and other continuous IVs, there are no regular, scheduled due times. Epic puts a “Due” time on the MAR representing when the order should start, but after that the nurse will adjust rates and hang new bags as needed. So how does Epic know when to dispense a new bag? You have three options:

Dispense Interval – the system approximates a future dispense time based on volume, rate, and start time.
Automatic Dispensing – the system dynamically schedules and updates future dispense times based on MAR documentation (only really works if you interface with smart infusion pumps).
Dispense continuous orders only on demand – pharmacy manually dispenses or schedules a dispense time when it is needed.
Default Behavior: Use the Dispense Interval
If you make no special settings, the system will automatically calculate a dispense interval for continuous orders based on the rate and volume. The system generates "Dispense (First Dose)" and "Dispense (Cart Fill)" actions for such orders as if they were due at their start time and then every X hours later (where X = the dispense interval).  You can set a maximum dispense interval (for example "24 hours") in system definitions, and override that maximum dispense interval in individual ERX records. 

Example	Pretend you ordered a Lactated Ringer's infusion at 100 mL/hr, and dispensed it in a 1,000 mL flex container. The system would calculate a dispense interval of "10 hours".  If the order's start time was 1345, the system would generate Dispense (First Dose) and/or Dispense (Cart Fill) actions as if it was due at 1345, 2345, tomorrow at 0945, tomorrow at 1945, etc. (every 10 hours).    
 

Automatic Dispensing
The dispense interval works well for inexpensive products with a consistent rate. But it's inappropriate for expensive products or mixtures that require technician preparation, because it generates dispenses based on the ordered start time and rate.  If the nurse needs to pause the infusion or reduce the rate, you might dispense a bag that the patient does not need. Likewise, a dispense interval is inappropriate for titrated medications. The system calculates the dispense interval based on the maximum dose, which will almost certainly result in over-dispensing the drip.  

For such medications, Epic can automatically schedule future dispenses based on:

The volume dispensed
When a "New Bag" action is documented on the MAR
Rate changes, pauses, and restarts documented on the MAR (usually via a smart pump interface).
To use automatic dispensing, set the ERX record to default to the Triggered Fills list (as shown below). Alternatively, you can select Treat continuous orders as triggered fills on the General form of your Pharmacy (PHR) record, which applies to ALL orders with continuous frequencies. 



Orders that are added to the Triggered Fills list use automatic dispensing by default. That means:

The system creates a "Dispense (First Dose)" action when the order is verified
When a “New Bag” action is charted on the MAR, the system schedules the next med due time.
Med Due Time: time of “New Bag” action + (Volume/Rate)
This due time doesn’t actually appear on the MAR. It’s when the next bag is needed.
The system schedules a dispense time by subtracting the lead time.
Scheduled Dispense Time: Med Due Time minus lead time
Lead time is set to 90 minutes in Pharmacy System Definitions; override in in the dispensing Pharmacy (PHR) if needed.
A “Scheduled Dispense” action is created at that time; your Label Routing table needs to include this action!
When a “Rate Changed,” “Paused,” or “Restarted” action is charted on the MAR (manually or via a smart pump interface), the system automatically reschedules the dispense based on the remaining volume and the new rate.
Beyond the Basics	
Automatic dispensing works best when Epic is integrated with smart pumps. Setting up smart infusion pump interfacing is a big project. You must configure IIDs to match between the ERX master file and the drug library in the smart pump system. There are also device records to build for the pumps, interface variables to configure so that the right information is sent back and forth between the two systems, ERX record settings, and system level settings.

See the Infusion Pump Integration Setup and Support Guide for more info.

Scheduled dispenses can be monitored using the Triggered Fills/Scheduled Dispenses activity. You can print a label ahead of time, reschedule the order, or cancel it.

Path: Search >> “Trig Fills/Sched Dispenses”

TRAINER DEMO: Watch your trainer sign an order for their trn401 norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion (setting a target score of >90) and document hanging a new bag on the MAR (skipping the line and choosing any starting dose within the dose range). They'll then show the Triggered Fills/Schedule Dispenses activity. 

Dispense Only On Demand
If parts of your organization don't have interfaces with smart pumps, you'll want to disable automatic dispensing for those hospitals and/or units. Likewise, you might want to disable automatic dispensing for certain medications.  

To disable automatic dispensing:

For entire hospital: Rx Admin >> Hospital Admin >> Dispensing Information >> set Enable automatic dispensing for continuous infusions to “No”.
For specific unit: Rx Admin >> Unit/Department Admin >> Dispensing Information >> set Enable automatic dispensing for continuous infusions to “No”.
For specific medications: open the ERX record in text, set Disable automatic dispensing for continuous infusions to “Yes” on the Automatic Dispensing Configuration screen.
When automatic dispensing is disabled and that medication is added to the Triggered Fills list, then:

The order generates a Dispense (First Dose) action when the order is verified. 
Additional Redispense actions can be generated manually (usually in response to a MAR message).
Configuring IMS for Drips
Intelligent medication selection (IMS) allows users to choose a single orderable ERX record in Order Entry and Epic will pick the correct product(s) to dispense based on the clinical details of the order, the patient’s details, and what products are available for that patient.



As with IMS for mixtures, you create an “orderable” record and then map it to your possible dispensables. Unlike IMS for mixtures, the mapping for IMS for drips is usually done based on ordered concentration (instead of dose).



To configure IMS for a medication drip:

Configure all the simple ERX records, including:
Premix IVs that can be dispensed as-is
Ingredients used to prepare concentration-based mixtures
Configure all the concentration-based mixture ERX records.
Create an “orderable drip” ERX record and:
Configure it to appear correctly in Order Entry
Configure the concentration options for the drip
Add the orderable drip, simple, and concentration-based ERX records to the hospital formulary and the central pharmacy’s medication lists.
Mark only the orderable with a green dot on the central pharmacy med list so it is the only option available on the Facility List.
Map the dispensable ERX records to the orderable.
Exercise: Configuring IMS for Drips for Norepinephrine
Earlier in this lesson, you made a concentration-based mixture for norepinephrine in D5W. Now, you will create an orderable ERX that will look at your mixture together with the premixes available and choose the correct product to dispense.

Critical	If you have not completed Exercise 1 earlier in this chapter, this exercise will not work as written.
Part 1: Build Your Orderable ERX
In Text, at the Medication: prompt, enter a "*" to create a new record: “TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION ORDERABLE” (replacing ### with the trn### from your class info sheet.)
Mark it as configured.
Add the following Synonyms: “Levophed” and “drip”.
Enter “Orderable drip” [2] in the Orderable type field.
Page down to the Inpatient Order Defaults screen. Configure the following:
Order Display Name: trn### norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion
(replacing ### with the TRN### from your class info sheet)
Default Frequency: Continuous
Suggested Doses for Order Entry:

Page down once to the Concentration Options screen.
Configure the following concentrations:
Name	Amount	Unit	Default?
Standard	16	mcg/mL	Yes
Double	32	mcg/mL	
 

Make both "Standard" and "Double" concentrations buttons. 
Go to the Medication Order Name Text screen. Configure:
Short name: trn### norepinephrine
Brand name: Levophed
Suffix: infusion
If you add this orderable to a SmartGroup (for a panel or an Order Set), the default display name will be generated from these fields.
The order name at the top of the Order Composer will not come from these fields; it will come from the naming configuration of whichever dispensable IMS chooses to use.
Go to the Rx Unit Equivalence screen.
In the Medication Unit field, enter “mcg”.
The only reason you are configuring this here is so the system knows which unit to simplify complex doses to, and what unit to use when you set up your dispensable mapping.
The rest of the settings from the Rx Unit Equivalence screen (like Administration Unit, Rnd Factors, and the Equiv Qty and Unit fields) all come from the simple ERX records that IMS chooses to dispense.
Page down once to the Rx Order Setup screen.
Under the Allowed Order Units field, enter “mcg/kg/min”. This will be the only allowed unit. 
On the same screen, enter “Intravenous” and "Intraosseous" as allowed routes. Intravenous should be selected by default. 
Go to the Default Administration Instructions screen. In the first SmartText field, enter “RX NOREPINEPHRINE TITRATION INSTRUCTIONS”.
Page down to the Order Specific Questions screen. On the BOTTOM of the screen, set the following Inpatient Questions:
RX TITRATABLE INFUSION INITIAL DOSE (MCG/KG/MIN) [149158]
RX TARGET BLOOD PRESSURE FOR PRESSORS [131495].
On the Order Composer Configuration screen, set the OCC to “RX IMS ORDERABLE DRIP”.
Go to the Allowed Inpatient Frequencies screen. Make the only allowed frequency “Continuous” [200905].
On the Inpatient Order Composer Button Selections screen, make “Continuous” the only frequency button and “Intravenous” the only route button.
SHIFT+F7 to close your record.
Part 2: Map Your Orderable Drip to Your Dispensables
In Classic, go to Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin.
Open your “TRN### Norepinephrine Infusion Orderable”
Configure the Dispensable drug table to appear as follows (replacing "TRN###" in the last row with your TRN###):


The Concentration column appears because you gave this ERX record an Orderable Type of "Orderable Drip."
The “RX IMS DEXTROSE BASE APPROPRIATE” rule evaluates as true for any patient who is not admitted to the Neurology service, and who does not have an order for a ketogenic diet. 
If a patient is in one of those services or on a ketogenic diet, the system will rule out the dispensables that use D5W, and will use one of the options in NS instead.
At the bottom of the screen, under Failsafe dispensable drug, enter your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN D5W.
The system uses the “failsafe” dispensable” if it otherwise can’t figure out which dispensable to use.
Click Accept to save your work.
 

 

Part 3: Add Your Medications to Your Central Pharmacy Med List
Open your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST.
Add your new TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION ORDERABLE record.
Make sure it has a green dot under the P column.
Add NOREPINEPHRINE-DEXTROSE 4-5 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134544].
Select NDC 0338-0112-20, dispense the whole package.
Clear the green dot from under the P column.
Add NOREPINEPHRINE-SODIUM CHLORIDE 4-0.9 MG/250ML-% IV SOLN [134605].
Select NDC 63037-148-05, dispense the whole package.
Clear the green dot from under the P column.
Confirm that your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN D5W record (from Exercise 1) is on the list.
Remove the green dot from the P column.
If you completed the “If You Have Time” part of Exercise 1, and you also have a TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN NS, remove the green dot from it as well.
Confirm that NOREPINEPHRINE BITARTRATE 1 MG/ML IV SOLN [128328] is on the list, and that there is no green dot under the P column.
Click Close.
Beyond the Basics	
Notice that you did not add either of the double-strength premixes to your medication list, meaning that they are not available for the purposes of this exercise.

Also: In the real world, add these medications to your hospital formulary as well! We’re skipping that step in favor of time.

Part 4: Test Your Work
In Hyperspace, open Caleb’s chart. Remove any unsigned orders. 
Discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Click the +New button next to the order search field. Search for your “trn### norep”.
You have one match on the Facility List under Medications:
trn### norepinephrine (Levophed) infusion
Select that order. Your Order Composer should look like this:


Change the Concentration to “Double”.
Look at the Order Name. How did it change?
It now says “8,000 mg in dextrose 5 % 250 mL (32 mg/mL)”.
Also, notice that the Prod. Admin Instr is gone.
You're no longer dispensing a premix, you're dispensing your mixture, because the double-strength premix isn’t currently available on the central pharmacy’s medication list.
Choose Target Blood Pressure (mmHg) of "MAP 65-75".
Click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider. 
At the top of the screen, notice that the Dispensable is in fact your mixture from Exercise 1, and the products to dispense show you that this is a mixture.
Near the top of Verify Orders, click the pencil icon next to Clinical Details.
Find the Concentration field. Change it from “Double (32 mcg/mL)” to “Standard (16 mcg/mL).”
Notice that the Dispensable field changes, as does the order name. The system will now dispense the standard-strength premix.
At the bottom of the screen, confirm that only one product is being dispensed: NOREPINEPHRINE‐DEXTROSE 4‐5 MG/250ML‐% IV SOLN.
Click the magnifying glass for the Dispensable field. 
Only the available dispensables appear here, including the premix in NS.
Don't change the dispensable. Click Verify.
Go to the  drop-down next to your activity tabs. Pick Flowsheets. Go to the I/O tab.
There should be only one group for “Norepinephrine Drip,” rather than one for each order that you've placed. That’s because of the special norepinephrine-specific Task Template attached to both your mixture and the premixes. All norepinephrine infusion orders will use this same group.
Close Caleb's chart.
Open your Malachi patient’s chart.
Go to the Summary activity tab and choose the ADT Events report.
Confirm that his Service is “Neurology."
Also, confirm that he is in fact a cute (yet distinguished) little gentleman cat.  
Order your trn### norepinephrine orderable for Malachi.
Look at the order name and the Prod. Admin Instruct. Which dispensable did it choose?  b) the premix in NS
a) the premix in D5W
b) the premix in NS
c) your mixture in D5W
Why did it do that? (Hint: look back at your dispensable mapping in Part 2.)
Because Malachi doesn't meet the criteria of the "RX IMS DEXTROSE BASE APPROPRIATE" rule. The standard premix is not acceptable, so it uses the next dispensable, the premix in NS. 

Change the Concentration to "Double." 
Now which dispensable is it using? Why?
It's using your mixture in D5W, because that is the failsafe dispensable. You don't stock either of the double-strength premixes, and while your mixture in D5W is not technically acceptable, it doesn't have any better option. It's the failsafe, so the system uses that when no other dispensables are allowed. 

If you have time, move on to the next exercise to fix this problem!
If You Have Time: Make IMS for Drips Smarter
Right now, IMS is using your norepinephrine mixture in D5W as the failsafe dispensable. If no acceptable dispensables are available, the system uses that one—even if the patient shouldn't normally get D5W.  To fix that, you'll need a second mixture, one that defaults to using NS.

If you haven’t already, go complete this part of Exercise 1 earlier in this chapter: If You Have Time: Make a Version with NS Selected by Default.
Come back here when you’re done.
On your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY MED LIST, clear the green dot from your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN NS.
Once you’ve completed that exercise (and removed the green dot from the “IN NS” version of the mixture), go to Dispensable Mapping for your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE ORDERABLE INFUSION.
Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin
In the Dispensable Drug table, in row 6, add your TRN### NOREPINEPHRINE INFUSION IN NS. Do NOT enter a Concentration or a Rule. 
Change the Failsafe dispensable drug field from your mixture in D5W to your mixture in NS.  
Click Accept.
In Hyperspace, go to Malachi's chart.  Remove any unsigned orders.  
Order your trn### norepinephrine orderable for Malachi. Confirm that the order name appears as follows for each concentration:
Concentration	Order Name
Standard	norepinephrine in sodium chloride 0.9 % (Levophed) 16 mcg/mL infusion
(the premix in NS)
Double	norepinephrine (Levophed) 8,000 mcg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 250 mL (32 mcg/mL) infusion
(your mixture in NS)
Remove the order.
Open your Caleb patient’s chart.
Order your trn### norepinephrine orderable.  Confirm that the order name appears as follows for each concentration:
Concentration	Order Name
Standard	norepinephrine in dextrose 5 % (Levophed) 16 mcg/mL infusion
(the premix in D5W)
Double	norepinephrine (Levophed) 8,000 mcg in dextrose 5 % 250 mL (32 mcg/mL) infusion
(your mixture in D5W)
That's it! You're done. Remove the order, close the patient's chart, and log out.
Key Takeaways: IMS for Drips
Configuring IMS for drips is similar to IMS for Mixtures. This section will only cover the differences between the two. For more comprehensive information refer back to Exercise 2 in this chapter or “Configuring Orderable Mapping Records” in the IV Piggybacks chapter.

Orderable Type	Orderable Drip [2]
Concentrations	
Configure the concentrations, concentration names and buttons on the Concentration Options screen.

Concentration options come from the category list in ERX 2610.
Remember that the names of the concentrations (e.g. “Standard” or even “Double”) are just labels. You must configure the discrete concentration for each choice.
OCC	
RX IMS ORDERABLE DRIP

Includes the Concentration field but not any of the mixture-specific sections (such as Base).
Dispensable Mapping	
Same criteria as for IMS for Mixtures, except there is a Concentration column instead the Dose column.

As with IMS for Mixtures, IMS for Drips picks a dispensable by:

Eliminating any dispensables that are not on the central pharmacy med list.
Eliminating any dispensables that do not match the dispensable mapping criteria.
It then works through dispense logic for the patient’s location, choosing the first pharmacy that can dispense one of the acceptable dispensables. If multiple dispensables are available in that pharmacy, it chooses the first one listed in Dispensable Mapping.

If no dispensables are acceptable or available in any pharmacy serving the patient, the system chooses the failsafe dispensable.

 

Reviewing the Chapter
Review Questions

You’ve been asked to create a mixture ERX record for an abciximab infusion. It will be made with ABCIXIMAB 2 MG/ML IV SOLN and 250 mL of SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN at a concentration of 36 mcg/mL.

Fill in the Mixture Setup 2 screenshot below appropriately for this mixture:



Which OCC record is most appropriate for a concentration-based mixture with one available base? (Choose ONE only.)
RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE
RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE
RX SIMPLE MED
This is a trick question; you don’t need to attach an OCC to a concentration-based mixture.
The correct answer is a) RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE, because there's only one base available. 
RX CONCENTRATION DOSED MIXTURE DISPLAYING BASE would be the correct OCC in cases where there are multiple base options.
RX SIMPLE MED would be the correct OCC for a premix medication drip. 

True or False: when you add a choice to the Concentrations category list, you are also defining the specific ratio of medication to base.
False. The choices in the category list are just labels. They MIGHT be named to reflect actual mathematical concentrations, but they might also have generic names such as “Standard” or “Half Strength.” The actual ratio or concentration is configured in the ERX records, on the Mixture Setup 2 screen (for a mixture with only one concentration) or on the Concentration Options screen if multiple concentrations are available.

Are all medication drips concentration‐based mixtures?
No. Some medication drips are premixed IVs (simple ERX records). But all concentration‐based mixtures ARE medication drips.

True or False: a dispensable ERX record must be on the central pharmacy’s med list for IMS to pick it.
True. Even if the dispensable is included in the orderable’s dispensable mapping, the system won’t choose it unless it’s considered available (that is, on the central pharmacy’s medication list).

Study Checklist

Make sure you can define the following key terms:

Medication drip

Titration

Concentration‐based mixture

Concentration Dosed Ingredient

IMS for drips

Orderable Drip

Dispense Interval

Automatic Dispensing

Make sure you can perform the following tasks:

Add choices to the Concentration category list

Configure a concentration‐based mixture

Configure a premix med drip

Configure an Orderable Drip record

Configure dispensable mapping for an orderable drip record

Add a medication drip (and all it’s appropriate records) to the formulary

Add a medication drip (and all it’s appropriate records) to the central pharmacy’s medication list

Cause specific continuous medications to use automatic dispensing

Disable automatic dispensing for specific hospitals, units, or medications

Make sure you fully understand and can explain the following concepts:

What constitutes a medication drip

Why you should not include the volume of a medication ingredient in the total volume of concentration-based mixture

That not all medication drips are mixtures

Why a mixture record must be created in the system

The relationship between an IMS‐for‐drips orderable drip record and its dispensable ERX records

How IMS for Drips picks a product to dispense

9. Day 3 Lab
Introduction
This lab presents you with unguided challenges. They will reinforce and apply what you’ve learned already and will test your understanding of that knowledge. Work through these exercises on your own. Get as far as you can in the time you have. If you get stuck or are unsure of something, ask your instructor for assistance.

Critical	
The lab assumes that you have configured the following records as shown below. If you’ve been following along in class, you have!

When doing this lab at home, configure these records before you start:

Classic >> Rx Admin >> Hospital/Clinic Admin >> your TRN### Hospital >>



Classic >> Rx Admin >> Pharmacy Admin >> your TRN### Central Pharmacy >> Dispensing Information

List the following values in the Supported preparation types field (in any order):

IV Admixture
Compound
Chemo
Part 1: Troubleshooting an IV Piggyback
Beyond the Basics	
Use the blank spaces below each configuration requirement to write down what you plan to do in the system. Research shows that writing out complex plans helps your brain to retain information long-term.

If you view this training companion in Galaxy with the answers visible, the solutions to each problem will appear in those blank spaces.

 

Someone has already configured a trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IV orderable for your trn### hospital. However, it’s not working correctly. You need to fix it!

Dispensable Mapping
First, dispensable mapping has not been done. The TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IV ORDERABLE has been created, but you need to configure Dispensable Mapping.

Log into Classic as your administrator. Configure dispensable mapping to meet these needs:
For patients up to 12 years of age, you prefer to dispense your
TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IV SYRINGE 2.5 MG/ML (NEO/PED). This is a ratio-based mixture.
If the dose is exactly 500 mg, on any patient, you can dispense:
TRN### AZITHROMYCIN 500 MG IV ADD-VANTAGE. This is an ADD-Vantage mixture.
For any dose up to 300 mg, on any patient, you can use
TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IVPB IN 150 ML, a main ingredient mixture.
If the dose is 300 mg or more, you can use
TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IVPB IN 250 ML, another main ingredient mixture.
IMS fails to find an appropriate match, use TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IVPB IN 250 ML.
The dispensables have all been added to your Central Pharmacy Med List and Hospital Formulary (at least, so you‘ve been told; assume that’s the case for now).

Users should not be able to edit the rate or administration duration when using this orderable.

Be sure to click Accept to save your changes and close dispensable mapping!

Classic >> Rx Admin >> Dispensable Mapping Admin >> your TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IV ORDERABLE
.


Test Your Dispensable Mapping (and Find Problems)
Once your dispensable mapping has been configured, do the following. Do NOT try to fix these problems as you go! Identify all the problems first. 

TIP:  As you work, make notes on where you think the problem is coming from: the orderable ERX, one of the override contexts in the orderable ERX, or the dispensable ERX. See chapter 7. IV Piggybacks >> Configuring Orderable Mapping Records >> Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record for guidance! 
 

Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##/train).
Go to Orders for Buffy. Remove any unsigned orders. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider).
Click +New and search for “trn### azith”.
PROBLEM: There should be one result for the azithromycin orderable on the Facility List. There is none.
Add the TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IV ORDERABLE to the TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List with a green dot.

Go to the Database and choose “trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IV.” That’s your orderable.  
CHECK: The Order Name in the Orders sidebar should be “azithromycin (Zithromax) IV syringe”. If it is not, fix your dispensable mapping before going on. If that is still not working, make sure that you did all the preparation steps in the lab introduction. 
Open the Order Composer.
PROBLEM: The Dose field is not required. It should be. Also, the Rate field is appearing under the Dose field. You don’t want it to appear in the Order Composer.
Your TRN### Azith... ORDERABLE does not have an OCC attached. Attach the RX SIMPLE MED Order Composer Configuration to your orderable.

PROBLEM: The Rate is not calculating, and thus doesn't appear in the summary sentence. It should be calculating automatically, based on the Admin Duration time.
In your TRN### Azith... IV Syringe (the dispensable) set Calculate rate given volume and duration to "Yes." 

PROBLEM: There are no dose or frequency buttons. For pediatric patients, you want these dose buttons: 5 mg/kg and 12 mg/kg (neither should be selected by default), and a “q24h” frequency button.
In your ORDERABLE, modify the Pediatric override context to include these buttons.

Enter a dose of 5 mg/kg.
PROBLEM: As you enter the dose, notice that every dosing unit is available. Only mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day should be allowed (for any patient).
In the BASE version of your ORDERABLE record, enter these as the Allowed order units. If you do these in your Pediatric context only, you'll be sad later.

CHECK: The Order Name at the top of the Order Composer still says “IV syringe”. If it changes to an IVPB in 150 or 250 mL, then check your dispensable mapping.
PROBLEM: The Calculated Dose is 60 mL. It should be “59 mL” (the mixture is supposed to be 2.5 mg of azithromycin per 1 mL of mixture, not 2.5 mg of azithromycin/ 1 mL of NS).
The TRN### Azith... IV syringe (the dispensable) record is a ratio-based mixture, but the ratio is wrong.  We need to account for the volume the main ingredient takes up. It should be 2.5 mg of medication to 0.975 mL of base to get the desired ratio. Fix this on the Mixture Setup 2 screen.

PROBLEM: The Order Name does not include the base, or the total volume of the mixture. It should appear as “azithromycin (Zithromax) 147.5 mg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 59 mL IV syringe”.
In your TRN### Azith... IV SYRINGE (the dispensable), there's no IP naming extensions. Use extension 408134921 (which does include the total volume of the mixture) for both the Order Entry and After ordering extensions.

Critical	Do not use this section to check your work! This section is only for finding problems. Continue to the next section to test your work.
Fix Those Problems & Test Your Work (Part 1)
Fix the problems noted above.  TIP: Before you start editing records, you need to determine which record to edit: the orderable ERX, one of the override contexts in the orderable ERX, or the dispensable ERX. See chapter 7. IV Piggybacks >> Configuring Orderable Mapping Records >> Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record for guidance!

When you are done, test your work:

In Hyperspace, open Buffy’s chart. Remove any unsigned orders. 
Place a new order for “trn### azith”.
CHECK: The search window does not open because the orderable is the only match on the Facility List tab.
CHECK: The Order Composer opens automatically because a dose is required (stop sign) and has no defaults.
CHECK: The Rate field is gone.
CHECK: You have dose buttons for 5 mg/kg and 12 mg/kg
CHECK: You have a frequency button for q24h.
Select 5 mg/kg.
CHECK: The Calculated Dose becomes 147.5 mg = 59 mL.
CHECK: The Order Name at the top of the Order Composer is “azithromycin (Zithromax) 147.5 mg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 59 mL IV syringe”
CHECK: The Summary Sentence (the details beneath the order name on the Orders sidebar) should include “at 59 mL/hr” because the rate is calculating automatically.
In the Dose field, click the magnifying glass next to the “mg/kg” unit.
CHECK: The only allowed units are mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day.
Remove the unsigned order. 
If all of those items check out, go on to the next step.

Test on Caleb & Find More Problems
Now let’s test your IV on Caleb.

TIP: As you work, make notes on where you think the problem is coming from: the orderable ERX, one of the override contexts in the orderable ERX, or the dispensable ERX. See chapter 7. IV Piggybacks >> Configuring Orderable Mapping Records >> Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record for guidance!

Still in Hyperspace, go to the Orders activity for your Caleb patient.
Remove any unsigned orders, and reject any order waiting in Verify Orders. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Search for and select your trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IV and open the Order Composer.
In the Dose field, click the magnifying glass next to the “mg”.
CHECK: The only allowed units are mg, mg/kg, and mg/kg/day. If more units are allowed, you configured the allowed units in the wrong place. Fix it now!
Click the 250 mg dose button.
CHECK: The Order Name at the top of the Order Composer changes to indicate 150 mL of base. If not, go fix your Dispensable Mapping.
PROBLEM: The Order Name includes BOTH bases: “azithromycin (Zithromax) 250 mg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 150 mL, dextrose 5 % 150 mL IVPB.” It should only include one (the sodium chloride) by default.
In the TRN### Azith... IVPB 150 ML (dispensable) record, on the Mixture Setup 2 screen, the D5W is blank in the Sel column.  Blank = Always selected.

Click Sign & Verify. Pick an order mode and provider.
PROBLEM: The order is being flagged as Non-Formulary. It should not be flagged.
Your TRN### AZITHROMYCIN IV ORDERABLE record isn't on your TRN### Hospital Formulary.  It should be added.

PROBLEM: Under the “Route: Intravenous” field, you see a Volume (302.5 mL”) and Calc Rate is set to “Yes.” But no Rate or Admin Duration appear.
In the TRN### Azith... IVPB 150 ML (dispensable) mixture, there's a Default Admin Duration set but no Units for duration.  As such, it doesn't actually have a default duration and therefore can't calculate a rate.

PROBLEM: The volume is 302.5 mL, and there are two bases selected (SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN and DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN). HINT: This is the same problem as the Order Name in the previous step.
Again, the Sel column is blank for the D5W, so it is always selected.

Critical	Do not use this section to check your work! This section is only for finding problems. Continue to the next section to test your work.
Fix Those Problems & Test Your Work (Part 2)
Fix the problems noted above. TIP: Before you start editing records, you need to determine which record to edit: the orderable ERX, one of the override contexts in the orderable ERX, or the dispensable ERX. See chapter 7. IV Piggybacks >> Configuring Orderable Mapping Records >> Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record for guidance!

When you are done, test your work:

In Hyperspace, open Caleb's chart. Remove any unsigned orders.
Discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Search for and select your trn### azithromycin IV.
Open the Order Composer.
Click the 250 mg dose button.
CHECK: the Order Name changes to “azithromycin (Zithromax) 250 mg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 150 mL IVPB” (without the D5W).
Click Sign & Verify. Override any medication warnings. Pick an order mode and provider.
CHECK: There is no Non-Formulary flag on the order.
CHECK: In Verify Orders, under the “Route: Intravenous” field, you should see the Admin Duration of “60 Minutes” and the Rate of “152.5 mL/hr.”
Under Products to Dispense, click the link for SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN.
Next to the Product field, click the magnifying glass next to SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN.
CHECK: You should see DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN as an option.
If everything checks out, go on to the next section.

Discover Even More Problems
Let’s test a little bit further!

Still in Hyperspace, return to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Search for and select your trn### azithromycin IV again.
Open the Order Composer and enter a Dose of “400 mg”.
CHECK: The Order Name at the top of the Order Composer now says “azithromycin (Zithromax) 400 mg in sodium chloride 0.9 % 250 mL IVPB”. If not, fix your Dispensable Mapping and then restart this section.
Click Sign & Verify. Override any warnings. Pick an order mode and provider. 
PROBLEM: Your 250 mL IVPB mixture has a dispense location of the 4 SOUTH ADS cabinet. This mixture should not be allowed to come from the ADS cabinet.
You need to add a Prep Type to the TRN### Azith... IVPB 250 ML dispensable mixture.

PROBLEM: Your IVPB mixture has a dispense code of “Unit Dose.” It should be "IVPB Mixture".
The TRN### Azith... IVPB 250 ML mixture dispensable has nothing in the Default Dispense Code field.
(Note: the ORDERABLE has a dispense code of "IVPB Mixture," but the system uses the dispense code of the dispensable, not the orderable.)

Critical	Do not use this section to check your work! This section is only for finding problems. Continue to the next section to test your work.
Fix Those Problems & Test Your Work (Part 3)
Fix the problems noted above. TIP: Before you start editing records, you need to determine which record to edit: the orderable ERX, one of the override contexts in the orderable ERX, or the dispensable ERX. See chapter 7. IV Piggybacks >> Configuring Orderable Mapping Records >> Dispensable Records vs. Orderable Record for guidance!

When you are done, test your work:

In Hyperspace, return to Verify Orders for Caleb and refresh Dispense Details.
If your order is no longer in Verify Orders, place a new order for your trn### azithromycin IV, change the dose to 400 mg, then click Sign & Verify.
CHECK: The Dispensable field shows “trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IVPB in 250 mL”.
CHECK: Dispense location is your central pharmacy.
CHECK: The Dispense Code is “IVPB Mixture.”
If everything checks out, go on to the next section.

Discover One Last Set of Problems
OK, one last set of problems—honest!

Still in Hyperspace, return to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Discontinue any active orders. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Search for and select your trn### azithromycin IV again.
Keep the default values. Click Sign & Verify. Override any warnings. Pick an order mode and provider.
PROBLEM: The Dispensable is showing your “IVPB in 250 mL.” It should have selected your ADD-Vantage mixture.
Your TRN### Central Pharmacy Med List does not have your TRN### Azith... ADD-Vantage mixture on it.  IMS won't select a mixture that isn't on your central pharmacy's med list.

Click the pencil icon next to Clinical Details.
Click the Dispensable drop-down field.
PROBLEM: Your ADD-Vantage mixture is not in the list, even though you added it to your dispense mapping. This is related to the previous problem.
This is the same problem as the previous one; the Dispensable drop-down only includes dispensables that are on your central pharmacy's med list.

Click  to reject this order. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Go back to the Orders activity. Search for “trn### ADD” and go to the Database tab. Select your trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IVPB 500 mg in 250 mL (ADD-Vantage) record.
PROBLEM: The Product Admin Instructions don't indicate that this is an ADD-Vantage mixture. They should! (Hint: Use a SmartText, "RX ADD-VANTAGE".)
Add on the Default Admin Instructions screen of the ADD-Vantage mixture ERX. Use SmartText "RX ADD-VANTAGE" in the Product-Specific Administration Instructions.

Click Sign & Verify. Override any warnings. Pick an order mode and provider.
PROBLEM: The dispense location is your central pharmacy. It should be your ADS; the ingredients are stocked in the ADS in separate pockets. (Hint: you can check your ADD-Vantage ERX to see what the ERX and NDC for the ingredient should be)
The ADS has both the AZITHROMYCIN 500 MG/5ML IV (WET SOLR VIAL) and the SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9% IVPB SOLN ingredients, but the ADD-Vantage bag needs the dry vial ingredient. In the ADS med list, you need to add the AZITHROMYCIN 500 MG IV SOLR, and choose NDC 0409-0144-11.

Click Verify.
Go to the MAR activity. Type the following exactly as shown below (including the slashes; you won’t see anything as you type). This will mimic scanning the ADD-Vantage vial of the azithromycin.
\0409-0144-11\
PROBLEM: You get an error message that there are no administrable orders for this NDC.
The ADD-Vantage mixture is not configured to dispense individual ingredients. In the ADD-Vantage mixture, on Mixture Setup 2, you need to set Dispense components field to "Yes"

Click OK.
Fix Those Problems & Test Your Work (Part 4)
Fix the problems noted above.

When you are done, test your work:

Return to Hyperspace. Go to the Orders activity for Caleb.
Discontinue any active orders for azithromycin. Pick an order mode and provider. 
Click the +New button and search for “trn### azith”.
CHECK: on the Facility List tab, you should ONLY see your trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IV. If you see your ADD-Vantage IV, check the green dots on your central pharmacy med list.
Select your trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IV.
CHECK: The Summary Sentence should indicate that this is an ADD-Vantage bag.
Keep the default values. Click Sign & Verify. Override any warnings. Pick an order mode and provider. 
CHECK: The Dispensable is showing “trn### azithromycin (Zithromax) IVPB 500 mg in 250 mL (ADD-Vantage)”.
CHECK: The Dispense from is your 4 SOUTH ADS cabinet.
CHECK: Under the dispense information section, you see a check mark next to "Individual ingredients"
Under Products to dispense, click the link for AZITHROMYCIN 500 MG IV SOLR.
CHECK: The Package is “1 EA Vial (0409-0144-11)” (the ADD-Vantage vial).
Click the pencil icon next to Dispense Details.
Change the Dispense from field and First doses from field to your TRN### CENTRAL PHARMACY.
CHECK: The Package field for the AZITHROMYCIN 500 MG IV SOLR ingredient should still show “1 Each Vial”. If it is now a stop sign, you still need to fix the NDCs on your central pharmacy med list.
Click Verify.
Go to the MAR activity. Type the following exactly as shown below (including the slashes; you won’t see anything as you type). This will mimic scanning the ADD-Vantage vial of the azithromycin.
\0409-0144-11\
If you see a medication warning, override it.
Accept the peripheral IV line.
CHECK: The administration window for your active order opens. The azithromycin 500 MG SOLR ingredient has a check next to it.
Next type the following exactly as shown below (including the slashes; you won’t see anything as you type). This will mimic scanning the sodium chloride ADD-Vantage container.
\0409-7101-02\
Click Accept for this administration.
If you have time, go on to the next part of the lab.

If You Have Time: Planning & Building an IV Piggyback
First, read all of the details and make a plan. You’ve been asked to configure the records for an aztreonam (Azactam) IV piggyback (an antibiotic). Here are the needs.

Your hospital stocks the following commercially available products for aztreonam. All of the simple ERX records for these products have been configured.
AZTREONAM 1 G/3ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4309185] – a reconstituted wet vial which can be used as an injection, or as an ingredient in mixtures. You stock NDC 0003-2560-16 in your Central Pharmacy.
AZTREONAM 1 G IJ SOLR [9185] – a vial of powder that you use as an ingredient in your Mini-Bag Plus mixture. You stock NDC 0003-2560-16 in your Central Pharmacy and your 4 South Satellite pharmacy.
Your hospital prepares and dispenses the following aztreonam mixtures. You’ll need to create ERX records for each of these (start the names of each with your TRN###):
A 1g Mini-Bag Plus, using the AZTREONAM 1 G IJ SOLR [9185] vial (see above) and the 50 mL Mini-Bag (0338-0551-11) represented by DEXTROSE 5% IVPB SOLN [400515]. You’ll stock this mixture (assembled) in a single drawer of your 4 South ADS cabinet.
A 20 mg/mL pediatric IV syringe, using the AZTREONAM 1 G/3ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4309185] vial (see above) and DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]. The default dose is 30 mg/kg, but users should be able to enter any dose (in units of mg or mg/kg).
A main ingredient mixture using AZTREONAM 1 G/3ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) [4309185] and 50 mL of either SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN [27838] or DEXTROSE 5 % IV SOLN [2364]. D5W is used by default. 500 mg is the most common dose for this mixture, but users should be able to enter any dose of aztreonam (in units of mg, g, or mg/kg).
Regardless of how it’s being dispensed, the most common frequency from an aztreonam IV is Every 8 Hours [200521]. Other common frequencies are Every 6 Hours [200040] and Every 12 Hours [200523]. The only allowed route for any of these mixtures should be “Intravenous.” The Admin Duration should be 30 minutes for all the mixture ERXs you configure. Users can select any dose, in units of mg, g, or mg/kg. There should be two Inpatient Questions, one for bacterial indication (120620) and one for restricted authorizing ID/protocol (132905). It should add infusion rows to the I/O flowsheet.
When users search for “aztreonam” on either the Facility List, they should get only two matches:
aztreonam (Azactam) 1 g/3mL reconstituted vial (the AZTREONAM 1 G/3ML IJ (WET SOLR VIAL) record)
trn### aztreonam (Azactam) IV (which you will need to create)
When users select the aztreonam (Azactam) IV, the dose buttons should change based on the patient:
For adult patients, dose buttons should be 500 mg, 1 g, and 2 g. 1 g should be selected by default.
For pediatric and neonatal patients, there should be one dose button: 30 mg/kg. It should NOT be selected by default.
Depending on the dose and the age of the patient, the system should select the appropriate mixture or simple ERX record to dispense:
For patients up to 14 years old and doses up to 1,000 mg, dispense the pediatric IV syringe mixture.
For doses of exactly 1g, dispense the Mini-Bag Plus mixture.
For any other dose, dispense the main ingredient mixture in 50 mL.
User should NOT be able to edit Admin Duration for this orderable.
Plan Your Build
On the next page, make a diagram representing all of the ERX records needed in this scenario. See the diagram at the beginning of Chapter 7 of your RX405 book for an example.

Hint: There are 9 total ERX records used in this scenario.
Put each record under the correct column: Orderable ERX, Mixture ERX, or Simple ERX.
Draw lines from the Mixture ERX records to their ingredients.
Draw lines from the Orderable ERX(s) to the dispensables. Next to each line, make note of when the system should dispense each one.
Next to each dispensable ERX, write down a number indicating where it should come in the Dispensable Mapping. For example, put #1 next to whichever dispensable the system should consider first.
Put an * next to the ERX record(s) that should get a green dot on your Central Pharmacy Medication List.
Make note of any override contexts you’ll create for any ERX record.
 
 





Build!
Build the following ERX records:

TRN### AZTREONAM IVPB 1 G IN 50 ML D5W MINI-BAG PLUS
TRN### AZTREONAM 20 MG/ML IV SYRINGE (PED)
TRN### AZTREONAM IVPB IN 50 ML D5W
TRN### AZTREONAM IV ORDERABLE
For each one, make sure to meet the specific needs outlined above. Also, be sure that each mixture works and looks appropriate if ordered on its own from the Database tab. In particular, make sure that each mixture:

Has appropriate buttons and defaults for dose, route, frequency, and Admin Duration.
Has appropriate allowed options for the dose units and route.
Has an Order Display Name that differentiates each mixture from the others.
Has an order name (at the top of the Order Composer) that reads appropriately, such as:
aztreonam (Azactam) 1 g in dextrose 5% 50 mL IVPB-MB+
aztreonam (Azactam) 880 mg in dextrose 5 % IV syringe
aztreonam (Azactam) 500 mg in dextrose 5 % 50 mL IVPB
Has an appropriate prep type and dispense code.
Has an appropriate task template.
For the Mini-Bag Plus, make sure the Product Admin Instructions clearly identify it as a Mini-Bag Plus and provide instructions on how to prepare it on the floor (hint: use a SmartText). For the IVPB in 50 mL, make sure there are proper Preparation Instructions (hint: use a different SmartText).

Your IV orderable should appear on the Facility List as “trn### aztreonam (Azactam) IV”.

Add to Med Lists
Add each of the simple ERX, mixture ERX, and orderable ERX records to the appropriate medication lists. (Re-read the scenario above to see which ERX records and NDCs should be on each list.)

Test Your Work!
Once you think you’re all done building and adding meds to the right lists, test you work. This test plan won’t cover every single thing, but it will test that you got the most important parts right.

Log into Hyperspace as your pharmacist (RX##).
Go to the Orders activity for your BUFFY patient. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Search for “aztreonam”
CHECK: You should get these two matches on your Facility List:
aztreonam (Azactam) 1 g/3mL reconstituted vial
trn### aztreonam (Azactam) IV
Select your trn### aztreonam (Azactam) IV. Open the Order Composer.
CHECK: You have a dose button for 30 mg/kg, but it is not selected. If you select it, the dose becomes 880 mg.
CHECK: Intravenous is selected by default and is a button.
CHECK: Every 8 hours is selected by default. You have buttons for q6h, q8h, and q12h.
CHECK: The order name indicates that your IV SYRINGE is being dispensed while the 30 mg/kg dose is selected.
Change the dose to “1 g”.
CHECK: The Product Admin Instructions indicate that your MINI-BAG PLUS is being dispensed.
If not, and the order name indicates that you're dispensing your IV syringe, confirm that you added your Mini-Bag Plus mixture ERX to the TRN### 4 SOUTH ADS med list, and that in the mixture record (on Mixture Setup 2) you indicated that doses and components were locked. 
Change the dose to “1.5 g”
CHECK: The order name becomes “aztreonam (Azactam) 1.5 g in dextrose 5 % 50 mL IVPB”
Cancel this order. Close Buffy’s chart.
Go to the Orders activity for CALEB. Discontinue any active orders (pick an order mode and provider). 
Search for and select your trn### aztreonam (Azactam) IV.
CHECK: You have dose buttons for 500 mg, 1 g, and 2 g. 1 g is selected.
CHECK: You have a section for "Suspected Indication" and one for "Authorizing ID Provider/Protocol"
CHECK: The Product Admin Instructions indicate that your MINI-BAG PLUS is being dispensed.
Click Sign & Verify (If you get any warnings override them). Pick an order mode and provider. 
CHECK: The dispense location for your Mini-Bag Plus is your 4 South ADS cabinet.
CHECK: In the dispense information, there is a check next to Individual ingredients.
CHECK: The Package for the DEXTROSE 5% IVPB SOLN ingredient should be “50 mL Flex Cont.” If you hover over it the ToolTip should indicate its NDC 0338-0551-11.
Appendix A: Starting the Project
Introduction
The best way for you to learn an application is to practice in the system. As you do this, both your knowledge of the system and your comfort increase. After doing general practice based on your per-chapter studies, use the project as a way to self-assess your comprehension.

We strongly recommend that you do this project before attempting the Willow Inpatient Administration Exam. You need an 85% or better to pass the project, but we strongly recommend aiming for 95% to best understand the material.

Where Should I Start?
Read on to learn about key resources to help you complete your project.

How to Request Access to Epic's Cert Environments
Epic's cert environments allow you to complete projects and study. Using the steps below, you can request access to these environments. If you already have access, you'll be able to confirm that access during the request steps.

There might be some additional setup you have to do in order to access a cert environment. For example, you may need to work with your IT team to confirm you have the current version of Citrix installed. For a full overview of this process, view the EA001 Using Epic Access e-learning lesson or review the Welcome to Certification Environments document on Galaxy.

Below are the basic steps to obtain access to a Study and/or Project environment.

Go to the Training Home on the UserWeb.
Epic employees: Go to step 4. You do not need to request these environments.
Under the Certificate Resources section, select Cert Environment Request. 

You can see any environments currently assigned to you.
You can request new Study and/or Project environments.
NOTE: You will only be assigned one environment per version.

Once you submit your request, close your web browser.
Open a new browser tab and go to Epic Access:
Most learners: Go to access.epic.com.
If you selected a country in Europe or the Middle East: Wait 15 minutes; then go to EUaccess.epic.com.
The system takes up to 15 minutes to process access requests for Europe or the Middle East.
Log in, using the same credentials you use to log in to the UserWeb.
If prompted, provide your 6-digit authentication code. (If you haven't configured multi-factor authentication, click the Learn More link.)
You might be prompted to log in again; use the same credentials you use for the UserWeb.
You have completed this step when the site displays "Home" and "Apps" at the top of the page.
Consider using the Check Your Setup option before you start using cert environments. This will confirm if your device meets all the requirements.
Click the icon to launch the corresponding application.
Use Study icons for self-study or after-class practice.
Use Project icons for projects or when explicitly told to use Project environments.
Use Virtual Training icons only during virtual classes, or when explicitly told to use them.
If your training materials instruct you to find an icon you don't see, use the search field to find it. To add the icon to the Home screen, click the star in the icon.
Critical	
Technical Difficulties?

If you're experiencing technical difficulties, such as your computer asking you, "How do you want to open this file?" when you click an icon, see this article on Galaxy. If you still experience issues or have questions on training materials (including training user IDs and passwords), use the email address listed at the beginning of this training companion.

Generate Your Starting Records
Critical	
Before you generate your starting records…

Following the steps below will generate some records for you, but you will also create records throughout the project. You should name all of these records with your initials, so they are easier to identify.

Use 3 initials to avoid conflicts with other trainees. If you don’t have a middle initial, make one up. Do NOT use numbers as your initials.

In order to complete your project, you need the project specification and a hospital, unit, virtual department representing your pharmacy, and three patients admitted in your unit. Complete the following steps to have the system create these records for you automatically. You will also be emailed the project specification after you complete these steps:

Most Epic Customers, Consultants, and Epic staff:
Go to access.epic.com.
Go on to step 3.
If you are working from Europe or the Middle East:
Go to euaccess.epic.com.
Go on to step 3.
Log in, using the same credentials you use to log in to the UserWeb.
If prompted, provide your 6-digit authentication code. (If you haven't configured multi-factor authentication, click the Learn More link.)
You might be prompted to log in again; use the same credentials you use for the UserWeb.
Click the Project <version> Training Magic icon.
If asked to sign in, enter your UserWeb username and password (this is the same login information as you use for access.epic.com).
In the Application field, choose “Willow.”
In the Project field, choose “BEGIN Willow IP Admin Project”
If you cannot find this Project in the list of choices, then we have switched to a newer version and you should request access to that newer version at training.epic.com >> Certification Environment Request.
In the Initials field, enter the three letters you will use as a prefix for your project. (Enter any 3 letters, they don’t have to be your initials.)
If you receive a notification that the initials you entered have already been used by another trainee, please choose a different set of initials. 
Click Next.
Check your email. (If you don’t see it within a few minutes, check your junk mail folder.) The project specifications are linked in that email. If you'd like, print out the project specification.
Also in the e-mail, you see something like the below screenshot. Add the IDs to the Project Worksheet included in the project specification.

What just happened? The system created the following records for you:

A hospital (“XYZ Hospital”)
A virtual Department (DEP) record representing your hospital’s central pharmacy (“XYZ PHARMACY”).
A nursing unit (“XYZ ICU”) with two rooms (“XYZ-101” and “XYZ-123”) and three test patients:
Jack Xyz (a 9-year-old male admitted to your ICU, in room 101).
Jill Xyz (a 30-year-old female admitted to your ICU, in room 123).
Jeb Xyz (an 80-year-old male admitted to your ICU, in room 123).
Throughout the rest of the project, you’ll need to edit or otherwise make use of these records. You may now begin your project.

If you have questions about these steps or completing the project, e-mail WillowTrainingSubmission@epic.com.

Critical	
Offshore Consultants

Offshore consultants who only have access to Galaxy from the cert environments will be unable to use the link in the setup email to access the project instructions. Follow the steps in the Projects section of Epic's Training Guide - Consultant for steps on how to access project instructions.

Send Helpful Details in Your Email
The email address above sends emails to a queue which is monitored by a member of the application's training team each day, meaning it is a more efficient way to get your questions answered compared to trying to find a single person to email. When sending an email, it is helpful if you can provide some additional information right away:

What companion, chapter, and page(s) you are referencing
If you are asking about something you see in the system, include the following:
The name of the environment you are working in (for example: Project Feb, Study Feb D)
Companion or task name, section header, page number, and step
The User ID you are logged in as
The patient name or MRN, if applicable
Any configuration you did that the trainer may need to look up
What troubleshooting you previously tried that didn't give you the intended results
Other Email Contacts
Below are a few other common resources you may need. When in doubt, you can always email the training team and a trainer will help you find the right support.

I have questions about...	Who should I contact?
Logging into the UserWeb	UserWebSupport@epic.com
Troubleshooting issues when launching a cert environment or a Virtual Training environment	Preparing for a virtual class? Be sure to review How to Prepare For Virtual Training first. Still having issues? Contact your trainers. If you already received a pre-class email you can reply to that email. Otherwise, consult the email address at the beginning of these training materials.
Accessing or viewing e-learning lessons	E-LearningSubmissions@epic.com
Registering for class	Registrations@epic.com
Signing up for a proctored exam or finding a proctor	Exams@epic.com
Requesting an exam review for a proctored exam	Reply to your exam score email
Understanding Continuing Epic Education requirements (Application Essentials and New Version Training)	ContinuingEpicEducation@epic.com
Understanding how to best build at my organization	Your Epic representative(s)
Principal Trainer (TED) certificates	TEDcerts@epic.com
Epic's Training Guide
Epic has Training Guides that are updated regularly with training information:

Epic's Training Guide - Epic Community Member
Epic's Training Guide - Consultant
These documents contain information on:

The training statuses available and their score and attendance requirements.
The types of assessments used in training, including projects and exams.
Maintaining your training certificate.
Good Install and Honor Roll program requirements (Epic Community Member guide only).
EpicU
EpicU logs your training track progress and provides links to training materials. To access your training track via EpicU, go to the Training Home. Training tracks are listed in the section Your In-Progress Certificates. When you click on the link for one of your training tracks, the track opens in EpicU.

Here is an example of a training track in EpicU.


Each checkmark indicates you’ve completed a requirement.
The shapes with dotted lines are recommended learnings/assessments.
You can click on each requirement in the diagram to jump to more details in the track below.
In the details below the diagram, you’ll find links to materials, dates to upcoming classes, and buttons to help you complete tasks and mark requirements as complete.
Note: Once you complete your training track, it will not immediately disappear from Your In-Progress Certificates. However, it will appear in the Your Completed Certificates and Badges section of the Training Home.

Beyond the Basics	If you’ve already earned the "Proficient Self-Study" status for your training track, your requirements might not be accurate in EpicU. Contact your trainers if you have questions about requirements.
Appendix B: Sample Test
About the Sample Exam
Structure of the Exam

The Willow Inpatient Administration exam covers material presented in:

RX305 Willow Inpatient Administration I
RX405 Willow Inpatient Administration II
The exam is open-notes, open-book, and open-system. Most of the questions will assess your understanding of the system and your ability to determine cause and effect, rather than your ability to look up a particular piece of information. Also, there is a 2 hour time limit. You won’t be able to look up everything.

The exam consists of 50 points, spread out over about 32 questions. Each question can (and often will) have multiple points. The percentage of points on each topic category is indicated below.

Topics	Points (% of total) on exam
Standard Pharmacy Setup	8 points (16%)
Dispense Logic & ADS Setup	5 points (10%)
Charging	3 points (6%)
Panels	2 points (4%)
General Medication Build	8 points (16%)
Solid Form Medications	7 points (14%)
Oral Liquids & Injections	6 points (12%)
IV Fluids, Piggybacks, Drips	11 points (22%)
Totals	50 points (100%)
 

Types of Questions

The exam consists of true/false questions and multiple choice questions (both single-response and multiple-response).

On multiple-response questions, partial credit is possible and there will always be more than one correct answer.

 

How to Use the Sample Exam

Take the sample exam when you believe that you are ready to take the real exam. You should have completed all homework assignments, completed and passed your Willow Inpatient Administration project, and have spent time studying and practicing exercises.

When you take the exam, treat it as a real exam:

Set a two-hour time-limit for yourself.
Shut off your email and phone.
Try to sequester yourself from distractions.
Have your Epic practice environment up and running, with your class info sheet handy for logging in.
Have your training companions and notes easily accessible.
Take the exam. Double-check your work. Stop when your two-hour time limit is over. Review the linked answer key once you submit to see how you did. An 80% is a passing grade if you are a customer or consultant. Review the explanations for each answer to make sure that you actually understand each question and the concepts they cover.

 

Accessing the Sample Exam

To access the sample exam:

Go to your training track (https://training.epic.com/ >> Your In-Progress Certificates >> Willow Inpatient track).
Find the section for RX305/RX405: Sample Exam (Recommended).
Click Take Assessment. 
 
Epic employees:  To find your sample exam:

Go to Brainbow.
In the search field, look for "Willow Inpatient Sample Exam".
Select the exam.
Choose the appropriate version.
Follow the link from there. 
 

Answer Key

An answer key will be emailed to you after submitting the sample exam. It will also appear as a link on your screen after submitting.

 

Exam Prep Session

50 points. 2 hours. 2 books! How to prepare? In this OPTIONAL session, we’ll discuss strategies to prepare for the Willow Inpatient Administration Exam and highlight topics you should focus on while studying. We’ll present “mock” questions similar to those on the exam and then discuss common errors and points of confusion.

To see information about an online exam preparation session:

Go to your training track (https://training.epic.com/ >> Your In-Progress Certificates >> Willow Inpatient track).
Find the section for RX500w: Exam Prep (Optional).
Register for a session by adding it to your cart and following the prompts.
 
Epic staff: to register, search Brainbow for "RX500w". Select an upcoming offering and register. 

Appendix C: Advance Your Learning
Introduction
This appendix highlights additional resources outside of Willow Inpatient training to help you be more efficient, get more information about an area you specialize in, or just show off to your Willow friends.

You are not required to complete this section, but we recommend that you take 15 minutes to skim through it and see what else you might like to learn.

Critical	These topics are NOT included on the Willow Inpatient Administration project or exam. If you want to know more about any of these topics, use the included links to Galaxy or check with your Epic representative.
Get More Knowledge
Earn Badges!
Badges are add-on accreditations to supplement your learning. You can earn badges without returning to Epic. Your certification or accreditation serves as a pre-requisite for badges. Each badge has different curriculum requirements, which may include any or all of the following:

Self-study material
Independent exercises
Virtual class
Project(s)
Self-assessment(s)
Exam(s)
If a badge requires a virtual class, you’ll need to register for that class and your organization will be charged for it. Otherwise, there are no charges associated with pursuing a badge. Get more basic information in Badges! An Overview in Galaxy.

The following badges are particularly relevant to Willow analysts. You can read all about them by searching for the Badge’s Roadmap in Galaxy, but here are a few highlights to whet your appetite.

Beyond the Basics	
The Gold Stars Program aims to help you achieve as much as possible with your EMR. Find the Gold Stars Program Overview in Galaxy. Drawn from the experience of your industry peers and Epic staff, Gold Stars are assigned to tiers of increasing complexity to provide you with:

A scorecard of how effectively you’re using the system today
A roadmap for success, outlining our recommendations for achieving specific goals
Many of the badges below relate to certain Gold Stars, which will be highlighted for you in each section.

Alternatives Badge (CLN2230)
Learn how to point your end-users in the right direction by:

Enabling automatic alternatives
Creating drug-specific alternatives for therapeutic substitutions and shortages
Using BPAs to enhance and restrict alternatives
The curriculum is self-study with exercises, a self-assessment, and a project. This badge will help prepare you to achieve this Gold Star:

Specific Alternatives for Common Non-Formulary Meds (Tier 3)
To find the materials for the Alternatives Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "CLN2230."

BestPractice Advisory Badge – Basics (CLN2210v)
BestPractice Advisories, or BPAs, serve as reminders or warnings to clinicians during their workflows. Advisories can appear based on specific patient, provider, and facility criteria you define. For example, your organization might want to create a BPA that appears when a patient has a history of myocardial infarction to suggest an order for aspirin. The BPA Basics Badge gives you hands-on practice with:

Determining the audience and timing of BPAs
Creating criteria
Expanding criteria with CER rules and custom properties
Using complex logic
Suggesting orders via BPAs
Allowing users to dismiss BPAs
The curriculum includes self-study exercises, a virtual class, a project, and an exam. This badge will help prepare you to achieve these Gold Stars:

Interventions Driven by BPAs (Tier 3)
Decision Support for Chronic Disease Registries (Tier 3)
To find the materials for the BPA - Basics Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "CLN2210v."

BestPractice Advisory Badge – Advanced (CLN2215v)
Once you’ve completed the BPA Basics badge, find out how flexible and active BPAs can be! With this badge you learn to setup BPAs that:

Intrude on workflows and demand a clinician’s response
Fire in the background and send In Basket messages
Suggest (or automatically add) teaching points, questionnaires, FYI flags, care plans, and more!
Add images, hyperlinks, and rich text formatting to your BPAs
Trigger after a delay or in response to another BPA
The curriculum includes self-study exercises, a virtual class, a self-assessment, and a project. This badge will help prepare you to achieve these Gold Stars:

Care Plans (Tier 2)
Allergy contraindications (Tier 3)
Pharmacist Patient Education Documentation (Tier 9)
To find the materials for the BPA - Advanced Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "CLN2215v."

Core Analyst Badge
The Core Analyst Badge is a self-study badge designed for any analyst/builder from any application who has just completed their first train track. With this badge, you will learn about the following:

Multiple techniques to find data in Epic
Recommendations and tools to manage the records your application uses
Recommendations and techniques to gain a deeper understanding of your users' needs and the usability of their tools
Many of the badge exercises build on what you learned in training, but they require you to do some research on your own. If needed, the lessons will provide additional documentation and links to help with your research. Learning how to find your way around the UserWeb and Galaxy is vital to your role.

To find more information about the Core Analyst Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "GEN3000i."

E-Prescribing Badge (GEN2200v)
Epic can interface with e-prescribing networks (such as Sure Scripts) to transmit prescription information to and from pharmacies, prescribers, and pharmacy benefit managers (PBMs). Learn the setup and workflows for:

Sending prescriptions and refill requests to non-Epic pharmacies
Eligibility queries, allowing you to download patient prescription benefits
Downloading and reconciling medication dispense histories, to get a more accurate list of a patient’s home meds
Checking whether an outpatient prescription is covered by a patient’s insurance, and directing providers to a covered alternative if it’s not
Electronic prior authorization for really expensive medications
E-prescribing of controlled medications
The curriculum includes self-study, a virtual class, and an exam. This badge will help prepare you to achieve these Gold Stars:

E-prescribing (Tier 1)
Outside immunizations and medications (Tier 4)
Electronic prior authorizations (Tier 9)
To find the materials for the E-Prescribing Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "CLN2200v."

Medication-Focused Order Sets Badge (RX2000)
Pharmacist builders are a perfect candidates to help customize Order Sets to meet the needs of clinicians. In this badge learn to:

Create groups of medication orders to be added to order sets
Nest groups of order within other groups to create branching in order sets
Restrict groups of order to appear in order sets only under certain conditions
The curriculum includes self-study, a self-assessment, a virtual class, a project, and an exam.

To find the materials for the Medication-Focused Order Sets Badge, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "RX2000."

Medication Warnings Knowledge Track
You want to show medication warnings to clinicians, but avoid alert fatigue. Learn how to make that happen in this knowledge track, which includes:

Steps for ongoing optimization
How to hide unnecessary med warnings
Options to give the end-user more control
What to do when the usual process still isn’t enough
The curriculum includes self-study and a self-assessment (this is the big difference from the badges, and can be taken as many times as needed). This knowledge track will help prepare you to achieve these Gold Stars:

Critical Dose Warnings (Tier 1)
Medication Interaction Checking (Tier 1)
Optimized Medication Interaction Warnings (Tier 5)
Cumulative Dose Warnings (Tier 5)
Clinician-Filtered Medication Warnings (Tier 6)
To find the materials for the Medication Warnings Knowledge Track, go to the Course Catalog. Use the search bar to search for "Medication Warnings".

Additional Materials – Make an Impact
Willow Tips and Tricks UserWeb Thread
Subscribe to the Willow Tips and Tricks UserWeb thread by clicking the star icon to receive regular updates on troubleshooting and tools!

Clinical Programs for Willow
If you’d love to implement some changes but find planning, getting support, configuring, and educating to be time-consuming, check out Clinical Programs. Organizations that have successfully planned and implemented a program that made a difference are sharing their details with you, including:

How it works
The time investment required
Planning steps, including critical stakeholders to involve early on
Build steps, from start to finish to testing
Training recommendations
Reporting options to measure the impact
While there are many Clinical Programs available, here are some that have allowed the Willow team to make a significant impact. You can find them on Galaxy by searching for Pharmacy Clinical and Financial Programs.

Epic Research
Epic Research is a public online journal that posts reports based on EHR data. This site is designed for rapid sharing of knowledge with researchers, healthcare professionals, and learners to help solve medical problems.

Learn about Scoring Systems
Scoring systems can increase the efficacy of your rounding pharmacists, but they’re tough to build. To get started with the basics, check out the Pharmacy Scoring Systems Setup and Support Guide in Galaxy. You’ll get insight into the existing systems like Daily Monitoring and Transitions of Care, and a few options for configuration.

If you’re looking for more in-depth coverage, try the Patient Acuity Scoring Setup and Support Guide. It describes some bells and whistles, like how to build CER rules that make the scoring systems more effective.

And keep in mind that the BPA badges include rule build, so that’s a great way to get some experience before tackling patient scoring systems.

For experienced pharmacists, check out RX150 Inpatient Pharmacist Clinical Tools Builder, which includes Scoring System build, along with many other clinical tools.

Learn about CER Rules
Rules can evaluate discrete pieces of information about records. For example, you can use rules to evaluate patient records in Dispensable Mapping to automatically select a mixture to dispense that is made using a base that is appropriate for that patient. You can also create new override contexts using rules. Rules are built in the CER master file. To learn more about CER rules, go to weLearning.epic.com and watch GEN640 Making CER Rules. Also, see the Rule Editor Setup and Support Guide in Galaxy.

Learn How to Troubleshoot
Make the Most Out of the Order Hx Report
Let’s take a closer look at a print group that can help you troubleshoot information for a specific order. Print group 49063 - RX ORDER TROUBLESHOOTING INFORMATION appears in the report on the bottom half of the screen in Order Hx. To view this print group for a specific order, go to the Medications activity, select the medication, and then click Order Hx. Scroll down to find the section titled “Troubleshooting Information for Order…” This print group summarizes:

Where did this order come from?
Includes Protocol/SmartSet (PRL), Preference List (LPF), Order Template (OTL), and IMS details.
What Decision Support occurred for this order?
Include Alternatives (LMA), BestPractice Advisory (LGL), and Medication Warning (ALT) details.
What happened after ordering?
Includes Department (DEP), Pharmacy (PHR), Medication list (EFY), and Cart (CRT) details.
If you review this print group in Classic, you can jump directly from the print group to some of the trace tools described below, as well as open pertinent records.



In addition, print group 49004 - RX ORDER ACTION COMPONENT SUMMARY includes links to ERX admin, NDC admin, Charge Mapping, and Charge Tables.



Want to find out even more? Go to Galaxy and search for “PharmAC16”. You’ll find handouts and a recording of Willow TS Tips and Tricks. Information about this report is at the beginning of the presentation, along with lots of other great information.
 

BPA Trace
How does it help me?
While you are building a BPA record, you can detect errors early by using the “Test” button in the BPA record itself. This allows you to predict how a BPA will behave. (See the BestPractice Setup and Support Guide for more information.)

If a BPA is still causing some issues after it is in use, the BPA Trace tool gives you a debug window pop up any time a BPA could potentially fire. You’ll also see a debug button on every BPA that does fire, so you can review the conditions that caused it to appear.

How do I find it?
In an environment that is NOT your PRD environment:

Go to Hyperspace >> Epic button >> Help >> About Hyperspace, and note the Workstation ID.
Go to Text >> Chronicles >> LWS >> Enter Data >> Edit Workstation, and open the record you noted.
Page down once and set the BPA Troubleshooting mode field to “On”.
Note this appears to everyone logging in to this workstation. If you enable it in a virtual workstation, like CLISUP, everyone logging in to the environment sees it.
Do NOT use this tool in the PRD environment.
Log in to Hyperspace or Classic at the workstation, and begin testing. Don’t forget to turn the feature off when you’re done! In fact, you can leave the Text session open and disable the feature immediately after you get the pop-up.

For more information (and screenshots), see Enable BPA Troubleshooting Mode for More Advanced Troubleshooting in the BestPractice Advisory Setup and Support Guide.

 

Charge Trace
How does it help me?
View the step-by-step logic the system goes through to calculate the charge for an order. You’ll see everything from the package and cost, to rounding factors and equations.

One caveat: you’ll see trace information based on current build – not on historical build. Using this tool on old charges shows you how the charging would behave now, but not necessarily at the time the charge was triggered.

How do I find it?
Hyperspace or Classic >> Order Hx >> Troubleshooting >> Charge Trace.

Be sure to select an action that has triggered a charge (or a charge error)!
 
Chronicles Searches
You can perform an ad hoc search in Chronicles to find records that contain values for specific items. For example, you may need compile a list of medications that were dispensed from a specific pharmacy over a specific period of time. A Chronicles search can help you find those orders. Because Chronicles searches are very performance-intensive, you should not run these reports on large data sets (like the entire ORD or EPT master files) or in your PRD environment.

For step-by-step instructions on performing searches, find COG2030v Cogito SQL companion on Galaxy, and review the The Ad Hoc search section.

A couple of weLearning lessons exist, as well. Ad hoc searches are covered in TEC610, and creating subsets and reports are covered in TEC611.

If you really want to become a pro, check out CHR200 Chronicles Install Utilities. This curriculum requires class time, but you can find the training companion in Galaxy.
 

Creatinine Clearance Trace
How does it help me?
Sometimes it can be tough to figure out how a CrCl was calculated for a particular patient, especially if you don’t know the values and formulas used in the calculation. The CrCl trace utility takes out the guesswork by displaying all of the factors that go into the calculation for a specific patient.

How do I find it?
Go to Text >> Clinical Administration >> Management Options >> Other System Module >> Willow >> Inpatient >> Troubleshooting >> Creatinine Clearance Trace.

For guidance on how to use it, check out the Creatinine Clearance Trace article in Galaxy.

Dispense Trace
How does it help me?
Figure out why an order is dispensing from a certain dispense location without having to dig through a bunch of records. Dispense Trace shows all of the logic the system followed to select the dispense location.

Similar to Charge Trace, this tool shows you information based on build at the time you are testing, not necessarily at the time the dispense occurred.

How do I find it?
In Hyperspace or Classic >> Order Hx >> Troubleshooting >> Dispense Trace.

In Text >> Clinical Administration >> Management Options >> Other System Modules >> Willow >> Troubleshooting >> Dispense Trace.

 

IMS Trace – in Hyperspace!
How does it help me?
There are a lot of factors that go into IMS, so when it’s not working it can be tough to figure out what went wrong. This utility helps with troubleshooting IMS for solids because it shows exactly what the system is considering when it is trying to IMS between products.

How do I find it?
You can find IMS trace information in Order Hx (in either Hyperspace or Classic) with print group 49063 – Rx Order Troubleshooting Information (see above section on the updated Order Hx report for more information). Just click the “Jump to IMS Trace” link.

This utility is also available in Text >> Willow >> Inpatient >> Troubleshooting >> IMS Trace Utility.

 

Medication Interactions Trace
How does it help me?
Help both end-users and project team members figure out exactly why specific medication warnings are appearing (or not appearing). With this utility enabled, a new tab appears in the Med Warnings window to help troubleshoot drug/allergy, drug/drug, and duplicate therapy warnings.

How do I find it?
In Hyperspace or Classic >> Epic button >> Tools >> Patient Care Tools >> Show Medication Interaction Trace.

For more information, check out the Medication Warnings Setup and Support Guide in Galaxy, and read the Willow Tips and Tricks: Medication Interaction Trace UserWeb post.
 

Record Viewer in Hyperspace
How does it help me?
Record Viewer in Classic allows you to access and view a record in its entirety. For example, you may need to troubleshoot an issue with an ERX record. Instead of looking at the order composer or finding the record in Clinical Administration and navigating through a zillion pages, you can view the entire record in Hyperspace. You can jump to items or search for items and values using Ctrl + F.

How do I find it?
In Classic, logged in as an administrator: Main toolbar >> Record Viewer. Then enter the INI (master file initials) and the record name or number. If there is more than one contact, keep in mind that the most current version is the one in use.

For more information, go to weLearning.epic.com and watch lesson TEC605B Hyperspace Record Viewer.  

Record Viewer in Text: EAVIEWID
How does it help me?
EAVIEWID displays the values of all items within a record or set of records, plus other information about how the data is structured. There are lots of applications for this tool. To name a few:

Find raw data stored within Chronicles records.
View multiple contacts at once. You can’t do that in Hyperspace!
View only certain items, instead of all; for example, instruct EAVIEWID to show you only items related to EFQ in an ERX record.
See hidden records. Did you hide an NDC by accident? You can still view it here.
If you haven’t used it before, go to weLearning.epic.com and watch lesson TEC605A EAVIEWID.

How do I find it?
Record Viewer is also accessible through Text >> Clinical Administration >> Troubleshooting Utilities >> View Record or View Record (include Hidden).

Tip: There are many additional tools in the Troubleshooting Utilities menu. The Willow Utilities and Reporting Tools Setup and Support Guide in Galaxy has the scoop.
 

Related Information Form
How does it help me?
Did you know there is a place to see all of the build within a hospital and quickly spot any missing details? The Related Information in a Hospital (EAF) record is a troubleshooting master blaster. You’ll find:

Every pharmacy and its med list, or highlighting if the med list is missing
Every cart serving each pharmacy, with a readable cart schedule
Which cart groups are assigned to which carts
Every unit and care area in the hospital and the rooms assigned to them
Which units or care areas are not included in dispense logic
And basically ALL THE THINGS
The Related Information in the Hospital record is the most comprehensive, but you’ll find Related Information in many other records, too.

How do I find it?
Open a record in Classic (Main Toolbar >> Rx Admin >> pick an option, such as Hospital/Clinic Admin or Medication Admin). Go to the Related Information form on the tree at the left.

Check with your Willow TS if you want some extra tips about working with the Related Information form.
 

Beyond the Basics	Find more guidance for many of these tools in the Willow Inpatient Utilities and Reporting Tools document in Galaxy. You’ll also find links to lots of great resources from the Willow Inpatient Analyst Toolkit in Galaxy.
Mastering Medication Loads
You must perform regular updates of the medication data in your system by importing files supplied by your third-party medication data vendor. This process varies depending on which vendor your organization uses, but Epic recommends the following workflow regardless of your data vendor:

Load medication data.
Review and apply changes.
Perform post-load maintenance and system validation.
Move changes to TST.
Move changes to PRD.
For more information on each of these steps and guide to medication loads based on your data vendor, check out the Medication Data Loads Setup and Support Guide.

This section includes tools that will help you to streamline the process of completing medication loads.

Beyond the Basics	The tools in this section are not only for medication loads! They can also come in handy while managing new inventory or working with splitting ERX records, wrapping ERX records, and creating orderables. As always, your Epic TS is a great resource for tips on maximizing these tools!
Using the Medication Load Checklist
The Medication Load Checklist is a tool that was designed to help you process med loads more consistently and efficiently, by documenting steps in the system.

The Checklist has all of the required steps in order, so you can track progress, document how you handle issues (like ERX splits and merges, or NDC changes), create Med Replacer tasks, and more.

In addition, the Med Load Checklist is configurable. Add the steps you typically take before or during the med load to the checklist and track it all in one place.

Security
Users need EpicCare security point 368 – Medication Load Checklist to have full access to create and take action using the Checklist. Read-only access is granted with EpicCare security point 369 – Medication Load Checklist –View Only

Create a Checklist
The system automatically creates a Data Load (DLD) record when you start loading data from your vendor in Text. Access the new record in the Medication Load Checklist activity in Classic.

However, if you add your own pre-load steps, you should create a new Checklist manually in Classic and link it when you start the med load in Text.

Path: Classic >> search (Ctrl+Space) >> Medication Load Checklist

Steps of the Checklist
There are four sections in the Checklist:

Perform Medication Load
Post-Load Maintenance
Validate System Build
Migrate Medication Load Data
Each section contains steps to complete and most must be completed in order before you can continue to the next step. Some steps are completed automatically by the system, like the very first step under Perform Medication Load, Load and Process Data.



Medication Load Checklist: After the third-party data has been loaded

Send Data to Other Environments
Data Courier is a tool that transfers data from one environment to another. If you use Data Courier, you can send the Medication Load Checklist and report data to other environments directly from the Checklist itself. The Summary information is retained, so users can see what has been completed and any comments that were entered.

Beyond the Basics	
There is some required setup to use Data Courier with your Med Load Checklist. If you are interested, find it (and more details about everything you have read so far) here:

Medication Data Loads Setup and Support Guide >> your medication data vendor >> Track Your Progress with the Medication Load Checklist
Sync Medication Lists
When you make NDC changes to the Central Pharmacy Med List, you often want those changes to be reflected in many, many other places—like Floor Stock or Satellite Pharmacy med lists. Making those changes manually or via import is challenging. Enter the Sync Medication Lists utility.

There are a couple of key things to keep in mind with this utility:

An ERX record can’t be added to the target med list by the utility.
The NDC for a specific size package can be updated by the utility, but if a package size is not already selected on the target med list, it can’t be selected by the utility.
The exception is when an ERX is on the target list with no packages selected; then the utility will add all from the source list.
Extra NDCs on the target med list will be removed by the utility.
You can find a good description of the Sync Medication Lists utility in the Willow Inpatient Utilities and Reporting Tools Setup and Support Guide. If you’re having trouble working with this utility, don’t be afraid to check in with your Epic TS.

Medication Replacer
So you know how you can’t add an ERX to a target med list with the Sync Med Lists utility (see above!)? Well, with the Medication Replacer, you can remove or swap an ERX record for another in a wide variety of places. Use this tool before you sync!

Learn the basics in the Medication Data Loads Setup and Support Guide.

Here are a few additional uses for this tool:

Figure out which med lists have an ERX on the list (without removing or replacing it)
Replace a med with itself- especially useful when you have made configuration updates to the ERX record
Easiest way to find it? Classic >> search (Ctrl+Space) >> Medication Replacer.

Validate Custom Medication Records
When you create a custom medication record, you copy details from the proxy medication to make sure reporting will include your custom medications. You’ll most often add pharmaceutical class and subclass, therapeutic class, DEA (Drug Enforcement Administration) codes, and whether or not the medication is controlled.

This utility allows you to generate a report to find custom medications that might need to be updated. Once you review the report and make any updates, you can use it as an input file so the utility can update the records for you.

To find it: Text >> Clinical Administration >> Meds, Allergens, Imm, etc. >> Import Meds Data >> Post-Load Medication Maintenance >> Validate Custom Medication Records.

For more information, see the Validate Custom Medications section of the Medication Data Loads Setup and Support Guide.

NDC Replacer
Use the NDC Replacement Utility to quickly replace NDC records that have been marked as inactive/deleted with other, active NDC records. You can replace a group of NDCs at once instead of having to manually update all the records affected by the replaced NDC individually.

One very important detail to understand about this tool: using the NDC Replacer swaps out the NDC everywhere. Every. Where. You can’t narrow the scope, so use it carefully.

For more information on the NDC Replacer, check out the Willow Inpatient Utilities and Reporting Tools Setup and Support Guide.

Beyond the Basics	
The Medication Data Loads Setup and Support Guide includes the topics you’ve read about here and a couple others you might find interesting:

BPAs and Med Groupers affected by the Med Load
Replacing GPIs in custom records (for Medi-Span)
Medication Configuration: Advanced Topics
Injections and Oral Liquids: Variations from the Norm
Dosing Units for Commercial Compounds
There are commercially available liquid medications with multiple active ingredients. For the most part, these medications are configured the same as other liquid medications. The primary difference is how they are dosed.

Configure liquids with multiple active ingredients to be dosed by volume.

Example	Guaifenesin AC is a cough syrup that contains 100 mg of guaifenesin (an expectorant) and 10 mg of codeine (a pain med) in every 5 mL of liquid. Because a dose of “20 mg” could conceivably refer to either the guaifenesin or the codeine, the medication is primarily dosed in mL.
Clinicians might want to dose based on a particular ingredient. To avoid ambiguity, Epic recommends:

Create a custom drug-specific unit such as “mg of codeine.”
Add it to category list ECT 9010.
Beyond the Basics	Complex units such as “mg/kg of codeine” require additional configuration to calculate properly. Work with your Epic representative.
Allow the custom order unit in the appropriate records.
Add custom order units in the Rx Unit Equivalence screen.


 

Morphine Equivalency for Opioids
Epic can calculate Morphine Equivalent Daily Dose (MEDD) opioid medications. This information can be displayed in reports including print group-based reports to help providers make inpatient medication ordering decisions.

Example	Tylenol #3 is a medication that combines acetaminophen and codeine for use as a pain reliever. Because codeine is an opioid that is harmful in high doses or for prolonged use, acetaminophen is used to increase its effectiveness.
Providers need to understand how much opioid ingredient patients have been receiving before ordering additional opioid medications. To make this easier, Epic converts the amount of active, opioid ingredient into a common unit to display for providers in the Summary activity. That unit is MEDD.



To ensure that Epic calculates the amount of MEDD correctly for combination medications, add information on the Rx Unit Equivalence screen to indicate how much opioid ingredient is in the medication.



Epic uses information set in Pharmacy System Definitions to convert the amount of opioid in a medication to an amount of MEDD. This conversion is dependent on the type of opioid.



Dosing Units for Reconstituted Products
Reconstituted solutions and suspensions are manufactured and distributed as dry powders.

Pharmacies reconstitute them as needed, injecting a small amount of diluent (usually sterile water or normal saline) into the vial.
Can be administered directly or further diluted in an IV piggyback or drip.
Are not “mixtures” in Epic; pharmacies do “mix” them, but they reconstitute an entire vial at a time. The reconstituted vial is potentially the source of multiple doses for multiple patients.
Each vial size of a reconstituted liquid contains a different amount of powdered drug. Since the vials are not in liquid form when manufactured, the third-party vendors treat each size vial as a different strength of product. Therefore, each vial size is represented by a different simple ERX record.

Example	CeFAZolin (Ancef) is an antibiotic. It’s manufactured as a powder and distributed in a number of different-sized vials for reconstitution. The smallest vials are 500 mg, but there are also vials containing 1, 10, 20, 100, and 300 g of cefazolin. Each vial size is a simple ERX record.
Reconstituted solutions and suspensions configuration is similar to other injections or oral liquids. The key difference is—sometimes—the dosing units.

The fields on the Rx Unit Equivalence screen assume a standard, constant concentration for the ERX record. But your organization might not always reconstitute certain products at the same concentration. For such products, it would be unsafe to dose it in mg or g and administer/dispense it in mL. There’d be no way to know for sure how many mg were in one mL!

Example	A 1 g vial of ceFAZolin (Ancef) is typically reconstituted with 2.5 mL of sterile water (for a concentration of 1 g/2.5 mL). If that vial is going to be used for a direct injection, it will be further diluted to a concentration of 1 g/7.5 mL. But if you’re preparing a 1 g IV piggyback, you’ll dilute that 2.5 mL of reconstituted solution directly into a 50 mL bag of D5W. So the same product might be one concentration (1 g/7.5 mL) when used as an injection but a different concentration (1 g/2.5 mL) when used as an ingredient in a mixture. Depending on how it’s used, 1 mL might contain 133.33 mg or 400 mg of ceFAZolin.


Administration and Dispense Units for a reconstituted solution

Epic doesn’t consider these medications liquids so it does not apply the System Level Liquid Rounding table.

Example	
CeFAZolin is frequently dosed in “mg,” “mg/kg,” or “mg/kg/day.” Larger doses might also be dosed in “g.” So in each of the CEFAZOLIN SODIUM... IJ SOLR records, enter a Medication, Administration, and Dispense Unit of “mg.”

As for the Administration and Dispense Rnd Factors, you’d set those to the smallest practical interval. So if you measured doses of ceFAZolin as precisely as 0.01 mg in some cases, that would be your Rnd Factor.

You also need to configure the Equiv Qty and Unit table differently for products that get reconstituted at different concentrations. Manufacturers label each vial of a reconstituted solution or suspension as an “Each.”



Equivalency Table for a Reconstituted Solution

These settings only apply to products that you reconstitute at different concentrations. For products that you always reconstitute at the same concentration (in all hospitals, in all cases), then configure the Administration and Dispense Unit and Rnd Factor fields the same way you would for any other liquid: in mL, and using the System Level Liquid Rounding table. Also, configure the Equiv Qty and Unit table to include both the mL and the medication unit.

Example	For example, AMOXICILLIN 400 MG/5ML PO SUSR is a reconstituted oral suspension that is always reconstituted at 400 mg/5 mL. Its Medication Unit should be “mg,” its Administration and Dispense Units should be “mL,” and the equivalency table should have one row for “400 mg” and a second row for “5 mL.”
Assigning HCPCS Codes
As of 2018, Epic has configured HCPCS codes in some ERX records. You will need to add HCPCS codes to other records that require them.

To make a change to the HCPCS code assigned to an injection or oral liquid, configure:

The code
Quantity the code represents
This is almost always configured in the ERX, but can be set in the NDC or NDG. Be sure to set all items below in the same record; if you populate the Billing code field in an NDC but leave the Quantity in one billing code field blank in that NDC, it will not look to the NDG or ERX for the blank value.  



Medication Admin, Overrides form: assigning a HCPCS code to a med

If a drug has a HCPCS code, you may need to change the billing name. By default, the billing name includes the order name and number of HCPCS codes.

Example	
Imagine you ordered FUROSEMIDE 10 MG/ML IJ SOLN with a dose of 40 mg. This dose has a HCPCS quantity of “2”. On a bill, this appears as:
HCPCS Description Qty

J1940 furosemide (Lasix) injection 40 mg 2

It looks like the patient received 80 mg of furosemide, not 40 mg.



Medication (ERX) record: configuring the override billing name

Example	
The billing name for a 40 mg dose appears as:
HCPCS Description Qty

J1940 furosemide per 20 mg 2

Charging for Waste
In the United States, the Center for Medicare/Medicare Services (CMS) allows organizations to charge for waste when you administer part of a single-use vial (or similar product). You must, however, document and charge for the administration and the waste separately (with a special “JW” modifier on the wastage charge).

Epic has a number of tools to allow you to document and charge for waste. You can:

Automatically calculate and charge for waste based on MAR administrations (for simple ERX records only)
Manually document & charge for waste in Dispense Preparation
Manually document & charge for waste using Order Hx
Run a Reporting Workbench report to find doses that generated waste, then document & charge for waste from the report.
You won’t want to document or charge for waste on all medications, or even on all single-use vials. Some medications aren’t eligible for waste documentation or charging, and organizations interpret and implement CMS’s requirements differently.

Indicate whether waste can be reported on or charged for in an ERX, NDC Group, or NDC record. If you leave the field blank (in all three levels), the system will neither report on nor charge for waste.



Beyond the Basics	For more information about charging for waste, go to galaxy.epic.com >> Medication Charging Setup and Support Guide >> Charge for Wasted Medication
Configuring Administration for Injections and Oral Liquids
Barcode Scanning and Partial Packages
When you dispense a unit-dose package for a liquid, it may be larger than the dose ordered. When a nurse scans the package, the system warns him that he’s about to give too much. He can indicate that he’s giving a partial package and the dose given.

Linking IV Medications to Lines
IV medications aren’t (usually) injected straight into the vein. Instead, clinicians will install one or more IV lines on most hospitalized patients.

Patients often have multiple IV lines. When a patient gets a new line, the patient’s nurse adds the line to their flowsheets using the Add LDA button (“LDA” stands for “lines, drains, and airways”) in the Flowsheets activity.

When a user tries to document a medication with a route of “Intravenous” and the patient has an active IV line on his chart, the nurse is prompted to link the order to the IV line. This is true even for IV injections.



MAR activity: asking the nurse link an IV order to a line

The Inpatient Clinical Documentation team is responsible for creating the LDA records. However, the system uses an order’s route to determine whether it should trigger the Link Lines window. You might be asked to help configure the routes that cause this to happen.

The list of routes that require line-linking is configured in EpicCare System Definitions.

Path: Clinical Administration (text) >> Management Options >> View System Definitions >> Medication, Allergy, Imm, etc. >> MAR >> MAR Medication to Line Linking screen
 

Configuring Sites for Injections
For non-IV injections, your organization might want to require nurses to document the site of each injection.



This is configured in EpicCare System Definitions.
 

Clinical Administration >> Management Options >> Edit System Definitions >> Medication, Allergy, Imm, etc. >> MAR >> Routes requiring site



If you need to, you can override this requirement in specific ERX records on the MAR Settings screen, in the Required Items for Administration field.

Appendix D: Morning Reviews
Review of Chapters 1-2
For each medication listed below, match it to the most appropriate OCC record. (Note that any given OCC might be used for more than one ERX, or not at all.)
Medication (and type)	OCC it should be linked to
HYDROCORTISONE 2.5 % EX CREA

(a non-dosed cream)

No OCC is needed.
HYDROCHLOROTHIAZIDE 12.5 MG CAPS
(an IMS solid)	RX BULK PRODUCT DOSE NOT REQUIRED
HYDROCHLOROTHIAZIDE 6.25 MG SPLIT TABLETS
(a custom ERX for split tablets)	RX SIMPLE MED
The non-dosed cream should use RX BULK PRODUCT DOSE NOT REQUIRED, which will result in required route and frequency fields. The other types of medications should use RX SIMPLE MED, which will result in required fields for dose, route, and frequency.

 

You’ve been asked to configure the ERX records for phantasidose (Trainex) tablets. This new knowledge-enhancing medication is available in three commercial strengths: 50 mg, 100 mg, and 200 mg tablets. Your P&T committee approved the medication, and your buyer has purchased the 50 mg and 100 mg strengths.

When you configure these three ERX records, which of the following fields should have the SAME values in ALL THREE records? (Choose ALL that apply.)
Order Display Name
Medication Short Name
Medication Brand Name
Inpatient Order Name Suffix
Default charge method
Default Frequency
Default Dose
Suggested Doses
 

Medication Unit
Administration Unit
Dispense Unit
Equiv Qty and Unit
Allowed Order Units
Allowed (& Default) Routes
Frequency Buttons
Route Buttons
The only thing you should not have circled is l. Equiv Qty and Unit.

Which of the three phantasidose (Trainex) tablet ERX records should be on your central pharmacy’s medication list? What about on your formulary medication list?
Central pharmacy med list:  just the 50 mg and 100 mg tablets (those are the ones the buyer has purchased)
Formulary:  all three (including the 200 mg tablets).  The non-formulary flag is based on the ERX that a user selects (e.g. from the Database or a patient's home med), not what IMS decides to dispense.  Avoid inappropriate non-formulary flags by including all strengths on formulary, not just the ones you stock or green dot. 

On the central pharmacy medication list in question 3, which ERX records should have a green dot next to them? Why?
Only the 50 mg tab should have a dot. It’s an IMS drug (multiple strengths of the same drug + form), so you only want/need one of them on the Facility List.

After you set the records up, a technician approaches you with this first dose label for 3 first doses:



He points out the dispense amount. “1.5 tablets? But we don’t dispense partial tablets unless they’ve been split and repackaged in bulk.” He’s right, you don’t. Which of the following do you need to do to fix this? Choose ONE answer only.
Change the Allowed Order Units in the ERX record to only include “tablet"
Change the Default Dispense Code to “Solid Form Mixture” in the ERX record
Change the Dispense Rnd Factor to “1” in the ERX record
On the Label Routing table for your pharmacy, change the Group? column for this dispense code
C is the problem. Each dose is 0.5 tablets, but in this scenario, you should be dispensing 3 separate tablets. The Rnd Factor is set to 0.5 (or blank). And yes, it should be 3 tablets being dispensed. There are 3 first doses. Each one should have a dispense amount of 1 tablet. This label is grouped, so it should be 3 tablets for 3 doses.

Trainex has been so popular that there’s now a shortage on 50 mg tablets. You run out! The 100 mg are still available, so you start splitting them in bulk and repackaging them as 50 mg half tablets.

You configure your custom ERX for phantasidose (Trainex) 50 mg half tablets, add it to your central med list, and select it in the Orders activity. But when you change the dose from 50 mg to 100 mg, it doesn’t change to the 100 mg tablets; it’s dispensing 2 x 50 mg half tablets from Central Pharmacy. Name two settings that could be preventing IMS from working correctly.
See chapter 1 ("Enabling IMS in the ERXs") and chapter 2 ("Creating the Custom ERX Record"); In the ERX, possible culprits are:

Use IMS when this is ordered? (should be Yes - Solids)

GPI/GMI/GPK: must match commercially available products.

Medication Unit: must be in units like mg (not tablet or half tablet).

Suggested Doses for Order Entry: must be in units like mg or mg/kg (not tablet or half tablet)

Allowed Order Units: must be limited to units like mg or mg/kg (and not allow units like tablet or half tablet, meaning it CANNOT be blank)

Also: maybe you’ve only got the 50 mg half tablet on the central list. You might have accidentally removed the 100 mg tabs from the list!

The Strength & Strength Unit in the half tablet ERX are also important, but not in this specific scenario. If these were wrong in the 50 mg half tablet, that would prevent IMS from dispensing the half tablet when the dose was 50 mg (which is not the problem here).  If the Strength and Strength Unit were wrong in the commercially available 100 mg tab record, that could cause the behavior described, but these two fields are populated by third-party vendor data for the commercially available strengths--it's very unlikely to be the cause. 

Also, the Proxy might come up, but it’s not about IMS. This impacts mainly medication warnings.

Phantasidose (Trainex) is now available as an IV injection with a 25 mg/mL concentration. When ordered for adults, the most common doses are 25, 50, and 100 mg. When ordered for pediatric patients, typical dosage is 0.25 mg/kg and 0.5 mg/kg. You want your dose buttons for this ERX record to change based on the patient. What will you need to create to accommodate this?
Two (at least) override contexts for the Trainex injection.

Review of Chapters 4-5
Assume that the ERX record for PHANTASIDOSE HCL 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN is configured like so:



Also assume that Standardized Dosing has not been set up in this ERX record.

If you order it at 0.5 mg/kg for your Buffy patient (who weighs 29.3 kg), what will the Calculated Dose be, in both the Medication Unit and Administration Unit? (HINT: see The System Level Liquid Rounding Table in chapter 4 for rounding!)
Step 1: Simplify the ordered dose

0.5 mg/kg x 29.3 kg = 14.65 mg

Step 2a: Calculate & Round Admin Amount (to find Calculated Dose, in Admin unit)

14.65 mg x (1mL/25mg) = 0.586 mL

Per System Level Liquid Rounding Table, round to nearest 0.01 mL >> 0.59 mL

Step 2b: Convert ((to find Calculated Dose, in Med unit)

0.59 mL x (25mg/1mL) = 14.75 mg 
(this IS within 1% of the simplified dose of 14.65 mg, but the allowed dosage deviation percentage doesn't apply, because the original dose was in mg/kg and there are no standardized doses configured)

Your IPS table for ADS and robot pharmacies in your hospital record looks like this:

The ADS cabinet on this patient’s unit has the following on its med list. It has no configuration on its IPS screen.
Lorazepam injection (a C-IV medication): 1 mL Vial
Acetaminophen PO liquid (a non-controlled med): 5 mL Cups

Part I) Which of the following will be dispensed from this patient’s ADS? (Choose ALL that apply.)

A. A 1 mL dose of lorazepam injection

B. A 4 mL dose of lorazepam injection

C. A 3.5 mL dose of acetaminophen PO liquid

D. A 20 mL dose of acetaminophen PO liquid

A is true; exact match on the package size in the ADS. B is true; controlled med, so it matches on the first row (max 999 pkgs). We can do 4 x 1 mL vials. C is also true. Not controlled, so use row 2 (max 3 pkgs). “Matches allowed” is blank, so partial matches are acceptable. It will dispense a 5 mL cup for this 3.5 mL dose. D is false; Not controlled, so use row 2 (max 3 pkgs). 20 mL dose would require 4 x 5 mL cups. Too many! Can’t come from the ADS.


Part II) Pretend that you switched the order of the rows in the IPS table above. How would that change the answer in part I?

B would no longer be true (it’d just be A and C). B would require 4 x 1 mL vials. But if the first row is “<blank>” = Max Pkgs 3, then that applies to all meds (controlled or not). 4 vials is > 3, so it can’t come from there.

 

When you prepare custom doses of phantasidose (Trainex) injections (with a dispense code of “Syringe”), you want a dose label and a grouped production label to print. You’ll print these labels when you dispense first doses, dispense cart doses, dispense PRN first doses, and when you redispense a dose.

Assuming this hasn’t already been configured, how many rows will you need to add to the Label Routing table of your central pharmacy to get such labels to print?
8 rows total
4 actions (Dispense [First Dose], Dispense [Cart Fill], PRN Par Dispense [First Dose], and Redispense)
x 1 dispense code (Syringe)
x 2 different SmartTexts (labels)
= 8 rows total.

 

Which of the following must be true for Epic to dispense a “phantasidose (Trainex) IVPB in 100 mL” mixture from a satellite pharmacy serving the patient’s unit? (Choose ALL that apply. )
a) All of the ingredients must be on the pharmacy’s Medication List
b) Just one of the ingredients must be on the pharmacy’s Medication List
c) The mixture must be on the pharmacy’s Medication List
d) The pharmacy must support the mixture’s Prep Type
Answers: A and D

Review of Chapters 7-8
You want to configure an ERX record for phantasidose (Trainex) IVPB in 100 mL. It can be mixed in either 100 mL of D5W or NS; no other volume or bases should be allowed. NS is the most commonly used base. You want there to be dose buttons for 100 mg, 200 mg and 400 mg; 200 mg should be selected by default.

On the following screenshots, enter the values necessary to make this mixture work as described.



Suggested Doses = 100 mg, 200 mg (yes, the default), 400 mg



In the table at the bottom:
Row 1, Type = Medication; Sel = Main Ingredient
Row 2, Dose = 100; Units = mL; Type = Base; Sel = No
Row 3, Dose = 100; Units = mL; Type = Base; Sel = Yes



In rows 2 and 3, Allow Custom Dose = No



Add a row for: Section Type = Base; Select One Only = Yes; Selection Required = Yes

You test your PHANTASIDOSE IVPB IN 100 ML mixture, and find that the order name at the top of the Order Composer reads: “phantasidose (Trainex) IVPB 200 mg” You want it to read: “phantasidose (Trainex) 200 mg in sodium chloride 0.9% (NS) 100 mL IVPB”. What setting did you forget to make? What specific value should you enter in that setting to get the name you want?
Order Naming Extensions; Enter 34917 – IP RXNAME STANDARD (MAIN INGREDIENT WITH BASE DISPLAYED AND BASE QUANTITY)

 

Which of the following must be true for Epic to dispense a “phantasidose (TRAINEX) IVPB in 100 mL” mixture from a satellite pharmacy serving the patient’s unit? (Choose ALL that apply. )
All of the ingredients must be on the pharmacy’s Medication List
The mixture must be on the pharmacy’s Medication List
The pharmacy must support the mixture’s Prep Type
Answers: A and C

You configure an IMS Orderable for phantasidose (TRAINEX) IVPB. You configure dispensable mapping like so:


 
Part 1: You order this medication for your Caleb patient and enter a dose of 200 mg. Assuming it’s coming from the central pharmacy, which dispensable would you expect it to choose? Why?

It will choose the 2nd line (IVPB IN 100 ML) because Caleb weighs more than 40 kg and the dose falls in the “0-400 mg” row. That takes precedence over the exact match on the premix.

Part 2: Now suppose you order this medication for your Buffy patient, again with a dose of 200 mg. This time, however, IMS picks the 3rd dispensable (the premix IV) instead of the 1st dispensable (the injection). What are two different reasons it might have done so?

Reason 1: The 1st row might not be on the central pharmacy’s medication list (if it’s not available, IMS won’t select it). Note: that would also prevent it from picking line 2, because (as you can see in Question 1, PHANTASIDOSE 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN is the main ingredient of the mixture in row 2).

Reason 2: The Premix IV might be loaded to an ADS cabinet that serves Buffy’s unit, while the injection is not. It’s technically a viable match for the order, so the system would choose to dispense that rather than getting the injection from central.

Part 3: Suppose the system chooses to dispense the 2nd dispensable (PHANTASIDOSE IVPB IN 100 ML, a main ingredient mixture). You notice, however, that the Dispense Code for the order is “Unit Dose” instead of “IVPB Mixture.” In which record would you need to go to fix the dispense code? (Choose ONE only.)

A. PHANTASIDOSE IV ORDERABLE (the IMS orderable record)

B. PHANTASIDOSE IVPB IN 100 ML (the main ingredient mixture being dispensed)

C. PHANTASIDOSE 25 MG/ML IJ SOLN (the simple ERX record that is the main ingredient for the mixture)

D. SODIUM CHLORIDE 0.9 % IV SOLN (the simple ERX record that is the base for the mixture)

B. The dispense code comes from the ERX record being dispensed (in this case, the mixture).
